Serum Aspergillus galactomannan antigen testing by sandwich ELISA: practical use in neutropenic patients.The double sandwich ELISA detecting Aspergillus galactomannan (GM) was prospectively evaluated for the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA) in 50 haematological patients at risk for IA. Serum samples were collected once weekly as long as the risk factors persisted. Six patients had proven or probable IA (3 A. fumigatus, 1 A. flavus, 1 A. niger, 1 A. ustus) and the GM titres were parallel to the clinical evolution of IA. Six of nine patients with suspected IA had at least two consecutive serum GM titres above 1 ng/ml and died with increasing titres, whereas the GM-negative patients survived. Positive GM titres did not anticipate the isolation of fungi. Unfortunately, positive GM titres did not anticipate the initiation of antifungal therapy, based on clinical suspicion. Moreover, if a true-positive result was defined as two consecutive positive serum samples, four patients out of 35 without proven, probable or suspected IA were positive. Then, the rate of false-positive results was high (12%) in the range previously reported. Nevertheless, the GM ELISA appears useful to assess IA and to follow the efficacy of antifungal treatment.Positive results of serum galactomannan assays and pulmonary computed tomography predict the higher response rate of empirical antifungal therapy in patients undergoing allogeneic hematopoietic stem cell transplantation.Invasive fungal disease (IFD) is a leading cause of infection-related mortality among patients undergoing allogeneic hematopoietic stem cell transplantation (allo-HSCT). Although the mortality of IFD has been decreased with empirical antifungal therapy in this population, overtreatment remains a problem, for the persistent or recurrent fever is nonspecific for an IFD. Hence, we explored retrospectively the value of incorporating serum galactomannan (GM) test and pulmonary high-resolution computed tomography (HRCT) as predictors for higher response rate of empirical treatment. In our study, all of 124 patients after allo-HSCT received empirical antifungal therapy when the persistent or recurrent fever developed after receiving broad-spectrum antibiotics. Meanwhile, the levels of serum GM were monitored twice weekly and pulmonary HRCT was performed serially. It showed that the response rate of empirical antifungal therapy was higher in patients with positive results of serum GM tests and/or chest CT scan than that in all patients (66.1% versus 44.6%, P = .008). Moreover, only 10 of 55 patients with both negative GM tests and pulmonary HRCT responded to empirical treatment, and 7 of these 10 patients did not take antifungal agents for prophylaxis. It suggested that these 2 diagnostic tools could not predict patients without adequate Candida prophylaxis well. Thus, we concluded that serum GM assays and pulmonary CT scan could find out patients who really need empirical antifungal therapy, which resulted in improving the efficiency of the treatment.Detection of sputum Aspergillus galactomannan for diagnosis of invasive pulmonary aspergillosis in haematological patients.We investigated the diagnostic utility of Aspergillus galactomannan (GM) in sputum for diagnosis of invasive pulmonary aspergillosis (IPA) in haematologic patients and compared the results with those of bronchial lavage fluid (BLF) and serum. Patients were classified into 4 groups using modified European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer criteria: group A, proven IPA; group B, probable IPA; group C, possible IPA; group D, others. Groups A and B were considered the IPA group (n = 6); group D was considered non-IPA group (n = 37); group C (n = 13) was equivocal for IPA. As a true negative control, sputa from patients with community-acquired pneumonia (CAP) without risk factors (group E, n = 22) were used. From the receiver-operating characteristic curves, the cut-off levels were determined as 1.2 in sputum, 0.5-1.3 in BLF and 0.5 in serum. The sensitivity and specificity of sputum, BLF and serum GM were 100 and 62.2%, 66.7 and 100%, and 83.3 and 81.1%, respectively. Twenty-two patients with CAP (group E) showed median GM levels in the sputa of 0.1 (range 0.0-1.0). Sputum GM is a useful non-invasive test for screening of IPA in haematological patients, and may also be useful for assessment of the risk of developing IPA.A prospective comparison of galactomannan in bronchoalveolar lavage fluid for the diagnosis of pulmonary invasive aspergillosis in medical patients under intensive care: comparison with the diagnostic performance of galactomannan and of (1→ 3)-β-d-glucan chromogenic assay in serum samples.Diagnosis of fungal pneumonia (FP) in critically ill patients is challenging. Circulating biomarkers for the diagnosis of FP have limitations and the combination of different assays in serum samples and directly from the target organ may further improve the diagnosis of FP. We prospectively assessed the diagnostic utility of paired galactomannan (GM) in bronchoalveolar lavage fluid (BAL) and serum GM and (1→3)-β-D-glucan (BG) assays in critically ill patients at risk of FP. Patients with FP were classified according to European Organisation for Research and Treatment of Cancer-Mycoses Study Group criteria, with modifications. Out of 847 admissions, 51 patients were eligible. There were nine invasive aspergillosis (IA) cases (four proven, five probable), three proven Pneumocysitis jirovecii pneumonia (PJP) cases and one mixed FP case (probable IA and proven PJP). The diagnostic accuracy as given by the area under the receiver operating characteristic curve in IA cases (proven and probable) for GM in BAL was 0.98 (95% CI, 0.94-1.00), whilst for GM and BG in serum it was 0.85 (95% CI, 0.74-0.96) and 0.815 (95% CI, 0.66-0.96), respectively. For IA cases (proven and probable) AUC for GM in BAL was significantly higher than GM and BG in serum (p 0.025 and p 0.032, respectively). In one of four proven and one of six probable IA cases, GM in serum remained negative, whereas GM in BAL was positive. In patients with IA, GM (90%) and BG (80%) appeared a mean of 4.3 days (range, 1-10 days) before Aspergillus was cultured. GM detection in BAL appears to improve the diagnosis of IA in critical patients.Comparison of an enzyme immunoassay and latex agglutination test for detection of galactomannan in the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis.Aspergillus antigenemia was followed up in 215 consecutively observed bone marrow transplant (BMT) patients over a period of two years, using both a latex agglutination test and a sandwich immunocapture enzyme immunoassay (EIA) with a rat antigalactomannan monoclonal antibody as capture and detector antibody. For each patient, sequential sera (3 to 20) were obtained before and after BMT. No positivity was observed before BMT. After BMT, the EIA and latex agglutination test were positive in 19 and 4 patients respectively of 25 patients with confirmed aspergillosis and 14 and 7 of 15 patients with probable aspergillosis. In 19 of 25 patients with confirmed aspergillosis and 9 of 15 patients with probable aspergillosis, the EIA was more sensitive and detected infection earlier than the latex test. In all positive cases, antigenemia rapidly increased in sequential samples and remained strongly positive. In 31 of 169 (19%) BMT patients without clinical signs of aspergillosis, the EIA was occasionally positive in samples taken within the first month after BMT, giving a specificity of 81% in these patients. In non-BMT patients suffering from other diseases (n = 77), the specificity was 98.7%. The overall positive and negative predictive values for the EIA were 54% and 95% respectively. These results favour the use of EIA for early diagnosis and monitoring of aspergillosis in BMT patients, although the predictive value of transient positivity remains to be ascertained.Advances in the serological diagnosis of invasive Aspergillus infections in patients with haematological disorders.A reliable diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis in patients with haematological malignancies is seldom achieved antemortem. Conventional laboratory diagnostic methods are insensitive and time-consuming, resulting in late diagnosis and treatment and contributing to unacceptably high mortality. As a result, routine antifungal prophylaxis and early empirical treatment have been recommended. However, overtreatment associated with these strategies results in increased toxicity and cost. The use of sensitive and rapid non-culture-based diagnostic assays, such as detection of Aspergillus antigens (galactomannan, beta-D-glucan) or detection of genomic DNA sequences may allow a shift in emphasis from empirical to pre-emptive therapy, especially when substantiated by suggestive radiological findings. These new tools may be used to confirm a presumed diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis, or, when used to screen high-risk patients, may identify an infection at the early stage of disease. The excellent negative predictive value of these assays should convince clinicians to withhold antifungal therapy in persistently febrile neutropenic patients with no other signs of fungal infection. On the other hand, consecutive positive results in a high-risk population should at least trigger a complete diagnostic work-up. This review will focus on the diagnostic utility as well as on the pitfalls of serial screening for the presence of circulating fungal antigens in haematology patients.Aspergillus galactomannan testing in patients with long-term neutropenia: implications for clinical management.We carried out a prospective study on galactomannan enzyme immuno assay (GEI) (Platelia Aspergillus EIA, Bio-Rad) testing for diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA) in serum and broncho-alveolar lavage (BAL) in 200 patients with hematological malignancies and profound neutropenia. The incidence of proven and probable IA was 6% and 5.5%, respectively. In patients with fever or pneumonia, a single-positive GEI test result (galactomannan index >or= 0.5) had excellent specificity (100%). Sensitivity was relatively low (40%) at onset of fever, but increased to 94.7% after 6 days of fever. In patients with infiltrates in chest X-ray or computed tomography scan (n = 48), GEI testing in BAL had a favorable diagnostic accuracy as compared with GEI testing in serum (sensitivity 100% versus 71%). Our findings indicate that antifungal therapy should be started immediately at onset of fever in neutropenic patients with positive GEI tests. In patients with fever refractory to broad-spectrum antibiotics (>or=6 days of fever), the high diagnostic accuracy makes GEI testing a valuable diagnostic tool and questions the common strategy to carry out antifungal treatment irrespective of diagnostic testing in this situation. Our data also show that GEI testing in BAL can be useful for early diagnosis of IA in patients with hematological malignancies and pulmonary infiltrates.[Analysis of serum Aspergillus galactomannan contents conducted at our hospital during the past 2 years].Comparison of Aspergillus galactomannan antigen testing with a new cut-off index and Aspergillus precipitating antibody testing for the diagnosis of chronic pulmonary aspergillosis.The usefulness of two tests in the serodiagnosis of chronic pulmonary aspergillosis (CPA) was compared. The tests were the serum Aspergillus galactomannan antigen test (Platelia (R) Aspergillus) by enzyme-linked immunoassay (EIA) using old and new cut-off indexes, and the Aspergillus precipitating antibody test.Both Aspergillus-precipitating antibody and Platelia Aspergillus EIA positivity were measured in the sera of 28 patients at the time of diagnosis of CPA.Serum Aspergillus precipitating antibody positivity was 89.3% (25/28) in CPA patients. Serum Platelia Aspergillus EIA positivity was 21.4% (6/28) using the old cut-off index (> or =1.5) and 50% (14/28) using the new cut-off index (> or =0.5)-still less than that for Aspergillus precipitating antibody. Three of the 28 CPA patients had positive reactions in the Platelia Aspergillus EIA using the old cut-off index but not in the Aspergillus precipitating antibody test. Positivity for (1,3) beta-d glucan was 15.4%, and that for culture on CHROMagar Candida was 17.9%. One patient with pulmonary actinomycosis had a false-positive reaction in the Platelia Aspergillus test with the new cut-off index.For the diagnosis of CPA, Aspergillus precipitating antibody testing is more sensitive than the Platelia Aspergillus EIA, even with the new cut-off index. False-positive reactions are observed with the Platelia Aspergillus EIA in patients with conditions such as pulmonary actinomycosis. Results should be interpreted with care when patients are positive for the Platelia Aspergillus EIA but negative for Aspergillus precipitating antibody.Optimization of the cutoff value for the Aspergillus double-sandwich enzyme immunoassay.Many health care centers worldwide use the Platelia Aspergillus enzyme immunoassay (PA-EIA; Bio-Rad Laboratories) for diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA). A cutoff optical density (OD) index of 1.5 was originally recommended by the manufacturer, but in practice, most institutions use lower cutoff values. Moreover, a cutoff OD index of 0.5 was recently approved in the United States. In the present study, we set out to optimize the cutoff level by performing a retrospective analysis of PA-EIA values for samples that had been obtained prospectively from adult patients at risk for IA at 2 European health care centers.In total, 239 treatment episodes were included of which there were 19 episodes of proven IA and 19 episodes of probable IA. Per-episode and per-test analyses and receiver operating characteristic curves were used to determine the optimal cutoff value.In the per-episode analysis, lowering the cutoff OD index for positivity from 1.5 to 0.5 increased the overall sensitivity by 21% (from 76.3% to 97.4%) but decreased the overall specificity by 7% (from 97.5% to 90.5%). Requiring 2 consecutive samples with an OD index > or = 0.5 resulted in the highest test accuracy, with an improved positive predictive value. At a cutoff OD index of 0.5, the antigen test result was positive during the week before conventional diagnosis in 65% of cases and during the week of diagnosis in 79.5% of cases.A cutoff OD index of 0.5--identical to the approved cutoff in the United States--improves the overall performance of the PA-EIA for adult hematology patients.Utility of galactomannan enzyme immunoassay and (1,3) beta-D-glucan in diagnosis of invasive fungal infections: low sensitivity for Aspergillus fumigatus infection in hematologic malignancy patients.Previous studies have reported that galactomannan (GM) enzyme immunoassay and 1,3 beta-glucan (BG) assay may be useful diagnostic tools, but their sensitivities are variable. We compared the performances of both tests. Between October 2002 and May 2005, 82 patients were prospectively monitored for 12 weeks. A total of 414 samples were tested by GM assay and 409 samples were tested by BG assay for the following four groups of patients: those with invasive aspergillosis (IA), those with other mold infections (Fusarium, scedosporium, zygomycosis, etc.), those with candidemia, and control patients. Blood samples were obtained twice on week 1 and once every other week for a total of 12 weeks. Patients in the invasive fungal infection groups had comparable risk factors. The sensitivity of the GM test was significantly higher for patients with IA due to non-fumigatus Aspergillus species than for patients with IA due to Aspergillus fumigatus (49% versus 13%; P < 0.0001) or with other mold infections (49% versus 6%; P < 0.0001). However, the sensitivity range (47% to 64%) and specificity (88%) of the BG assay were comparable among all patients tested, regardless of the infecting pathogen. The performance of GM-based diagnosis appears to be better for detecting non-fumigatus Aspergillus species. The diagnostic marker BG was shown to have a higher sensitivity than that of GM in detecting IA and other mold infections in hematologic malignancy patients.[Value of Aspergillus galactomannan antigen detection in the diagnosis and follow-up of invasive aspergillosis in hematological patients].Serum galactomannan detection is considered to be a useful test for early diagnosis and follow-up of invasive aspergillosis. From February to September 2002, adult patients hospitalized in our Hematology Unit for receiving intensive chemotherapy and/or hematopoietic stem cell transplant were prospectively studied. We analyzed a total of 760 samples obtained from 100 patients. Eleven patients (11%) having a positive result (OD index >1.5 ng/ml) in two consecutive Platelia Aspergillus tests were considered galactomannan-positive cases. On the other hand, 12 patients (12%) were diagnosed of proven or probable invasive aspergillosis. Sensitivity (66.6%), specificity (95.5%), positive predictive value (72.7%) and negative predictive value (96.7%) were comparable to those of larger series. Galactomannan positivity allowed also to anticipate invasive aspergillosis diagnosis (from two to 17 days before radiographic findings and from two to 15 days before mycological culture). Moreover, kinetics of antigenemia could be useful for assessing therapeutic response. Once accepted galactomannan test as a diagnostic criterium for invasive aspergillosis knowing potential causes of false positive results is of paramount importance.Limited utility of serum galactomannan assay after auto-SCT.Value of serial quantification of fungal DNA by a real-time PCR-based technique for early diagnosis of invasive Aspergillosis in patients with febrile neutropenia.A study was designed to assess the reliability of the serial detection of Aspergillus sp. DNA to diagnose invasive aspergillosis (IA) in patients with febrile neutropenia. Two blood and two serum samples were taken weekly from 83 patients. A total of 2,244 samples were analyzed by real-time quantitative PCR. Twelve (14.4%) patients were diagnosed with IA. Taking two consecutive positive results as the diagnostic criterion, PCR detected 11 cases, with 4 false positives, giving sensitivity, specificity, positive, and negative predictive values of 91.6%, 94.4%, 73.3%, and 98.5%, respectively. On analyzing in conjunction with high-resolution chest tomography (HRCT) and galactomannan (GM) testing, the combination of serial PCR and GM detected 100% of aspergillosis cases, with a positive predictive value of 75.1%. This diagnostic strategy presented, according to CART analysis, a receiver-operator curve with an area under the curve of 0.97 (95% confidence interval, 0.895 to 1.032; P < 0.01), with a relative risk of IA 6.92 times higher than the control population and with predictive success of 95.2%. As regards early diagnosis, the serial detection of Aspergillus DNA took on average 21 days less than HRCT and 68 days less than GM. The serial detection of Aspergillus DNA using real-time quantitative PCR has great diagnostic applicability, which increases when combined with GM quantification.Aspergillus antigenemia sandwich-enzyme immunoassay test as a serodiagnostic method for invasive aspergillosis in liver transplant recipients.Invasive aspergillosis (IA) is an important cause of mortality in liver transplant patients. Clinical and microbiological diagnosis is difficult, and it is frequently achieved only after autopsy. Early diagnosis and antifungal therapy could improve the survival of these patients.A retrospective case-control study of IA in liver transplant recipients (OLT) was performed to determine the value of the detection of galactomannan Aspergillus antigen in serum using a sandwich-ELISA test (Platelia, Sanofi Diagnostic Pasteur). Stored frozen serum specimens obtained during the posttransplantation period were used.Fourteen cases of IA were diagnosed in 240 OLT recipients (IA incidence: 5.8%) during 5 years with 13 deaths (mortality: 93%). Nine case patients and 33 control patients met the criteria required for being considered "valid" for antigenemia analysis. In five of the nine case patients, a serum sample was positive for Aspergillus antigenemia detection. The median value was 5.7 ng/ml (range: 1.6-6.6). Sensitivity of the test was 55.6%, specificity was 93.9%, the positive predictive value was 71.4%, and the negative predictive value was 88.6%. The likelihood ratio of a positive test was 9.2.Galactomannan detection in serum could be useful for an early diagnosis of IA in OLT recipients.Contribution of galactomannan antigen detection in BAL to the diagnosis of invasive pulmonary aspergillosis in patients with hematologic malignancies.Invasive pulmonary aspergillosis (IPA) is difficult to diagnose. The detection of galactomannan (GM) in serum samples is useful for diagnosing IPA. A positive test for GM antigen in BAL has also been proposed as a criterion of IPA, although it has not been fully validated. The aim of our study was to evaluate the contribution of GM antigen detection in BAL to the diagnosis of IPA in hematologic patients.One hundred one consecutive patients treated for hematologic malignancy were explored by bronchoscopy and BAL for new pulmonary infiltrates. Both BAL fluid and serum samples were evaluated for GM using an enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay test, with an optical density index >or= 0.5 considered positive. Respiratory samples were also examined for the presence of fungi.IPA was diagnosed in 33 patients according to European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer and Mycoses Study Group consensus group criteria (six proven, 23 probable, four possible). Nineteen of these 33 patients had a positive BAL GM test, whereas three patients without IPA had false-positive results. GM detection in BAL had a sensitivity of 57.6% (95% CI, 40.8%-72.8%) and a specificity of 95.6% (95% CI, 87.8%-98.5%). Among the 19 patients with IPA whose BAL was positive for GM, 15 also had a positive serum GM test. In 11 of these 19 patients, Aspergillus was identified in the respiratory samples.Detection of GM in BAL is complementary of serum GM testing and mycologic evaluation of the respiratory samples for the diagnosis of IPA. Positive GM BAL was the sole microbiologic criterion in two of 33 patients studied.Variables affecting the performance of galactomannan assay in high-risk patients at a tertiary care centre in India.Diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA) in immunocompromised patients using galactomannan ELISA (GM-ELISA) has shown variable sensitivity and specificity.To assess the diagnostic performance of GM-ELISA and analyze the effect of decreasing the cut off value, neutropenia, antifungals and piperacillin-tazobactam (PTZ). Prognostic value using 30 day all-cause mortality was also determined.Serum samples from 81 patients categorized into "proven," "probable," and "possible," categories based on revised EORTC/MSG definitions were tested by GM-ELISA.Sensitivity of GM-ELISA in proven, probable and possible cases was 91.7%, 84.6% and 83.3% respectively. At an index cut-off value of 0.5 an increased sensitivity with minimal loss of specificity was observed. Use of antifungals demonstrated a decrease in sensitivity in proven and possible cases whereas it remained unaffected in probable category. Specificity increased from 75% to 100% with a positivity criterion of >2 consecutive samples. Although an increase in specificity was observed in patients not receiving PTZ, it was not statistically significant. Serial GM index values increased significantly in neutropenic patients and were associated with a poor prognosis.GM-ELISA may be a useful diagnostic and prognostic modality for the detection of IA in high risk patients.Prospective evaluation of clinical and biological markers to predict the outcome of invasive pulmonary aspergillosis in hematological patients.Early evaluation of treatment efficacy in invasive aspergillosis (IA), a leading cause of morbidity and mortality in hematological patients, remains a challenge. We conducted a prospective study to evaluate the performance of different markers in predicting the outcome of patients with IA. Both clinical and biological criteria were assessed 7, 14, 21, and 45 days after inclusion in the study, and mortality was assessed at day 60. The association between baseline data and their evolution and the day 45 response to treatment was analyzed. A total of 57 patients (4 with proven, 44 with probable, and 9 with possible aspergillosis according to the revised EORTC/MSG [European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer/Invasive Fungal Infections Cooperative Group and National Institute of Allergy and Infectious Diseases Mycoses Study Group] definitions) were included. At day 45, 30 patients (53%) were determined to be responders, 25 (44%) were nonresponders, and 2 were not able to be evaluated. Twenty patients died within the 60 days of follow-up. We found that a poor day 45 outcome was associated with patients who had high baseline serum galactomannan (GM) antigen levels and those receiving steroids at the time of IA. A consistently negative serum GM index was associated with a good outcome, and the day 14 clinical evaluation was predictive of the day 45 outcome. No association was found between Aspergillus antibodies or DNA detection and patients' outcome. We conclude that the GM index value at diagnosis of IA, GM index kinetics, and clinical evaluation at day 14 are good markers for predicting the outcome of patients with IA and should be taken into account for adapting antifungal treatment.Comparison of PCR-ELISA and Real-Time PCR for invasive aspergillosis diagnosis in patients with hematological malignancies.This study aimed at comparing a real-time PCR assay and a PCR-ELISA assay of both serum and bronchoalveolar lavage (BAL) samples for the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA) in patients with hematological malignancies. Using a nested case-control design, 163 patients at risk were prospectively monitored and PCR assays were performed on frozen aliquots of 459 sera which were prospectively sampled twice weekly and 42 BAL specimens sampled from 43 probable and one proven IA cases and 47 matched controls. The data from three patients classified as possible IA were excluded from the nested case-control study. The sensitivity of real-time PCR and PCR-ELISA assays in serum was 73% and 86%, respectively and specificity was 100% for both. In BAL, sensitivity was 64% for real-time PCR, 71% for PCR-ELISA and 86% for Galactomannan antigen (GMA) assays with specificities of 96%, 96%, and 93%, respectively. While slightly less sensitive, the real time-PCR assay was highly specific and considerably faster and more workable than PCR-ELISA. Combining real-time PCR and GMA detection for both serum and BAL samples enhances routine laboratory IA diagnosis.The accuracy of serum galactomannan assay in diagnosing invasive pulmonary aspergillosis.Galactomannan (GM) antigen is an aspergillus specific antigen that is released during the growth phase of invasive aspergillosis. We aimed to find the optimum cutoff and accuracy of serum Galactomannan assay in immunocompromised patients. Immunocompromised patients diagnosed with invasive pulmonary aspergillosis (IPA) based on the European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer/Invasive Mycosis Study Group (EORTC/MSG) with three levels of certainty proven, probable and possible, referred for GM antigen measurement at Immunology, Asthma and Allergy Research Institute (IAARI) from 2006 to 2009 and if they met the criteria were enrolled in this study. Totally 49 patients with IPA were enrolled in our study. According to EORTC/MSG, patients categorized into three levels of certainty: They were diagnosed as 'proven' invasive pulmonary aspergillosis 16(32.7%), 'probable' 18(36.7%) and 'possible' 15(30.6%). The most common host risk factor was solid tumors 17(34.7%). The accuracy of Galactomannan assay increased from 0.5 to 2 cutoffs. The optimum sensitivity and specificity obtained at the index cutoff of ≥1.5 for diagnosis of "proven" IPA; which were respectively, 69.2% and 72.2%. Other cutoffs had high variance between sensitivity and specificity for diagnosis of IPA. The calculated cutoff gained by receiver operating characteristic (ROC) analysis for detecting proven IPA was 1.5. Intermediate accuracy of serum GM test in conjunct with clinical findings would help early IPA detection among immunocompromised patients.[Utility of galactomannan enzyme immunoassay and (1,3)beta-D-glucan assay in invasive fungal infection].To evaluate the performance of the galactomannan enzyme immunoassay (GM test) and (1,3)beta-D-glucan assay (G test) for the diagnosis of invasive fungal infection (IFI).A retrospective study was performed in 115 hospitalized patients at Peking University First Hospital who were at risk of IFI. Patients were diagnosed as IFI according to revised definitions of invasive fungal disease from the European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer/Invasive Fungal Infections Cooperative Group and the National Institute of Allergy and Infectious Diseases Mycoses Study Group (EORTC/MSG) Consensus Group. The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value (PPV), and negative predictive value (NPV) were calculated at different cutoff values for two assays respectively. Two tests were combined to evaluate the changes of sensitivity, specificity, PPV and NPV.The best sensitivity (54.5%, 63.6%) and specificity (77.9%, 69.2%) were obtained with the cutoff values of 0.5 and 20 x 10(3) pg/L in GM test and G test respectively. The PPV were 20.7% and 17.9%, and the NPV were 94.2% and 94.7% respectively. The sensitivity increased to 90.9% and the specificity was 52.9% after a combined utility of two tests.The GM test and G tests are both useful in diagnosis of IFI with the cutoff values of 0.5 and 20 x 10(3) pg/L. A better sensitivity is acquired if there is a combined utility of two tests.Prospective clinical evaluation of lower cut-offs for galactomannan detection in adult neutropenic cancer patients and haematological stem cell transplant recipients.The recent advent of an improved commercial serum enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) for the detection of circulating galactomannan (GM), a major constituent of Aspergillus cell walls, has contributed to the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA) in many haematology and transplant centres. However, the optimal threshold for positivity remains a matter of debate. We prospectively evaluated the impact of lowering the cut-off in 124 neutropenic episodes with a high pretest probability for IA. Two new cut-off points, lower than previously accepted, are proposed: (a) a 'static' cut-off at 0.8 and (b) a 'dynamic' cut-off at 0.5. A single assay with an optical density (OD) index > or = 0.8 warrants the initiation of anti-Aspergillus therapy. A further lowering of the 'static' threshold seems not clinically feasible given the drop in positive predictive value (PPV). However, the demonstration of at least two sequential sera with an OD > or = 0.5 ('dynamic' threshold) increased the specificity and the PPV to 98.6% and the efficiency to 98%. Applying both cut-offs to a subgroup of 21 'possible' fungal infections further identified and upgraded six cases of IA. However, the clinical benefit of lower cut-offs (particularly for earlier diagnosis) depends upon the kinetics of antigenaemia and the intensity of serum sampling.Use of galactomannan enzyme immunoassay for diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis in a tertiary-care center over a 12-month period.Development of a serum-based Taqman real-time PCR assay for diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis.We compared an Aspergillus fumigatus-specific Taqman real-time PCR assay for the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA) with the enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay Platelia Aspergillus method. Patients with proven or probable IA had positive results with at least one of the two methods. The PCR method seems to be more specific, and a combination of the two should improve the diagnosis of IA.Use of Aspergillus galactomannan enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) in liver transplant patients.Prospective Aspergillus galactomannan antigen testing in pediatric hematopoietic stem cell transplant recipients.The galactomannan (GM) assay is an approved noninvasive test for detection of invasive aspergillosis (IA) that has been validated in adult patients with hematologic malignancies who are undergoing bone marrow transplantation. There have been few studies with this assay in pediatric patients, but early reports suggest that there may be differences in the performance such that false-positive GM tests in pediatric patients are more common than in adult patients.We performed a prospective study in pediatric hematopoietic stem cell transplant recipients with twice-weekly sampling for GM detection during the highest risk periods of neutropenia and graft-versus-host disease. We analyzed 826 serum samples from 64 patients, including 15 serum samples from one patient diagnosed with probable IA according to defined criteria.Twenty of 811 samples tested positive on repeat testing (specificity, 97.5%; 95% CI: 96.2-98.4%) including samples from 8 of 63 patients without clinical evidence of IA according to study criteria (specificity, 87.3%; 95% CI: 76.9-93.4%). Eleven patients received piperacillin/tazobactam therapy, and 4 of the 11 patients had a positive assay result coinciding with the dates of piperacillin/tazobactam administration. When samples from these patients were excluded, specificity increased to 98.4% (95% CI: 97.2-99.1%) by sample and to 91.5% (95% CI: 81.6-96.3%) by patient.The GM assay holds promise for early, noninvasive diagnosis of IA in high-risk children and false-positive results were not common or unexplainable. This study supports further validation of this assay in a large-scale, pediatric-dedicated format.Performance of the galactomannan antigen detection test in the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis in children with cancer or undergoing haemopoietic stem cell transplantation.Serum galactomannan (GM) antigen detection is not recommended for defining invasive aspergillosis (IA) in children undergoing aggressive chemotherapy or allogeneic haemopoietic stem cell transplantation (HSCT). The ability of the GM test to identify IA in children was retrospectively evaluated in a cohort of children. Test performance was evaluated on samples that were collected during 195 periods at risk of IA. Proven IA was diagnosed in seven periods, all with positive GM test results (true positives, 4%), and possible IA was diagnosed in 15 periods, all with negative GM test results (false negatives, 8%). The test result was positive with negative microbiological, histological and clinical features in three periods (false positives, 1%), and in 170 periods it was negative with negative microbiological, histological and clinical features (true negatives, 87%). The sensitivity was 0.32 and the specificity was 0.98; the positive predictive value was 0.70 and the negative predictive value was 0.92. The efficiency of the test was 0.91, the positive likelihood ratio was 18.3, and the negative likelihood ratio was 1.4. The probability of missing an IA because of a negative test result was 0.03. Test performance proved to be better during at-risk periods following chemotherapy than in periods following allogeneic HSCT. The GM assay is useful for identifying periods of IA in children undergoing aggressive chemotherapy or allogeneic HSCT.Galactomannan in bronchoalveolar lavage fluid: a tool for diagnosing aspergillosis in intensive care unit patients.Invasive aspergillosis (IA) is an important cause of mortality in patients with hematologic malignancies. However, IA appears to be gaining a foothold in the intensive care unit (ICU) in patients without classical risk factors. A recent study described 89 cases of IA in patients in a medical ICU without leukemia or cancer. The diagnosis of IA remains difficult and is often established too late. Galactomannan (GM) is an exo-antigen released from Aspergillus hyphae while they invade host tissue.This prospective single-center study was conducted to investigate the role of GM in bronchoalveolar lavage (BAL) fluid as a tool for early diagnosis of IA in the ICU.All patients with risk factors identified in our earlier study were evaluated. BAL for culture and GM detection, serum GM levels, and computed tomography scan were obtained for all included patients with signs of pneumonia. Patients were classified as having proven, probable, or possible IA.A total of 110 patients out of 1,109 admissions were eligible. There were 26 proven IA cases. Using a cutoff index of 0.5, the sensitivity and specificity of GM detection in BAL fluid was 88 and 87%, respectively. The sensitivity of serum GM was only 42%. In 11 of 26 proven cases, BAL culture and serum GM remained negative, whereas GM in BAL was positive.IA is common in immunocompromised, critically ill patients. GM detection in BAL fluid seems to be useful in establishing or excluding the diagnosis of IA in the ICU.The contribution of galactomannan detection in the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis in bone marrow transplant recipients.Until recently, accurate microbiological diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA) was seldom established in HSCT recipients. Blood samples are rarely positive for Aspergillus species, the reliability of the cultures depends of the specimen (if taken from a normally sterile site or not) and biopsy samples require invasive procedures, rarely recommended in patients with severe thrombocytopenia. Implementing the international consensus defining the microbiological criteria for the diagnosis of Aspergillus infection, we retrospectively evaluated the role of serum galactomannan (GM) detection by EIA to diagnose IA among HSCT patients with proven invasive fungal infection (IFI) and the impact of serum storage in GM concentrations. The EIA assay allowed categorizing as "probable" 5 of the 10 cases of "possible" aspergillosis (50%). Considering a lower cut-off level for the reaction (1.0), 80% of the cases could be categorized as "probable" aspergillosis. Positive or undetermined results were detected one to 4 months before the diagnosis of IA in eight of the 11 patients (72.7%) with proven IFI. Retesting the stored samples after a second storage for four years, we could observe lower reactivity in 20% of the samples. The detection of galactomannan by the EIA test represents a major advance in the diagnosis of IA in HSCT recipients at high risk of IA. A better understanding of the kinetics of the GM in different clinical situations is necessary to maximize the benefit of the test in Aspergillus surveillance.[The value of serum galactomannan detection for diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis in hematopoietic stem cell transplant recipients].To evaluate the value of serum galactomannan (GM) detection for diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA) in hematopoietic stem cell transplant recipients.The serum GM concentration in 167 sera from 46 patients was detected by Platelia Aspergillus double-sandwich enzyme linked immunosorbent assay (PADSELISA). According to the diagnostic criteria of invasive fungal infections in China, the diagnostic changes were evaluated, the sensitivity, specificity and predictive values were calculated.The sensitivity and specificity of the PADSELISA were 81.8% and 93.3% and the positive and negative predictive values were 90.0% and 87.5% respectively. There were 15 positive cases, and 31 negative cases, and the probable IA cases were increased from 11 to 19 after the GM detection. Moreover, the serous level of galactomannan was correlated with the prognosis of the IA.The PADSELISA for GM detection is a reliable method for early diagnosis and treatment of IA in hematopoietic stem cell transplant recipients.Assessment of the lightcycler PCR assay for diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis in paediatric patients with onco-haematological diseases.A reliable diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA) is hampered by the difficulty in obtaining suitable tissue samples. To evaluate the sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value (PPV) and negative predictive value (NPV) of the LightCycler PCR for the diagnosis of IA, 536 blood samples were collected over a 22-month period from 62 paediatric patients (median age 10 years, range 1-18) considered at risk of IA. The galactomannan antigen (GM) and fungal DNA were assessed on serial blood samples. IA was diagnosed in eight of 62 patients (13%): proven, five, probable, three. Sensitivity, specificity, PPV and NPV of LightCycler PCR varied according to the number of positive samples used to define positivity: 88%; 37%; 17% and 95% for single sample positivity; and 63%, 81%, 33% and 94% for serial sample positivity respectively. The concordance between positivity of LightCycler PCR assay and the diagnosis of IA was 79%. The single positivity of LightCycler PCR assay showed a good sensitivity for the diagnosis of IA in paediatric patients. The high NPV makes LightCycler PCR a promising tool in addition to GM testing to design a strategy of pre-emptive antifungal therapy, although further validation studies are needed.Prospective assessment of Platelia Aspergillus galactomannan antigen for the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis in lung transplant recipients.The clinical utility of Platelia trade mark Aspergillus galactomannan antigen for the early diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis was prospectively assessed in 70 consecutive lung transplant recipients. Sera were collected twice weekly and tested for galactomannan. Invasive aspergillosis was documented in 17.1% (12/70) of the patients. Using the generalized estimating equation model, at the cutoff value of >or= 0.5, the sensitivity of the test was 30%, specificity 93% with positive and negative likelihood ratios of 4.2 and 0.75, respectively. Increasing the cutoff value to >or= 0.66 yielded a sensitivity of 30%, specificity of 95%, and positive and negative likelihood ratios of 5.5 and 0.74. A total of 14 patients had false-positive tests, including nine who had cystic fibrosis or chronic obstructive pulmonary disease. False-positive tests occurred within 3 days of transplantation in 43% (6/14) of the patients, and within 7 days in 64% (9/14). Thus, the test demonstrated excellent specificity, but a low sensitivity for the diagnosis of aspergillosis in this patient population. Patients with cystic fibrosis or chronic obstructive pulmonary disease may transiently have a positive test in the early post-transplant period.Comparison of antigen detection and PCR assay using bronchoalveolar lavage fluid for diagnosing invasive pulmonary aspergillosis in patients receiving treatment for hematological malignancies.The performance of a sandwich enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) which detects Aspergillus galactomannan (GM) was evaluated in bronchoalveolar lavage (BAL) fluid samples from 19 patients who were treated for hematological malignancies and who were suspected of having invasive pulmonary aspergillosis (IPA). All patients had fever and pulmonary infiltrates on the chest roentgenogram on the day that the BAL fluid was obtained. The ELISA results were compared with the results of culture and Aspergillus genus-specific PCR analysis of BAL fluid samples. ELISA was also performed with serum samples. Aspergillus species were detected by PCR or ELISA with BAL fluid samples from five of seven patients who had radiological evidence of IPA. Serum ELISA results were positive for all patients with ELISA-positive BAL fluid, and for four patients the serum ELISA was positive before the BAL fluid was obtained. PCR and ELISA were positive for 2 and 1 of 10 BAL fluid samples, respectively, obtained from patients without radiological evidence of IPA, and 5 and 2 of 35 BAL fluid samples, respectively, obtained from nonneutropenic patients. This preliminary investigation suggests that GM may be detected by ELISA in BAL fluid samples from patients at risk of IPA, but that monitoring of serum GM levels may allow for the earlier diagnosis of IPA. However, further evaluation in prospective studies is required.Value of consecutive galactomannan determinations for the diagnosis and prognosis of invasive pulmonary aspergillosis in critically ill chronic obstructive pulmonary disease.Critically ill chronic obstructive pulmonary disease (COPD) patients who are admitted to intensive care units (ICU) are at particular risk for invasive pulmonary aspergillosis (IPA). The objective of this investigation was to assess the value of consecutive galactomannan (GM) tests in determining the diagnosis and prognosis of IPA in this patient population. We studied 90 critically ill COPD patients admitted to our ICU between February 2007 and November 2009. Two consecutive serum GM tests were done on the first and fourth days of their ICU admissions. Patients were classified as proven IPA (n = 1), probable IPA (n = 18), or non-IPA (n = 71). The sensitivities, specificities, and positive and negative predictive values of GM test results for (i) the first test, (ii) the second test, (iii) at least one positive of two consecutive tests and (iv) two positive consecutive GM tests were, respectively, 57.9%/64.7%/70.6%/47.1%; 87.3%/84.6%/80.8%/94.2%; 55.0%/57.9%/54.5%/72.7%; and 88.6%/88.0%/89.4%/84.5%. The mortality values of IPA patients with (i) a positive first GM test, (ii) at least one of two tests positive, and (iii) both tests positive were (a) 81.8% (9/11), (b) 83.3% (10/12), and (c) 72.7% (8/11), respectively. These results indicate that at least one positive result of two consecutive GM tests appears to be useful in the diagnosis of IPA in critically ill COPD patients in an ICU. In addition, positive serum GM results combined with the isolation of Aspergillus from respiratory samples may be a potential marker of high mortality.Value of a single galactomannan determination (Platelia) for the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis in non-hematological patients with clinical isolation of Aspergillus spp.We studied 75 patients with non-hematological conditions from whom Aspergillus spp. were recovered from clinical specimens during the period March 2003 to August 2006. The patients were classified according to EORTC criteria and the presence of galactomannan (Platelia Aspergillus) in their sera was evaluated. Ten of these patients (13.3%) had proven or probable invasive aspergillosis, i.e., chronic obstructive pulmonary disease in five (50%), HIV infection in one (10%), lymphoma in one (10%), liver transplant in one (10%), solid malignancies in one (10%), and corticosteroid treatment in one (10%). The sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values for the detection of galactomannan, using cut-offs of > or =0.5 ng/ml and > or =1 ng/ml were 60%/50%, 89.23%/100%, 46.15%/100%, and 93.55%/92.86% (p=0.001 and p<0.001), respectively. The determination of galactomannan in the sera of non-neutropenic patients could prove to be a useful microbiological finding when diagnosing invasive aspergillosis.Contribution of (1->3)-beta-D-glucan chromogenic assay to diagnosis and therapeutic monitoring of invasive aspergillosis in neutropenic adult patients: a comparison with serial screening for circulating galactomannan.Two noninvasive diagnostic tests, (1-->3)-beta-D-glucan (BG) (Glucatell) and galactomannan (GM) (Platelia Aspergillus), were used retrospectively in a twice-weekly screening for the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA) in 40 treatment episodes (one hospital visit per patient) in 40 neutropenic adult patients at high risk for IA. Five proven IA cases, three probable IA cases, and three possible IA cases were diagnosed. Diagnostic levels of both BG and GM were detected in 100% of patients with proven IA cases and in 66% of patients with probable IA cases. The kinetics of both markers in patients with IA were similar. The sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values for GM and BG were identical, namely, 87.5, 89.6, 70, and 96.3%, respectively. False-positive reactions occurred at a rate of 10.3% in both tests, but the patients showing false-positive results were different in each test. Both tests anticipated the clinical diagnosis, computed tomography abnormalities, and the initiation of antifungal therapy in most patients, but BG tended to become positive earlier than GM. A combination of the two tests improved the specificity (to 100%) and positive predictive value (to 100%) of each individual test without affecting the sensitivity and negative predictive values. In conclusion, BG and GM detection are useful tests for the diagnosis of IA in high-risk hematological patients, but a combination of the two tests was very useful to identify false-positive reactions by each test.Galactomannan antigenemia in pediatric oncology patients with invasive aspergillosis.Diagnosing invasive aspergillosis is difficult but might be improved by detection of circulating galactomannan. Although galactomannan antigenemia has been well studied in the detection of invasive aspergillosis in adult patients, little is known about the expression of circulating galactomannan in immunocompromised children with invasive aspergillosis.We studied the expression of galactomannan antigen by enzyme immunoassay (EIA) in 990 serum samples from 56 pediatric oncology patients (ages 3 months to 18 years) of whom 17 had proven or probable invasive aspergillosis defined by the European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer-Mycoses Study Group criteria. Any sample with a galactomannan EIA Galactomannan index value of > or = 0.5 was considered positive.At least 1 serum sample was positive for 11 of 17 pediatric oncology patients (65.7% sensitivity, 95% confidence interval: 38.3-85.7) with invasive aspergillosis. Galactomannan EIA was positive in 99 of 304 samples from patients with proven or probable invasive aspergillosis, and 7 of 686 (1.0%) samples from 39 control subjects resulted in a positive galactomannan EIA result. At least 1 sample tested positive in 5 of the 39 controls (12.8%, 95% confidence interval: 4.3-27.4). No significant association between accuracy and patient age was observed. Among the 7 evaluable galactomannan-positive patients with IA, the galactomannan EIA produced a positive result before clinical or radiographic evidence of infection in 6 cases, with a lead-time to diagnosis ranging from 1 day to 34 days (median: 10 days). In the remaining case, a positive galactomannan was observed on the same day as diagnosis by non-EIA methods.The presence of circulating galactomannan is predictive of invasive aspergillosis in most pediatric oncology patients. Galactomannan antigenemia may precede clinical, microbiologic, or radiographic evidence of invasive aspergillosis.False-positive Aspergillus galactomannan antigenaemia after haematopoietic stem cell transplantation.Although Aspergillus galactomannan (GM) antigen detection is widely applied in the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA), false-positive reactions with fungus-derived antibiotics, other fungal genera or the passage of dietary GM through injured mucosa are a matter of concern. The aim of this study was to investigate the cumulative incidence and risk factors for false-positive GM antigenaemia.The records of 157 adult allogeneic haematopoietic stem cell transplantation (HSCT) recipients were retrospectively analysed. Episodes of positive GM antigenaemia, defined as two consecutive GM results with an optical density index above 0.6, were classified into true, false and inconclusive GM antigenaemia by reviewing the clinical course.Twenty-five patients developed proven or probable IA with a 1 year cumulative incidence of 12.9%, whereas 50 experienced positive GM antigenaemia with an incidence of 32.2%. Among the total 58 positive episodes of the 50 patients, 29 were considered false-positive. The positive predictive value (PPV) was lower during the first 100 days than beyond 100 days after HSCT (37.5% versus 58.8%). Gastrointestinal chronic graft-versus-host disease (GVHD) was identified as the only independent significant factor for the increased incidence of false-positive GM antigenaemia (PPV 0% versus 66.7%, P = 0.02).GM antigen results must be considered cautiously in conjunction with other diagnostic procedures including computed tomography scans, especially during the first 100 days after HSCT and in patients with gastrointestinal chronic GVHD.[A preliminary investigation on early diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis in patients with blood diseases by using circulating galactomannan test].The objective of this study was to explore the useful value of circulating galactomannan (GM) for early diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis. All 141 patients were classified as 103 patients of clinical and possible diagnosis, and 38 non-Aspergillus patients. 209 serum samples for the detection of GM by Platelia Aspergillus were collected before anti-fungal vaccine therapy. ELISA method was used in detection of GM. The results showed that (1) the sensitivity of 87.5%, specificity of 81.6%, positive prediction of 66.7% and negative prediction of 93.9% were determined by using cut-off value. According to the result of ELISA, the clinical diagnosed patients was up to 48, while the possible diagnosed patients were 55. (2) Among 62 patients with consecutive examinations of serum samples, 50 patients were successfully diagnosed and treated, while 12 patients died. A progressive reduction of GM level was found in survivors, however, the patients of poor prognosis showed higher antigen titres. It is concluded that GM test has more significance for earlier diagnosis of aspergillosis, the concentration of GM is related to prognosis of disease.Retrospective assessment of β-D-(1,3)-glucan for presumptive diagnosis of fungal infections.β-D-(1,3)-glucan (BG) is a component of the cell walls of many fungal organisms. Our aims were to investigate the feasibility of the BG assay and its contribution to early diagnosis of different types of invasive fungal infections (IFI) commonly diagnosed in a tertiary care centre. The BG serum levels of 28 patients diagnosed with six IFI [13 probable invasive aspergillosis (IA), 2 proven IA, 2 zygomycosis, 3 fusariosis, 3 cryptococcosis, 3 candidaemia and 2 pneumocystosis] were retrospectively evaluated. The kinetic variations in BG serum levels from the 15 patients diagnosed with IA were compared with those of the galactomannan antigen (GM). In 5/15 cases of IA, BG was positive earlier than GM (time lapse from 4 to 30 days), in 8/15 cases, BG was positive at the same time as GM and, in 2/15 cases, BG was positive after GM. For the five other fungal diseases, BG was highly positive at the period of diagnosis except for the two cases of zygomycosis and one of the three cases of fusariosis. This study, which reflects the common activity of a tertiary care centre, confirms that BG detection could be of interest for IFI screening in patients with haematological malignancies.Early Diagnosis of Invasive Aspergillosis in Neutropenic Patients. Comparison between Serum Galactomannan and Polymerase Chain Reaction.Invasive aspergillosis (IA) is a major cause of morbidity and mortality in profoundly neutropenic patients, so early diagnosis is mandatory.Consecutive patients with hematological malignancies undergoing intensive chemotherapy were screened for IA with two different methods which were compared.From October 2000 to August 2003 we tested 1311 serum samples from 172 consecutive patients with a polymerase chain reaction assay and between April 2005 and April 2008 we tested 806 serum samples from 169 consecutive patients with a Galactomannan (GM) test. Bronchoalveolar (BAL) samples were obtained whenever the patient's condition allowed and tested with either method.The serum PCR assay had a sensitivity of 75.0% and a specificity of 91.9% and the serum GM assay had a sensitivity of 87.5% and a specificity of 93.1%, (P > 0.05). The presence of two or more consecutive positive serum samples was predictive of IA for both assays. BAL GM/PCR was positive in some patients without serum positivity and in patients with 2 or more positive serum GM/PCR.No significant differences between the 2 serum tests were found. The GM assay has the advantage of being standardized among several laboratories and is incorporated in the criteria established by the European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer/Invasive Fungal Infections Cooperative Group and the National Institute of Allergy and Infectious Diseases Mycosis Study Group (EORTC/MSG), however is much more expensive. BAL GM and PCR sampling aids in IA diagnosis but needs further validation studies to differentiate between colonization and true infection in cases where serum GM or PCR are negative.Combined real-time PCR and galactomannan surveillance improves diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis in high risk patients with haematological malignancies.Invasive aspergillosis (IA) is a leading complication of intensive treatment for haematological malignancies. Earlier diagnosis should facilitate effective antifungal therapy and prevent progression to invasive disease, which is often lethal. Polymerase chain reaction (PCR) assays, targeting the 28S and ITS ribosomal gene regions respectively, were evaluated for early detection of Aspergillus DNA and for diagnostic utility in patients receiving treatment in two busy haematopoietic stem cell transplant centres. Patients undergoing intensive chemotherapy, autologous or allogeneic transplant were eligible for inclusion in the study. EDTA blood and serum samples for circulating Aspergillus biomarkers, including galactomannan (GM), were collected twice-weekly on a prospective basis from all study patients who were categorized according to international consensus criteria for defining invasive fungal disease (IFD). Of 278 patients recruited there were 44 probable IA cases and only one proven case. Moderate sensitivity and specificity, poor positive predictive value (50-80%), but good negative predictive value (>80-90%) were common to both PCR assays. Overall biomarker performance could be improved by combining positive results of either PCR assay with GM taken within a 12-d period. The addition of PCR to GM monitoring in high-risk patients with haematological malignancies provides greater diagnostic accuracy in invasive aspergillosis.[Evaluation of galactomannan antigen and beta-D-glucan value for diagnosis of chronic necrotizing pulmomary aspergillosis].In order to establish the reliable cut-off value of galactomannan (GM) antigen as well as that for beta-D-glucan for CNPA diagnosis, we conducted the following study. From 2001 to 2008, in a total of 1511 patients we measured GM and anti-aspergillus antibody simultaneously. These patients had chronic pulmonary disease including old tuberculosis, nontuberculous mycobacteriosis, COPD, and had bullous lung, interstitial lung disease or were suspected to have suspected to have interstitial lung disease. We designated cases as probable CNPA when the sample represented a positive anti-aspergillus antibody. We then analyzed the sensitivity and specificity according to various GM antigen values. When using the GM antigen cut-off value at 0.5, the sensitivity and specificity for CNPA were 63.4% and 68.6% respectively. Using 1.0 for cut-off value resulted in the better specificity for CNPA diagnosis. Similar analysis was performed on beta-D-glucan for CNPA diagnosis. When using D-glucan cut-off value as 20 pg/ml, the sensitivity and specificity for CNPA. These results indicate that the cut-off value of serological examination for infectious disease should be considered by the type of disease.Value of antigen detection using an enzyme immunoassay in the diagnosis and prediction of invasive aspergillosis in two adult and pediatric hematology units during a 4-year prospective study.Invasive aspergillosis (IA) is a well recognized, life-threatening infection in neutropenic patients and stem cell transplantation recipients. Early diagnosis is important to achieve the best outcome for these patients; however, definite proof often is difficult to obtain due to counterindicated invasive procedures.This study evaluated the specificity and sensitivity of the detection of galactomannan (GM) for the diagnostic and prediction of IA in 347 children from the Pediatric Hematology Service and 450 patients from the Bone Marrow Transplantation Unit at the Hôpital Saint-Louis in Paris. Serial screening of Aspergillus GM circulating antigen was evaluated using a double sandwich ELISA assay (Platelia Aspergillus) on 6209 sera. Among the patients studied, 53 presented with confirmed IA (n = 27 patients) or probable IA (n = 26 patients).Antigen was detected on at least two sequential sera in 48 of 53 patients, with a sensitivity of 90.6%. GM antigenemia was detected before the onset of radiologic signs in 31 of 48 patients (64.6%), with a mean of -8.4 days, and before clinical symptoms in 18 of 48 patients (39.6%), with a mean of -6.9 days. In patients without IA, 44 of 744 had positive antigenemia, resulting in a specificity of 94%. False positive results could not be related to the presence of a concurrent mucositis.This large, prospective study allowed the authors to define better the conditions for the use of GM immunocapture ELISA in surveying patients who are at high risk for IA. The presence of antigen has a good diagnostic value mainly when there is an increase in the titer on two consecutive sera samples. A repeated negative result is a strong argument against the diagnosis of IA; however, an awareness of the possibility of unexplained false negative results is important.[The use of galactomannan detection in diagnosing invasive aspergillosis in hemato-oncological patients].PREMISES AND OBJECTIVES: Timely diagnosis is of critical importance for the prognosis of invasive aspergilosis (IA) patients. Over recent years, IA detection of galactomannan using the ELISA method has assumed growing importance. The objective of the study was to analyse the usability of the method in current clinical practice of a hemato-oncological ward.From May 2003 to October 2006, blood samples were taken from patients at IA risk to detect galactomannan (GM) in serum using the ELISA method. The patients who underwent the tests were classified by the probability of IA presence on the basis of the results of conventional diagnostic methods and section findings.A total of 11,360 serum samples from 911 adult patients were tested for GM presence. IA (probable/proven) was diagnosed in 42 (4.6%) of them. The rates of sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive value of galactomannan detection for IA diagnosis in our ward were, respectively, 95.2%, 90.0%, 31.5% and 99.7%. The principal causes of the limited positive predictive value of the test were the high percentage of false-positive test results (mainly caused by concomitant administration of some penicillin antibiotics or Plasma-Lyte infusion solution), as well as the fact that a large percentage of patients we examined fell within the group of patients with hematological malignity with a very low prevalence of IA.GM detection in serum is associated with high sensitivity and excellent negative predictive value in IA diagnosis in hemato-oncological patients. Knowledge and elimination of possible causes of false-positive results as well as focusing the screening on patients at greatest risk of infection are necessary for an even better exploitation of the test.[The significance of serum GM and BG antigens assay for invasive fungal infections in hematological malignancies patients].To evaluate the diagnostic value of serum galactomannan antigen (GM) and (1→3)-β-D-glucan antigen (BG) assay in invasive fungal infections (IFI) in the patients with hematologic malignancies and the role in monitoring therapeutic response.Fifty one patients with hematological malignancies met the criteria for inclusion: (1) body temperature above 38°C for 48 hours, (2) failure to respond to broad-spectrum antibiotic treatment, or (3) temperature rose again after the responded drop. Blood samples were collected twice at the first week, then once a week in at least four weeks. The double antibody sandwich enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) and colorimetric assay were used for detecting GM and BG. The positive GM test is defined as two consecutive tests at different time GM value > 0.5 or > 0.8 and the positive G test is defined as BG value > 80 pg/ml. The patients were assigned into four groups as proven, probable, possible, and non-fungal infection respectively, and 21 normal volunteers were as controls.Two hundred and forty serum samples were collected from 51 patients including 2 of proven IFI, 26 probable IFI, 17 possible IFI and 6 non-fungal infection. The true-positive group including the proven and probable groups, and true negative group was the non-fungal infection group. GM tests were positive in 21 of 28 cases in true positive group, and only one of 6 cases in non-fungal infection. The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value and negative predictive value were 75%, 83.3%, 95.5% and 41.7%, respectively. G tests were positive in all 28 cases of the true positive group, and 4 in 6 non-fungal infection cases. The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value and negative predictive value were 100%, 33.3%, 87.5% and 100%, respectively. G test is more sensitive than GM test (P = 0.015), but there was no significant difference in specificity of the two tests (P = 0.242). In 19 of 21 patients with GM test positive, anti-fungal treatment was effective, and GM value gradually decreased to negative, two invalid patients were persistent with GM test positive. After two weeks treatment, the average GM value was significantly lower in the effective group than in the ineffective group (P < 0.05). BG values in the responded patients showed a gradual decline similar to that of GM values, but not to negative. The changes of BG value in ineffective group varied with a trend upward. The changes in BG value had no relation with treatment effectiveness.Serum GM and BG antigens detection provides strong evidence for early diagnosis of IFI. Combination of GM and G tests can improve the diagnostic specificity and reduce the false positive GM test seems superior to G test for monitoring GM and BG values during treatment.The role of bronchoalveolar lavage galactomannan in the diagnosis of pediatric invasive aspergillosis.: Molecular biomarkers such as the galactomannan assay are of increasing interest in clinical settings for diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA). The use of bronchoalveolar lavage galactomannan (BAL GM) is being validated in adult populations, but has not been systematically evaluated in pediatric patients.: A retrospective analysis was performed of patients for whom GM assays from BAL were submitted between November 1, 2006 and November14, 2007 at Childrens Hospital Los Angeles. Medical charts were reviewed and patients were categorized as having no, possible, probable, and proven IA, per established definitions.: Of 85 pediatric patients who had a BAL GM submitted during the study, 59 were immunocompromised. Three patients were identified as having proven IA, 6 had probable IA, 37 had possible IA, and 39 had no evidence of IA; 38 had a concurrent serum GM performed. A positive, linear correlation was established between BAL and serum GM, using OD index values (rho = 0.48, P = 0.002). Among immunocompromised patients, receiver operating characteristic curves demonstrated an optimal BAL GM OD cut-off value of 0.87, that yielded a sensitivity for probable/proven IA of 78% and a specificity of 100%. At 0.87, the positive and negative predictive values among immunocompromised patients were 58% and 96%, respectively.: We found a correlation between BAL GM values and a diagnosis of IA. We also noted a linear relationship between serum and BAL GM values. Receiver operating characteristic curves obtained from our pediatric data validate the current cut off for serum and suggest a possible cut off for BAL specimens.Serum galactomannan assay for diagnosis of probable invasive Aspergillosis in acute leukemia and hematopoietic stem cell transplantation.Invasive aspergillosis (IA) is a leading cause of mortality in acute leukemia and hematopoietic stem cell transplantation (HSCT).To determine the yield of galactomannan (GM) assay for the diagnosis of probable IA, its temporal relationship with the computed tomography (CT) scans and correlation with mortality in AL and HSCT.Consecutive neutropenic episodes (n=150) among inpatients aged ≥15 years with AL or recipients of HSCT were prospectively evaluated over 1½ years. All patients underwent weekly serum GM assay and optical density index >0.5 for ≥2 samples was defined as positive. IA was diagnosed according to EORTC 2008 guidelines.Of the 150 episodes enrolled, 43 (28.7%) were diagnosed with IA: possible 25 (16.7%), probable 17 (11.3%) and proven 1 (0.7%). The yield of GM assay in diagnosing probable IA was 17/42 (40.5%). In 88.2% of probable IA episodes, GM was positive before high-resolution CT at a median of 10 days (range 1-16). In the episodes with ≥2 samples tested, fatality was higher in those ≥2 values positive for GM, compared to the rest (31% vs. 13.2%, odd ratio 2.96, 95% CI 1.09-8.00; P=0.04).In AL and HSCT, GM assay could identify patients with probable IA earlier than CT chest and also predicted a higher risk of death.Prevention and diagnosis of invasive fungal disease in high-risk patients within an integrative care pathway.The aim of this study was to assess the clinical utility of enhanced diagnostics on the management of invasive fungal disease in high risk patients within an integrated care pathway and to audit compliance and efficacy of antifungal prophylaxis.A cohort of 549 high risk haematology and stem-cell transplant recipients was followed over a 5 year period. The routine standard of care involved the use of antimould prophylaxis and a neutropenic care pathway utilizing twice weekly antigen and PCR testing.Prophylaxis with itraconazole was poorly tolerated and therapeutic levels could not be maintained. Antigen testing and PCR showed good clinical utility in the management of invasive aspergilosis with high sensitivity (98%) and negative predictive value (99.6%) when both tests were used together, allowing a diagnosis IA to be excluded and obviating the need for empirical antifungal agents. When used serially, multiple positive PCR and antigen test results enabled accurate diagnosis of IA with a specificity of 95% and a positive likelihood ratio of 11. Biomarkers preceded clinical signs in 85% of proven and probable invasive disease.The combination of both tests showed optimum clinical utility for the diagnosis and management of IA in this high risk group.Combined real-time PCR and galactomannan surveillance improves diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis in high risk patients with haematological malignancies.Invasive aspergillosis (IA) is a leading complication of intensive treatment for haematological malignancies. Earlier diagnosis should facilitate effective antifungal therapy and prevent progression to invasive disease, which is often lethal. Polymerase chain reaction (PCR) assays, targeting the 28S and ITS ribosomal gene regions respectively, were evaluated for early detection of Aspergillus DNA and for diagnostic utility in patients receiving treatment in two busy haematopoietic stem cell transplant centres. Patients undergoing intensive chemotherapy, autologous or allogeneic transplant were eligible for inclusion in the study. EDTA blood and serum samples for circulating Aspergillus biomarkers, including galactomannan (GM), were collected twice-weekly on a prospective basis from all study patients who were categorized according to international consensus criteria for defining invasive fungal disease (IFD). Of 278 patients recruited there were 44 probable IA cases and only one proven case. Moderate sensitivity and specificity, poor positive predictive value (50-80%), but good negative predictive value (>80-90%) were common to both PCR assays. Overall biomarker performance could be improved by combining positive results of either PCR assay with GM taken within a 12-d period. The addition of PCR to GM monitoring in high-risk patients with haematological malignancies provides greater diagnostic accuracy in invasive aspergillosis.Variables affecting the performance of galactomannan assay in high-risk patients at a tertiary care centre in India.Diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA) in immunocompromised patients using galactomannan ELISA (GM-ELISA) has shown variable sensitivity and specificity.To assess the diagnostic performance of GM-ELISA and analyze the effect of decreasing the cut off value, neutropenia, antifungals and piperacillin-tazobactam (PTZ). Prognostic value using 30 day all-cause mortality was also determined.Serum samples from 81 patients categorized into "proven," "probable," and "possible," categories based on revised EORTC/MSG definitions were tested by GM-ELISA.Sensitivity of GM-ELISA in proven, probable and possible cases was 91.7%, 84.6% and 83.3% respectively. At an index cut-off value of 0.5 an increased sensitivity with minimal loss of specificity was observed. Use of antifungals demonstrated a decrease in sensitivity in proven and possible cases whereas it remained unaffected in probable category. Specificity increased from 75% to 100% with a positivity criterion of >2 consecutive samples. Although an increase in specificity was observed in patients not receiving PTZ, it was not statistically significant. Serial GM index values increased significantly in neutropenic patients and were associated with a poor prognosis.GM-ELISA may be a useful diagnostic and prognostic modality for the detection of IA in high risk patients.Comparison of galactomannan enzyme immunoassay performance levels when testing serum and plasma samples.Diagnostic galactomannan (GM) enzyme immunoassay (EIA) testing is formally validated only for serum, though in practice, plasma is occasionally tested. It is assumed, but not confirmed, that results will be comparable to those for serum. GM EIA when testing plasma was evaluated, providing sensitivity (85.7%) and specificity (85.4%) comparable to those for serum. Plasma index values were higher than those for serum; if plasma GM EIA were used to define probable cases, four additional cases would have been diagnosed.Serum galactomannan assay for the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis in children with haematological malignancies.Diagnostic efficacy of Galactomannan (GM) assay for invasive aspergillosis (IA) is variably reported. Data from developing countries are scant. Children with haematological malignancies and fever were enrolled prospectively. Blood sample for GM was drawn on the day of admission; levels were measured with Platellia Aspergillus enzyme immunoassay. Diagnostic criteria were adapted from EORTC-MSG-2002. Proven, probable and possible episodes were considered as the disease group. One hundred febrile episodes in 78 patients were evaluated. The mean age was 6.1 years. Majority (75%) episodes were in patients with acute lymphoblastic leukaemia. One episode each was diagnosed with proven and probable IA, while 23 were diagnosed with possible IA. Best results were obtained with a cut-off value of 1.0, with sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive value of 60%, 93%, 75 and 87 respectively. The sensitivity dropped to 40%, at cut-off value of 1.5 and specificity was 38%, at a cut-off of 0.5. A higher value of GM correlated with pulmonary nodules (P = 0.037) and mortality (P = 0.001). GM assay is adjunctive to clinical/radiological evidence. A negative GM assay may not reassure the physician against the use of amphotericin in patients with febrile neutropenia, as it does not exclude the diagnosis of clinically relevant other fungal infections, particular mucormycosis.Diagnosis of invasive pulmonary aspergillosis in children with bronchoalveolar lavage galactomannan.Invasive pulmonary aspergillosis (IPA) is a life-threatening complication in immunocompromised patients. Early diagnosis and therapy improves outcome. Assessment of galactomannan (GM) in bronchoalveolar lavage (BAL) fluid is a proposed tool to diagnose IPA. Little is known about the diagnostic value of BAL GM in children.Retrospectively, 72 bronchoscopies were analyzed for GM in patients fulfilling the host factor criteria as defined by the EORTC/MSG. A cut-off index value GM of ≥0.5 was used. Clinical data, results of chest CT-scans and BAL cultures were collected.Sensitivity, specificity, PPV, and NPV of BAL GM for a diagnosis of proven and probable IPA (n = 41) were 82.4%, 87.5%, 82.4%, and 87.5% respectively. A significant relation was found for BAL GM and abnormal chest CT (P = 0.01). No significant relationship was observed between BAL Aspergillus sp. culture and chest CT (n = 47). BAL GM and serum GM correlated significantly. In 9 out of 12 patients classified as possible IPA, antifungal therapy was continued or started, despite a negative BAL GM.BAL GM test had good diagnostic value in children suspected of IPA. However, the decision to continue or start antifungal therapy was mainly determined by the clinical suspicion of IPA based on chest CT-outcome, serum GM index values and failure of antibiotic therapy.Using the galactomannan antigen assay in the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis after hematopoietic stem cell transplantation.Invasive aspergillosis (IA) is the most common life-threatening infections after hematopoietic stem cell transplant (HSCT). The serum galactomannan (GM) is recognized as an indirect mycological criteria for an early diagnosis of IA. Starting January 2011, we implementing in Fundeni Clinical Institute, Bucharest, for the first time in Romania, the detection of GM antigen (Platelia Aspergillus EIA, Bio-Rad). In 2011, patients undergoing HSCT were screened with the galactomannan ELISA; we performed a retrospective chart review of 162 SCT patients who underwent galactomannan testing. Thirteen of the patients (8.02%) had at least one positive galactomannan ELISA, and four had multiple positive tests. When calculated in reference to a proved or probable diagnosis of aspergillosis, the galactomannan ELISA had a sensitivity of 0.857 and a specificity of 0.913. The positive predictive value was 0.46, and the negative predictive value was 0.993. The Platelia Aspergillus galactomannan antigenemia assay may assist physicians in making an early diagnosis of IA, in correlation with clinical and radiological criteria. The test has a high sensitivity and specificity and a very good negative predictive value. We found the screening of GM ELISA to be a highly specific diagnostic tool in detecting IA manifested in patients undergoing HSCT.[Serum antigens assay combined with chest CT scan in diagnosis of invasive pulmonary aspergillosis].To evaluate serum antigens assay combined with chest CT scan in the diagnosis of patients of invasive pulmonary aspergillosis (IPA) without neutropenia.One hundred and thirteen patients with suspected IPA admitted in Department of Respiratory Medicine, Infectious Diseased, Kidney Disease Centre and ICU were included in the study. Serum levels of 1-3-β-D-glucan (G) antigen and galactomannan antigen (GM) were assayed and chest CT scans were performed in all cases. Clinically invasive pulmonary aspergillosis was defined as proven, probable and possible. Treatment effectiveness was recorded.In this series 4 proven IPA, 36 probable IPA, 16 possible IPA, and 57 non-aspergillosis infection were diagnosed. GM test was more sensitive than G test. The specificity of two serum test was 84.2% and 87.7%, respectively. The sensitivity of chest CT was 30.0 %. The specificity of GM assay combined with chest CT was 100.0 %, while the sensitivity was 47.5%.The GM assay combined with chest CT may increase the specificity of diagnosis for IPA patients without neutropenia.Comparison of serum and bronchoalveolar lavage galactomannan in diagnosing invasive aspergillosis in solid-organ transplant recipients.This study sought to compare the sensitivities of serum galactomannan and bronchoalveolar lavage galactomannan in diagnosing invasive aspergillosis in solid-organ transplant recipients (lung and heart).This study took place in the lung transplant center of the National Research Institute for Tuberculosis and Lung Disease. All patients with clinical and radiologic manifestations suggestive of pulmonary infection were included. Serum and bronchoalveolar lavage galactomannan were measured.Seventeen patients were included (lung, 15; heart, 1; heart-lung, 1). Probable or definite invasive aspergillosis was diagnosed in 9 patients. With a cutoff ≥ 0.5, serum galactomannan sensitivity and specificity for diagnosing invasive aspergillosis were 77.18% and 100%. Negative predictive value and positive predictive value were 80% and 100%. The sensitivity and specificity of bronchoalveolar lavage galactomannan for diagnosing invasive aspergillosis with cutoff of ≥ 0.5 was 100%.Regarding the high levels of mortality and problems in diagnosing this disease, using bronchoalveolar lavage galactomannan could be a suitable option.Diagnostic potential of nested PCR, galactomannan EIA, and beta-D-glucan for invasive aspergillosis in pediatric patients.Limited specific data and investigations are available for invasive aspergillosis (IA) in pediatric patients. We evaluated the diagnostic potential of three noninvasive tests including the Platelia Aspergillus EIA kit for using galactomannan antigen, (1,3)-β-D-glucan Detection Reagent Kit, and nested-PCR for Aspergillus DNA in sera. We evaluated the diagnostic potential of three noninvasive tests including EIA for galactomannan antigen (Platelia Aspergillus), nested PCR assay for Aspergillus DNA and test for (1→3)-β-D-glucan (Glucatell assay Kit).All pediatric patients treated at the hematology/oncology unit who were at increased risk of developing invasive aspergillosis were enrolled. Clinical samples were examined for Aspergillus infections by mycological methods. Serial blood samples were collected twice weekly and evaluated by noninvasive tests.We analyzed 230 consecutive blood samples from 62 pediatric patients. The incidence rate of invasive aspergillosis in the patients was found to be 27.4%, and the etiologic agents were Aspergillus flavus, Aspergillus fumigatus, and Aspergillus spp. The sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, and likelihood ratios for positive and negative results of galactomannan in patients with proven and probable IA were 90%, 92%, 81.8%, 96%, 11.25, and 0.1; for beta-D-glucan they were 50%, 46%, 26%, 70.6%, 0.9, 0.9; and for nested-PCR they were 80%, 96.2%, 88.9%, 92.6%, 21, and 0.2, respectively.The conventional methods are not able to detect IA, due to the lack of valid and proper sampling. Galactomannan and nested-PCR tests in serum, with enough accuracy and reliability, can serve as noninvasive methods for the detection of IA in pediatric patients. However, the beta-D-glucan test cannot serve as an efficient diagnostic tool in those with hematologic disorders. Diagnostic value of the serum galactomannan assay for invasive aspergillosis: it is less useful in non-haematological patients.The serum galactomannan assay (GMA) has been widely used for the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA). GMA is mainly used in patients with haematological malignancies or in those who have undergone haematopoietic stem cell transplantation (HSCT). However, there are few data from non-haematological patients. We evaluated whether GMA is useful for the diagnosis of IA in non-haematological patients.Patients who were subjected to serum GMA testing from January 2007 to December 2009 were evaluated retrospectively. Patients with haematological diseases or who underwent HSCT were excluded from our analysis. According to the criteria of the European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer/Mycoses Study Group revised in 2008, the patients were categorized as proven, probable, possible, or non-IA. Proven and probable cases were defined as IA in this study.Out of 778 patients, 13 (1.6%) had proven (n =9) or probable (n =4) IA. The sensitivity of the GMA was 23.1% (95% confidence interval (CI) 6.1-54.0%) and the specificity was 76.1% (95% CI 72.9-79.0%). The positive predictive value was 1.6% (95% CI 0.4-5.0%) and the negative predictive value was 98.3% (95% CI 96.8-99.1%). The likelihood ratios of a positive and negative test were 0.96 (95% CI 0.35-2.62) and 1.01 (95% CI 0.75-1.36), respectively.In this study, the sensitivity of the GMA for the diagnosis of IA was very low in non-haematological patients. Although the GMA test is considered useful for the diagnosis of IA in haematological patients, it had low diagnostic value for IA in non-haematological patients.Prospective evaluation of clinical and biological markers to predict the outcome of invasive pulmonary aspergillosis in hematological patients.Early evaluation of treatment efficacy in invasive aspergillosis (IA), a leading cause of morbidity and mortality in hematological patients, remains a challenge. We conducted a prospective study to evaluate the performance of different markers in predicting the outcome of patients with IA. Both clinical and biological criteria were assessed 7, 14, 21, and 45 days after inclusion in the study, and mortality was assessed at day 60. The association between baseline data and their evolution and the day 45 response to treatment was analyzed. A total of 57 patients (4 with proven, 44 with probable, and 9 with possible aspergillosis according to the revised EORTC/MSG [European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer/Invasive Fungal Infections Cooperative Group and National Institute of Allergy and Infectious Diseases Mycoses Study Group] definitions) were included. At day 45, 30 patients (53%) were determined to be responders, 25 (44%) were nonresponders, and 2 were not able to be evaluated. Twenty patients died within the 60 days of follow-up. We found that a poor day 45 outcome was associated with patients who had high baseline serum galactomannan (GM) antigen levels and those receiving steroids at the time of IA. A consistently negative serum GM index was associated with a good outcome, and the day 14 clinical evaluation was predictive of the day 45 outcome. No association was found between Aspergillus antibodies or DNA detection and patients' outcome. We conclude that the GM index value at diagnosis of IA, GM index kinetics, and clinical evaluation at day 14 are good markers for predicting the outcome of patients with IA and should be taken into account for adapting antifungal treatment.Prospective study in critically ill non-neutropenic patients: diagnostic potential of (1,3)-β-D-glucan assay and circulating galactomannan for the diagnosis of invasive fungal disease.Diagnosis of invasive fungal disease (IFD) in patients under intensive care is challenging. Circulating biomarkers, (1,3)-β-D-glucan (BG) and galactomannan (GM), were prospectively assessed in 98 critically ill patients at risk of IFD. There were 11 cases of invasive aspergillosis (IA; 4 proven and 7 probable), 9 cases of proven invasive candidiasis (IC), 1 case of mixed proven IC and probable IA, 1 case of proven zygomycosis, and 1 case of mixed mycelial proven IFD. In all IA cases there was no significant difference when the area under the receiver operating characteristic curve (AUC) of GM (0.873 [95%CI, 0.75-0.99]) and BG (0.856 [95% CI, 0.71-0.99]) were compared (p = 0.871). The AUC for BG in IC and for the rest of the IFD cases was 0.605 (95% CI, 0.39-0.82) and 0.768 (95% CI, 0.63-0.90) respectively. Positive BG (40%) predated blood culture (n = 3) and abdominal pus (n = 1) a mean of 3.25 days before Candida was grown. In patients with IFD caused by molds, BG appeared a mean of 5.65 days before culture results. For the diagnosis of patients at risk of IC, BG has shown a high NPV (94.5%), with positive results also predating blood cultures in 30% of patients. In conclusion, early BG results permit a timely initiation of antifungal therapy in patients at risk of IFD.Retrospective assessment of β-D-(1,3)-glucan for presumptive diagnosis of fungal infections.β-D-(1,3)-glucan (BG) is a component of the cell walls of many fungal organisms. Our aims were to investigate the feasibility of the BG assay and its contribution to early diagnosis of different types of invasive fungal infections (IFI) commonly diagnosed in a tertiary care centre. The BG serum levels of 28 patients diagnosed with six IFI [13 probable invasive aspergillosis (IA), 2 proven IA, 2 zygomycosis, 3 fusariosis, 3 cryptococcosis, 3 candidaemia and 2 pneumocystosis] were retrospectively evaluated. The kinetic variations in BG serum levels from the 15 patients diagnosed with IA were compared with those of the galactomannan antigen (GM). In 5/15 cases of IA, BG was positive earlier than GM (time lapse from 4 to 30 days), in 8/15 cases, BG was positive at the same time as GM and, in 2/15 cases, BG was positive after GM. For the five other fungal diseases, BG was highly positive at the period of diagnosis except for the two cases of zygomycosis and one of the three cases of fusariosis. This study, which reflects the common activity of a tertiary care centre, confirms that BG detection could be of interest for IFI screening in patients with haematological malignancies.[The significance of serum GM and BG antigens assay for invasive fungal infections in hematological malignancies patients].To evaluate the diagnostic value of serum galactomannan antigen (GM) and (1→3)-β-D-glucan antigen (BG) assay in invasive fungal infections (IFI) in the patients with hematologic malignancies and the role in monitoring therapeutic response.Fifty one patients with hematological malignancies met the criteria for inclusion: (1) body temperature above 38°C for 48 hours, (2) failure to respond to broad-spectrum antibiotic treatment, or (3) temperature rose again after the responded drop. Blood samples were collected twice at the first week, then once a week in at least four weeks. The double antibody sandwich enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) and colorimetric assay were used for detecting GM and BG. The positive GM test is defined as two consecutive tests at different time GM value > 0.5 or > 0.8 and the positive G test is defined as BG value > 80 pg/ml. The patients were assigned into four groups as proven, probable, possible, and non-fungal infection respectively, and 21 normal volunteers were as controls.Two hundred and forty serum samples were collected from 51 patients including 2 of proven IFI, 26 probable IFI, 17 possible IFI and 6 non-fungal infection. The true-positive group including the proven and probable groups, and true negative group was the non-fungal infection group. GM tests were positive in 21 of 28 cases in true positive group, and only one of 6 cases in non-fungal infection. The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value and negative predictive value were 75%, 83.3%, 95.5% and 41.7%, respectively. G tests were positive in all 28 cases of the true positive group, and 4 in 6 non-fungal infection cases. The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value and negative predictive value were 100%, 33.3%, 87.5% and 100%, respectively. G test is more sensitive than GM test (P = 0.015), but there was no significant difference in specificity of the two tests (P = 0.242). In 19 of 21 patients with GM test positive, anti-fungal treatment was effective, and GM value gradually decreased to negative, two invalid patients were persistent with GM test positive. After two weeks treatment, the average GM value was significantly lower in the effective group than in the ineffective group (P < 0.05). BG values in the responded patients showed a gradual decline similar to that of GM values, but not to negative. The changes of BG value in ineffective group varied with a trend upward. The changes in BG value had no relation with treatment effectiveness.Serum GM and BG antigens detection provides strong evidence for early diagnosis of IFI. Combination of GM and G tests can improve the diagnostic specificity and reduce the false positive GM test seems superior to G test for monitoring GM and BG values during treatment.[Early antigen diagnosis of invasive fungal infection in patients with hematological malignancies and patients receiving hematopoietic stem cell transplantation].This study was purposed to evaluate the sensitivity and specificity of G/(1, 3-β-D glucan)/GM (galactomannan) combined detection for early diagnosis of invasive fungal disease (IFD), determine the GM positive cut-off value, and investigate the change of diagnostic level before and after G/GM test and the relation of GM value with therapeutic effect. The ELISA with double antibody sandwich was used to detect the serum levels of G and G/M. The results showed that according to determined GM positive cut-off value, the sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive value of G/GM combined detection were 100%, 65.7%, 67.6% and 100%, respectively. The case number of the clinical diagnosis of IFD increased from 1 to 24 cases, the diagnosis of 12 non-infective patients was changed as suspected IFD with the help of G/GM combined detection; the GM cut-off value decreased in patients whose GM cut-off value was higher before therapy and antifungal therapy was effective, while the GM cut-off value increased in patients no-responded to therapy. It is concluded that G/GM combined detection can increased the sensitivity of the diagnosis and reduce false negative rate in the early diagnosis of IFD. The dynamically monitoring G/GM cut-off value can be used as evaluation indicator of therapeutic efficacy.Comparison of PCR-ELISA and Real-Time PCR for invasive aspergillosis diagnosis in patients with hematological malignancies.This study aimed at comparing a real-time PCR assay and a PCR-ELISA assay of both serum and bronchoalveolar lavage (BAL) samples for the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA) in patients with hematological malignancies. Using a nested case-control design, 163 patients at risk were prospectively monitored and PCR assays were performed on frozen aliquots of 459 sera which were prospectively sampled twice weekly and 42 BAL specimens sampled from 43 probable and one proven IA cases and 47 matched controls. The data from three patients classified as possible IA were excluded from the nested case-control study. The sensitivity of real-time PCR and PCR-ELISA assays in serum was 73% and 86%, respectively and specificity was 100% for both. In BAL, sensitivity was 64% for real-time PCR, 71% for PCR-ELISA and 86% for Galactomannan antigen (GMA) assays with specificities of 96%, 96%, and 93%, respectively. While slightly less sensitive, the real time-PCR assay was highly specific and considerably faster and more workable than PCR-ELISA. Combining real-time PCR and GMA detection for both serum and BAL samples enhances routine laboratory IA diagnosis.Positive results of serum galactomannan assays and pulmonary computed tomography predict the higher response rate of empirical antifungal therapy in patients undergoing allogeneic hematopoietic stem cell transplantation.Invasive fungal disease (IFD) is a leading cause of infection-related mortality among patients undergoing allogeneic hematopoietic stem cell transplantation (allo-HSCT). Although the mortality of IFD has been decreased with empirical antifungal therapy in this population, overtreatment remains a problem, for the persistent or recurrent fever is nonspecific for an IFD. Hence, we explored retrospectively the value of incorporating serum galactomannan (GM) test and pulmonary high-resolution computed tomography (HRCT) as predictors for higher response rate of empirical treatment. In our study, all of 124 patients after allo-HSCT received empirical antifungal therapy when the persistent or recurrent fever developed after receiving broad-spectrum antibiotics. Meanwhile, the levels of serum GM were monitored twice weekly and pulmonary HRCT was performed serially. It showed that the response rate of empirical antifungal therapy was higher in patients with positive results of serum GM tests and/or chest CT scan than that in all patients (66.1% versus 44.6%, P = .008). Moreover, only 10 of 55 patients with both negative GM tests and pulmonary HRCT responded to empirical treatment, and 7 of these 10 patients did not take antifungal agents for prophylaxis. It suggested that these 2 diagnostic tools could not predict patients without adequate Candida prophylaxis well. Thus, we concluded that serum GM assays and pulmonary CT scan could find out patients who really need empirical antifungal therapy, which resulted in improving the efficiency of the treatment.The accuracy of serum galactomannan assay in diagnosing invasive pulmonary aspergillosis.Galactomannan (GM) antigen is an aspergillus specific antigen that is released during the growth phase of invasive aspergillosis. We aimed to find the optimum cutoff and accuracy of serum Galactomannan assay in immunocompromised patients. Immunocompromised patients diagnosed with invasive pulmonary aspergillosis (IPA) based on the European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer/Invasive Mycosis Study Group (EORTC/MSG) with three levels of certainty proven, probable and possible, referred for GM antigen measurement at Immunology, Asthma and Allergy Research Institute (IAARI) from 2006 to 2009 and if they met the criteria were enrolled in this study. Totally 49 patients with IPA were enrolled in our study. According to EORTC/MSG, patients categorized into three levels of certainty: They were diagnosed as 'proven' invasive pulmonary aspergillosis 16(32.7%), 'probable' 18(36.7%) and 'possible' 15(30.6%). The most common host risk factor was solid tumors 17(34.7%). The accuracy of Galactomannan assay increased from 0.5 to 2 cutoffs. The optimum sensitivity and specificity obtained at the index cutoff of ≥1.5 for diagnosis of "proven" IPA; which were respectively, 69.2% and 72.2%. Other cutoffs had high variance between sensitivity and specificity for diagnosis of IPA. The calculated cutoff gained by receiver operating characteristic (ROC) analysis for detecting proven IPA was 1.5. Intermediate accuracy of serum GM test in conjunct with clinical findings would help early IPA detection among immunocompromised patients.Value of consecutive galactomannan determinations for the diagnosis and prognosis of invasive pulmonary aspergillosis in critically ill chronic obstructive pulmonary disease.Critically ill chronic obstructive pulmonary disease (COPD) patients who are admitted to intensive care units (ICU) are at particular risk for invasive pulmonary aspergillosis (IPA). The objective of this investigation was to assess the value of consecutive galactomannan (GM) tests in determining the diagnosis and prognosis of IPA in this patient population. We studied 90 critically ill COPD patients admitted to our ICU between February 2007 and November 2009. Two consecutive serum GM tests were done on the first and fourth days of their ICU admissions. Patients were classified as proven IPA (n = 1), probable IPA (n = 18), or non-IPA (n = 71). The sensitivities, specificities, and positive and negative predictive values of GM test results for (i) the first test, (ii) the second test, (iii) at least one positive of two consecutive tests and (iv) two positive consecutive GM tests were, respectively, 57.9%/64.7%/70.6%/47.1%; 87.3%/84.6%/80.8%/94.2%; 55.0%/57.9%/54.5%/72.7%; and 88.6%/88.0%/89.4%/84.5%. The mortality values of IPA patients with (i) a positive first GM test, (ii) at least one of two tests positive, and (iii) both tests positive were (a) 81.8% (9/11), (b) 83.3% (10/12), and (c) 72.7% (8/11), respectively. These results indicate that at least one positive result of two consecutive GM tests appears to be useful in the diagnosis of IPA in critically ill COPD patients in an ICU. In addition, positive serum GM results combined with the isolation of Aspergillus from respiratory samples may be a potential marker of high mortality.A prospective comparison of galactomannan in bronchoalveolar lavage fluid for the diagnosis of pulmonary invasive aspergillosis in medical patients under intensive care: comparison with the diagnostic performance of galactomannan and of (1→ 3)-β-d-glucan chromogenic assay in serum samples.Diagnosis of fungal pneumonia (FP) in critically ill patients is challenging. Circulating biomarkers for the diagnosis of FP have limitations and the combination of different assays in serum samples and directly from the target organ may further improve the diagnosis of FP. We prospectively assessed the diagnostic utility of paired galactomannan (GM) in bronchoalveolar lavage fluid (BAL) and serum GM and (1→3)-β-D-glucan (BG) assays in critically ill patients at risk of FP. Patients with FP were classified according to European Organisation for Research and Treatment of Cancer-Mycoses Study Group criteria, with modifications. Out of 847 admissions, 51 patients were eligible. There were nine invasive aspergillosis (IA) cases (four proven, five probable), three proven Pneumocysitis jirovecii pneumonia (PJP) cases and one mixed FP case (probable IA and proven PJP). The diagnostic accuracy as given by the area under the receiver operating characteristic curve in IA cases (proven and probable) for GM in BAL was 0.98 (95% CI, 0.94-1.00), whilst for GM and BG in serum it was 0.85 (95% CI, 0.74-0.96) and 0.815 (95% CI, 0.66-0.96), respectively. For IA cases (proven and probable) AUC for GM in BAL was significantly higher than GM and BG in serum (p 0.025 and p 0.032, respectively). In one of four proven and one of six probable IA cases, GM in serum remained negative, whereas GM in BAL was positive. In patients with IA, GM (90%) and BG (80%) appeared a mean of 4.3 days (range, 1-10 days) before Aspergillus was cultured. GM detection in BAL appears to improve the diagnosis of IA in critical patients.Early Diagnosis of Invasive Aspergillosis in Neutropenic Patients. Comparison between Serum Galactomannan and Polymerase Chain Reaction.Invasive aspergillosis (IA) is a major cause of morbidity and mortality in profoundly neutropenic patients, so early diagnosis is mandatory.Consecutive patients with hematological malignancies undergoing intensive chemotherapy were screened for IA with two different methods which were compared.From October 2000 to August 2003 we tested 1311 serum samples from 172 consecutive patients with a polymerase chain reaction assay and between April 2005 and April 2008 we tested 806 serum samples from 169 consecutive patients with a Galactomannan (GM) test. Bronchoalveolar (BAL) samples were obtained whenever the patient's condition allowed and tested with either method.The serum PCR assay had a sensitivity of 75.0% and a specificity of 91.9% and the serum GM assay had a sensitivity of 87.5% and a specificity of 93.1%, (P > 0.05). The presence of two or more consecutive positive serum samples was predictive of IA for both assays. BAL GM/PCR was positive in some patients without serum positivity and in patients with 2 or more positive serum GM/PCR.No significant differences between the 2 serum tests were found. The GM assay has the advantage of being standardized among several laboratories and is incorporated in the criteria established by the European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer/Invasive Fungal Infections Cooperative Group and the National Institute of Allergy and Infectious Diseases Mycosis Study Group (EORTC/MSG), however is much more expensive. BAL GM and PCR sampling aids in IA diagnosis but needs further validation studies to differentiate between colonization and true infection in cases where serum GM or PCR are negative.[Combination of real-time polymerase chain reaction assay and serum galactomannan in the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis in patients with hematological malignancies and recipients of hematopoietic stem cell transplantation].To evaluate the role of real-time polymerase chain reaction (real-time PCR) assay combined with serum galactomannan (GM) detection in the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA) with hematological malignancies or hematopoietic stem cell transplantation.Eighty patients were enrolled. PCR and GM were performed simultaneously on 205 serum samples. The agreement between these two assays and the diagnostic value of the combination were analyzed.There were 5 proven IA, 20 probable IA, 34 possible IA and 21 non-IA. Agreement between real-time PCR and GM was 77.5%. When both positive, the positive predictive value could reach 100%; when both negative, the negative predictive value could reach 90.9%.PCR agrees well with GM. When these two assays are combined, invasive aspergillosis can be diagnosed more accurately.[Utility of galactomannan enzyme immunoassay and (1,3)beta-D-glucan assay in invasive fungal infection].To evaluate the performance of the galactomannan enzyme immunoassay (GM test) and (1,3)beta-D-glucan assay (G test) for the diagnosis of invasive fungal infection (IFI).A retrospective study was performed in 115 hospitalized patients at Peking University First Hospital who were at risk of IFI. Patients were diagnosed as IFI according to revised definitions of invasive fungal disease from the European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer/Invasive Fungal Infections Cooperative Group and the National Institute of Allergy and Infectious Diseases Mycoses Study Group (EORTC/MSG) Consensus Group. The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value (PPV), and negative predictive value (NPV) were calculated at different cutoff values for two assays respectively. Two tests were combined to evaluate the changes of sensitivity, specificity, PPV and NPV.The best sensitivity (54.5%, 63.6%) and specificity (77.9%, 69.2%) were obtained with the cutoff values of 0.5 and 20 x 10(3) pg/L in GM test and G test respectively. The PPV were 20.7% and 17.9%, and the NPV were 94.2% and 94.7% respectively. The sensitivity increased to 90.9% and the specificity was 52.9% after a combined utility of two tests.The GM test and G tests are both useful in diagnosis of IFI with the cutoff values of 0.5 and 20 x 10(3) pg/L. A better sensitivity is acquired if there is a combined utility of two tests.Performance of the galactomannan antigen detection test in the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis in children with cancer or undergoing haemopoietic stem cell transplantation.Serum galactomannan (GM) antigen detection is not recommended for defining invasive aspergillosis (IA) in children undergoing aggressive chemotherapy or allogeneic haemopoietic stem cell transplantation (HSCT). The ability of the GM test to identify IA in children was retrospectively evaluated in a cohort of children. Test performance was evaluated on samples that were collected during 195 periods at risk of IA. Proven IA was diagnosed in seven periods, all with positive GM test results (true positives, 4%), and possible IA was diagnosed in 15 periods, all with negative GM test results (false negatives, 8%). The test result was positive with negative microbiological, histological and clinical features in three periods (false positives, 1%), and in 170 periods it was negative with negative microbiological, histological and clinical features (true negatives, 87%). The sensitivity was 0.32 and the specificity was 0.98; the positive predictive value was 0.70 and the negative predictive value was 0.92. The efficiency of the test was 0.91, the positive likelihood ratio was 18.3, and the negative likelihood ratio was 1.4. The probability of missing an IA because of a negative test result was 0.03. Test performance proved to be better during at-risk periods following chemotherapy than in periods following allogeneic HSCT. The GM assay is useful for identifying periods of IA in children undergoing aggressive chemotherapy or allogeneic HSCT.Galactomannan on the stage: prospective evaluation of the applicability in routine practice and surveillance.Invasive aspergillosis (IA) presents a diagnostic and therapeutic dilemma for the physicians who take care of the patients with severe underlying diseases and immunosuppression. This study aimed to evaluate the usefulness of serum galactomannan (GM) measurements in the routine practice and surveillance of IA along with possible caveats in diagnosis and treatment. Adult patients with high-risk haematological malignancies admitted to the Internal Medicine wards during the 2-year study period were followed up by daily visits for vital signs, existing or newly developing signs and symptoms, clinical and laboratory findings. Blood samples were analysed for GM levels by the ELISA method at the end of the study period. Data of 58 hospitalisation episodes in 45 patients were analysed. Proven IA was diagnosed in one patient, probable IA was diagnosed in four patients. The sensitivity was 60% and the specificity was 21% when the index cut-off for positivity was accepted as 0.5. The yield of GM testing may be influenced by many variables and each centre should evaluate the usefulness of this test in its own conditions.Detection of sputum Aspergillus galactomannan for diagnosis of invasive pulmonary aspergillosis in haematological patients.We investigated the diagnostic utility of Aspergillus galactomannan (GM) in sputum for diagnosis of invasive pulmonary aspergillosis (IPA) in haematologic patients and compared the results with those of bronchial lavage fluid (BLF) and serum. Patients were classified into 4 groups using modified European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer criteria: group A, proven IPA; group B, probable IPA; group C, possible IPA; group D, others. Groups A and B were considered the IPA group (n = 6); group D was considered non-IPA group (n = 37); group C (n = 13) was equivocal for IPA. As a true negative control, sputa from patients with community-acquired pneumonia (CAP) without risk factors (group E, n = 22) were used. From the receiver-operating characteristic curves, the cut-off levels were determined as 1.2 in sputum, 0.5-1.3 in BLF and 0.5 in serum. The sensitivity and specificity of sputum, BLF and serum GM were 100 and 62.2%, 66.7 and 100%, and 83.3 and 81.1%, respectively. Twenty-two patients with CAP (group E) showed median GM levels in the sputa of 0.1 (range 0.0-1.0). Sputum GM is a useful non-invasive test for screening of IPA in haematological patients, and may also be useful for assessment of the risk of developing IPA.Contribution of galactomannan antigen detection in BAL to the diagnosis of invasive pulmonary aspergillosis in patients with hematologic malignancies.Invasive pulmonary aspergillosis (IPA) is difficult to diagnose. The detection of galactomannan (GM) in serum samples is useful for diagnosing IPA. A positive test for GM antigen in BAL has also been proposed as a criterion of IPA, although it has not been fully validated. The aim of our study was to evaluate the contribution of GM antigen detection in BAL to the diagnosis of IPA in hematologic patients.One hundred one consecutive patients treated for hematologic malignancy were explored by bronchoscopy and BAL for new pulmonary infiltrates. Both BAL fluid and serum samples were evaluated for GM using an enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay test, with an optical density index >or= 0.5 considered positive. Respiratory samples were also examined for the presence of fungi.IPA was diagnosed in 33 patients according to European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer and Mycoses Study Group consensus group criteria (six proven, 23 probable, four possible). Nineteen of these 33 patients had a positive BAL GM test, whereas three patients without IPA had false-positive results. GM detection in BAL had a sensitivity of 57.6% (95% CI, 40.8%-72.8%) and a specificity of 95.6% (95% CI, 87.8%-98.5%). Among the 19 patients with IPA whose BAL was positive for GM, 15 also had a positive serum GM test. In 11 of these 19 patients, Aspergillus was identified in the respiratory samples.Detection of GM in BAL is complementary of serum GM testing and mycologic evaluation of the respiratory samples for the diagnosis of IPA. Positive GM BAL was the sole microbiologic criterion in two of 33 patients studied.Comparison of Aspergillus galactomannan antigen testing with a new cut-off index and Aspergillus precipitating antibody testing for the diagnosis of chronic pulmonary aspergillosis.The usefulness of two tests in the serodiagnosis of chronic pulmonary aspergillosis (CPA) was compared. The tests were the serum Aspergillus galactomannan antigen test (Platelia (R) Aspergillus) by enzyme-linked immunoassay (EIA) using old and new cut-off indexes, and the Aspergillus precipitating antibody test.Both Aspergillus-precipitating antibody and Platelia Aspergillus EIA positivity were measured in the sera of 28 patients at the time of diagnosis of CPA.Serum Aspergillus precipitating antibody positivity was 89.3% (25/28) in CPA patients. Serum Platelia Aspergillus EIA positivity was 21.4% (6/28) using the old cut-off index (> or =1.5) and 50% (14/28) using the new cut-off index (> or =0.5)-still less than that for Aspergillus precipitating antibody. Three of the 28 CPA patients had positive reactions in the Platelia Aspergillus EIA using the old cut-off index but not in the Aspergillus precipitating antibody test. Positivity for (1,3) beta-d glucan was 15.4%, and that for culture on CHROMagar Candida was 17.9%. One patient with pulmonary actinomycosis had a false-positive reaction in the Platelia Aspergillus test with the new cut-off index.For the diagnosis of CPA, Aspergillus precipitating antibody testing is more sensitive than the Platelia Aspergillus EIA, even with the new cut-off index. False-positive reactions are observed with the Platelia Aspergillus EIA in patients with conditions such as pulmonary actinomycosis. Results should be interpreted with care when patients are positive for the Platelia Aspergillus EIA but negative for Aspergillus precipitating antibody.Invasive Aspergillus infections in allo-SCT recipients: environmental sampling, nasal and oral colonization and galactomannan testing.A study was performed to investigate the air quality of a haematopoietic SCT ward, colonization of the upper airways with Aspergillus spp. and the role of galactomannan (GM) ELISA testing in serum in the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA). In 102 allo-SCT recipients, two cases of IA (one proven and one probable) were seen. Of 2071 serum samples, 12 were positive, two in a patient with proven IA and 10 in patients without IA. Of the 2059 negative samples, 22 were taken from the patient with probable IA. Of the 245 environmental samples, 20 (8.2%) were positive for filamentous fungi. Aspergillus fumigatus was seen in 14 samples. A total of 657 oral and nasal swabs were taken. Seven nasal samples and one oral sample were positive for Aspergillus species (A. fumigatus 4, A. niger 4) in four patients, one of whom had probable IA. In summary, most environmental samples were negative, colonization of the oral and nasal cavities was rare and IA was diagnosed in only 2% of patients. The GM ELISA test remained negative in one of two patients with IA and does not seem useful in a population of patients with a low incidence of IA.[The role of galactomannan detection in the diagnosis of invasive pulmonary aspergillosis in critically ill patients].To evaluate the usefulness of serum galactomannan (GM) for the diagnosis of invasive pulmonary aspergillosis (IPA) in critically ill patients.Study was conducted between February 2007 and July 2008. Included patients on admission ICU who suffer from suspected IPA. GM test and culture were collected 2 weekly. Clinical feature, mycological evidence and optical density index (ODI) were noted. Clinically invasive fungal infection (IFI) were defined proven, probable and possible. The patients were classified into neutropenia, non-neutropenia and treated with immunosuppressive agents, non-neutropenia and non-immunosuppressive agents. To compared of the sensitivity and specificity of GM in different patients.94 patients were included, 4 patients were proven, 29 patients were probable, 34 patients were possible IFI, 27 patients were non-IPA. The positive rate of the GM was 31.9% (30/94). The sensitivity and specificity of GM in proven cases and probable cases are 66.7% and 92.6%. GM assay tended to become positive earlier than the culture 2 - 10 (5.33 +/- 2.17) d. We found that differences in patient diagnosis and selection might account for the disparities seen for positive rate for the GM test. There was positive in three of the four patients with proven, the positive rate of GM was 65.5% for probable cases, for possible cases was 17.6%, for non-IPA cases was 7.4% (P = 0.001). For patient with neutropenia, treated with immunosuppressive agents and without immunosuppressive agents, the positive rate of GM was 52.9% vs 41.7% vs 34.6% (P = 0.015); the sensitivity was 80.0% vs 70.0% vs 53.8% (P = 0.011), the ODI was 1.365 (0.582 - 6.736) vs 1.123 (0.623 - 6.868) vs 0.554 (0.522 - 0.823), P = 0.005, respectively.These results show that GM test is useful for early diagnosis IPA in critically ill patients. Differences in patient selection and diagnosis might account for the disparities seen for positive rate and sensitivity for the GM test. It has been higher sensitivity and ODI in the patient treated by immunosuppressive agents.[Value of serum galactomannan assay in the diagnosis of pediatric invasive pulmonary aspergillosis].Galactomannan (GM) is a major aspergilli cell-wall constituent released into circulation during the early stage of invasive disease, and can be detected. Many studies suggest that serum galactomannan assay has an excellent sensitivity and specificity for the early diagnosis of adult invasive aspergillosis (IA). However, there have been few studies on serum galactomannan assay in pediatric patients. Therefore, we evaluate the value of serum galactomannan assay in the diagnosis of pediatric invasive pulmonary aspergillosis in this study.Blood samples were obtained from 88 children, of whom 14 had definitive or possible invasive pulmonary aspergillosis (IPA), 16 had other invasive pulmonary fungal infection and 58 had pulmonary non-fungal infection. Of the 58 patients, 23 had bacterial pneumonia, 20 had mycoplasma pneumonia and 15 had pulmonary tuberculosis. A double-direct sandwich ELISA was employed to detect GM optical density index (ODI) in the serum sample. GM ODI were observed before and after treatment in six children with IPA. Measurement data followed the Gaussian distribution were expressed as x(-) +/- s; differences among groups were tested using a single factor analysis of variance. If the s>1/3 x(-), measurement data were expressed as M [minimum, maximum], and the differences among groups were tested by a rank sum test. P < 0.05 was considered to be statistically significant.The serum GM ODI in IPA group [1.03 (0.16 - 3.73)] was significantly higher than that in the other invasive pulmonary fungal infection group [0.30 (0.04 - 1.28)] and pulmonary non-fungal infection group [0.24 (0.08 - 0.69)] (P < 0.05). If the cut-off GM ODI was set at 0.5, the sensitivity and specificity of the assay for IPA were 71.4% and 91.9% respectively. The accuracy rate for IPA was 88.6%. If the cut-off GM ODI was set at 0.8, the sensitivity, specificity and accuracy rate for IPA were 64.2%, 98.6% and 93.2% respectively. Of 6 children whose GM were observed serially, GM ODI declined consistently with the clinical remission in 3 children. GM ODI raised in 2 children corresponding to clinical exacerbation. Whereas GM ODI elevated paradoxically regardless of clinical remission in the remaining one patient.Serum GM detection was an effective method for the diagnosis of pediatric IPA.[A preliminary investigation on early diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis in patients with blood diseases by using circulating galactomannan test].The objective of this study was to explore the useful value of circulating galactomannan (GM) for early diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis. All 141 patients were classified as 103 patients of clinical and possible diagnosis, and 38 non-Aspergillus patients. 209 serum samples for the detection of GM by Platelia Aspergillus were collected before anti-fungal vaccine therapy. ELISA method was used in detection of GM. The results showed that (1) the sensitivity of 87.5%, specificity of 81.6%, positive prediction of 66.7% and negative prediction of 93.9% were determined by using cut-off value. According to the result of ELISA, the clinical diagnosed patients was up to 48, while the possible diagnosed patients were 55. (2) Among 62 patients with consecutive examinations of serum samples, 50 patients were successfully diagnosed and treated, while 12 patients died. A progressive reduction of GM level was found in survivors, however, the patients of poor prognosis showed higher antigen titres. It is concluded that GM test has more significance for earlier diagnosis of aspergillosis, the concentration of GM is related to prognosis of disease.The role of bronchoalveolar lavage galactomannan in the diagnosis of pediatric invasive aspergillosis.: Molecular biomarkers such as the galactomannan assay are of increasing interest in clinical settings for diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA). The use of bronchoalveolar lavage galactomannan (BAL GM) is being validated in adult populations, but has not been systematically evaluated in pediatric patients.: A retrospective analysis was performed of patients for whom GM assays from BAL were submitted between November 1, 2006 and November14, 2007 at Childrens Hospital Los Angeles. Medical charts were reviewed and patients were categorized as having no, possible, probable, and proven IA, per established definitions.: Of 85 pediatric patients who had a BAL GM submitted during the study, 59 were immunocompromised. Three patients were identified as having proven IA, 6 had probable IA, 37 had possible IA, and 39 had no evidence of IA; 38 had a concurrent serum GM performed. A positive, linear correlation was established between BAL and serum GM, using OD index values (rho = 0.48, P = 0.002). Among immunocompromised patients, receiver operating characteristic curves demonstrated an optimal BAL GM OD cut-off value of 0.87, that yielded a sensitivity for probable/proven IA of 78% and a specificity of 100%. At 0.87, the positive and negative predictive values among immunocompromised patients were 58% and 96%, respectively.: We found a correlation between BAL GM values and a diagnosis of IA. We also noted a linear relationship between serum and BAL GM values. Receiver operating characteristic curves obtained from our pediatric data validate the current cut off for serum and suggest a possible cut off for BAL specimens.[Evaluation of galactomannan antigen and beta-D-glucan value for diagnosis of chronic necrotizing pulmomary aspergillosis].In order to establish the reliable cut-off value of galactomannan (GM) antigen as well as that for beta-D-glucan for CNPA diagnosis, we conducted the following study. From 2001 to 2008, in a total of 1511 patients we measured GM and anti-aspergillus antibody simultaneously. These patients had chronic pulmonary disease including old tuberculosis, nontuberculous mycobacteriosis, COPD, and had bullous lung, interstitial lung disease or were suspected to have suspected to have interstitial lung disease. We designated cases as probable CNPA when the sample represented a positive anti-aspergillus antibody. We then analyzed the sensitivity and specificity according to various GM antigen values. When using the GM antigen cut-off value at 0.5, the sensitivity and specificity for CNPA were 63.4% and 68.6% respectively. Using 1.0 for cut-off value resulted in the better specificity for CNPA diagnosis. Similar analysis was performed on beta-D-glucan for CNPA diagnosis. When using D-glucan cut-off value as 20 pg/ml, the sensitivity and specificity for CNPA. These results indicate that the cut-off value of serological examination for infectious disease should be considered by the type of disease.Value of a single galactomannan determination (Platelia) for the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis in non-hematological patients with clinical isolation of Aspergillus spp.We studied 75 patients with non-hematological conditions from whom Aspergillus spp. were recovered from clinical specimens during the period March 2003 to August 2006. The patients were classified according to EORTC criteria and the presence of galactomannan (Platelia Aspergillus) in their sera was evaluated. Ten of these patients (13.3%) had proven or probable invasive aspergillosis, i.e., chronic obstructive pulmonary disease in five (50%), HIV infection in one (10%), lymphoma in one (10%), liver transplant in one (10%), solid malignancies in one (10%), and corticosteroid treatment in one (10%). The sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values for the detection of galactomannan, using cut-offs of > or =0.5 ng/ml and > or =1 ng/ml were 60%/50%, 89.23%/100%, 46.15%/100%, and 93.55%/92.86% (p=0.001 and p<0.001), respectively. The determination of galactomannan in the sera of non-neutropenic patients could prove to be a useful microbiological finding when diagnosing invasive aspergillosis.Limited utility of serum galactomannan assay after auto-SCT.Value of serial quantification of fungal DNA by a real-time PCR-based technique for early diagnosis of invasive Aspergillosis in patients with febrile neutropenia.A study was designed to assess the reliability of the serial detection of Aspergillus sp. DNA to diagnose invasive aspergillosis (IA) in patients with febrile neutropenia. Two blood and two serum samples were taken weekly from 83 patients. A total of 2,244 samples were analyzed by real-time quantitative PCR. Twelve (14.4%) patients were diagnosed with IA. Taking two consecutive positive results as the diagnostic criterion, PCR detected 11 cases, with 4 false positives, giving sensitivity, specificity, positive, and negative predictive values of 91.6%, 94.4%, 73.3%, and 98.5%, respectively. On analyzing in conjunction with high-resolution chest tomography (HRCT) and galactomannan (GM) testing, the combination of serial PCR and GM detected 100% of aspergillosis cases, with a positive predictive value of 75.1%. This diagnostic strategy presented, according to CART analysis, a receiver-operator curve with an area under the curve of 0.97 (95% confidence interval, 0.895 to 1.032; P < 0.01), with a relative risk of IA 6.92 times higher than the control population and with predictive success of 95.2%. As regards early diagnosis, the serial detection of Aspergillus DNA took on average 21 days less than HRCT and 68 days less than GM. The serial detection of Aspergillus DNA using real-time quantitative PCR has great diagnostic applicability, which increases when combined with GM quantification.Utility of galactomannan enzyme immunoassay and (1,3) beta-D-glucan in diagnosis of invasive fungal infections: low sensitivity for Aspergillus fumigatus infection in hematologic malignancy patients.Previous studies have reported that galactomannan (GM) enzyme immunoassay and 1,3 beta-glucan (BG) assay may be useful diagnostic tools, but their sensitivities are variable. We compared the performances of both tests. Between October 2002 and May 2005, 82 patients were prospectively monitored for 12 weeks. A total of 414 samples were tested by GM assay and 409 samples were tested by BG assay for the following four groups of patients: those with invasive aspergillosis (IA), those with other mold infections (Fusarium, scedosporium, zygomycosis, etc.), those with candidemia, and control patients. Blood samples were obtained twice on week 1 and once every other week for a total of 12 weeks. Patients in the invasive fungal infection groups had comparable risk factors. The sensitivity of the GM test was significantly higher for patients with IA due to non-fumigatus Aspergillus species than for patients with IA due to Aspergillus fumigatus (49% versus 13%; P < 0.0001) or with other mold infections (49% versus 6%; P < 0.0001). However, the sensitivity range (47% to 64%) and specificity (88%) of the BG assay were comparable among all patients tested, regardless of the infecting pathogen. The performance of GM-based diagnosis appears to be better for detecting non-fumigatus Aspergillus species. The diagnostic marker BG was shown to have a higher sensitivity than that of GM in detecting IA and other mold infections in hematologic malignancy patients.Detection of circulating Aspergillus fumigatus DNA by real-time PCR assay of large serum volumes improves early diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis in high-risk adult patients under hematologic surveillance.Detection of galactomannan antigen (GMA) in serum is the standard assay for the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA) in high-risk patients with hematological disorders. Detection of Aspergillus DNA in serum has been proposed, but its sensitivity is lower than that of GMA when small serum volumes (SSV) are used. In this study, we investigated whether extraction of DNA from large serum volumes (LSV) improves diagnostic yield. In a 13-month prospective study, we compared the performances of twice-weekly screening of serum for GMA by an enzyme immunoassay and weekly screening for Aspergillus fumigatus DNA by a real-time PCR (RT-PCR) assay of 1.0 ml (LSV) or 100 mul (SSV) of serum. We included 124 patients (138 treatment episodes), with 17 episodes of EORTC (European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer)/MSG (Mycoses Study Group)-documented IA. In all, 1,870 samples were screened for GMA. The sensitivity (Se), specificity (Sp), and positive and negative predictive values (PPV and NPV, respectively) of GMA for IA were 88.2%, 95.8%, 75%, and 98.3%, respectively. We screened 938 samples for Aspergillus DNA by using LSV; 404 of these samples were also tested with SSV. The Se, Sp, PPV, and NPV of RT-PCR were 100%, 96.7%, 81%, and 100%, respectively, with LSV and 76.5%, 96.7%, 81.3%, and 95.6%, respectively, with SSV. DNA detection gave a positive result when performed on LSV in two cases of IA where the GMA assay result remained negative. Furthermore, in four IA cases, DNA was detected earlier than GMA. The use of LSV for extraction improved the performance of the RT-PCR, which appears highly sensitive and specific for the early diagnosis of IA in high-risk patients with hematological disorders.Galactomannan antigenemia in pediatric oncology patients with invasive aspergillosis.Diagnosing invasive aspergillosis is difficult but might be improved by detection of circulating galactomannan. Although galactomannan antigenemia has been well studied in the detection of invasive aspergillosis in adult patients, little is known about the expression of circulating galactomannan in immunocompromised children with invasive aspergillosis.We studied the expression of galactomannan antigen by enzyme immunoassay (EIA) in 990 serum samples from 56 pediatric oncology patients (ages 3 months to 18 years) of whom 17 had proven or probable invasive aspergillosis defined by the European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer-Mycoses Study Group criteria. Any sample with a galactomannan EIA Galactomannan index value of > or = 0.5 was considered positive.At least 1 serum sample was positive for 11 of 17 pediatric oncology patients (65.7% sensitivity, 95% confidence interval: 38.3-85.7) with invasive aspergillosis. Galactomannan EIA was positive in 99 of 304 samples from patients with proven or probable invasive aspergillosis, and 7 of 686 (1.0%) samples from 39 control subjects resulted in a positive galactomannan EIA result. At least 1 sample tested positive in 5 of the 39 controls (12.8%, 95% confidence interval: 4.3-27.4). No significant association between accuracy and patient age was observed. Among the 7 evaluable galactomannan-positive patients with IA, the galactomannan EIA produced a positive result before clinical or radiographic evidence of infection in 6 cases, with a lead-time to diagnosis ranging from 1 day to 34 days (median: 10 days). In the remaining case, a positive galactomannan was observed on the same day as diagnosis by non-EIA methods.The presence of circulating galactomannan is predictive of invasive aspergillosis in most pediatric oncology patients. Galactomannan antigenemia may precede clinical, microbiologic, or radiographic evidence of invasive aspergillosis.[The use of galactomannan detection in diagnosing invasive aspergillosis in hemato-oncological patients].PREMISES AND OBJECTIVES: Timely diagnosis is of critical importance for the prognosis of invasive aspergilosis (IA) patients. Over recent years, IA detection of galactomannan using the ELISA method has assumed growing importance. The objective of the study was to analyse the usability of the method in current clinical practice of a hemato-oncological ward.From May 2003 to October 2006, blood samples were taken from patients at IA risk to detect galactomannan (GM) in serum using the ELISA method. The patients who underwent the tests were classified by the probability of IA presence on the basis of the results of conventional diagnostic methods and section findings.A total of 11,360 serum samples from 911 adult patients were tested for GM presence. IA (probable/proven) was diagnosed in 42 (4.6%) of them. The rates of sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive value of galactomannan detection for IA diagnosis in our ward were, respectively, 95.2%, 90.0%, 31.5% and 99.7%. The principal causes of the limited positive predictive value of the test were the high percentage of false-positive test results (mainly caused by concomitant administration of some penicillin antibiotics or Plasma-Lyte infusion solution), as well as the fact that a large percentage of patients we examined fell within the group of patients with hematological malignity with a very low prevalence of IA.GM detection in serum is associated with high sensitivity and excellent negative predictive value in IA diagnosis in hemato-oncological patients. Knowledge and elimination of possible causes of false-positive results as well as focusing the screening on patients at greatest risk of infection are necessary for an even better exploitation of the test.Assessment of the lightcycler PCR assay for diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis in paediatric patients with onco-haematological diseases.A reliable diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA) is hampered by the difficulty in obtaining suitable tissue samples. To evaluate the sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value (PPV) and negative predictive value (NPV) of the LightCycler PCR for the diagnosis of IA, 536 blood samples were collected over a 22-month period from 62 paediatric patients (median age 10 years, range 1-18) considered at risk of IA. The galactomannan antigen (GM) and fungal DNA were assessed on serial blood samples. IA was diagnosed in eight of 62 patients (13%): proven, five, probable, three. Sensitivity, specificity, PPV and NPV of LightCycler PCR varied according to the number of positive samples used to define positivity: 88%; 37%; 17% and 95% for single sample positivity; and 63%, 81%, 33% and 94% for serial sample positivity respectively. The concordance between positivity of LightCycler PCR assay and the diagnosis of IA was 79%. The single positivity of LightCycler PCR assay showed a good sensitivity for the diagnosis of IA in paediatric patients. The high NPV makes LightCycler PCR a promising tool in addition to GM testing to design a strategy of pre-emptive antifungal therapy, although further validation studies are needed.Aspergillus galactomannan testing in patients with long-term neutropenia: implications for clinical management.We carried out a prospective study on galactomannan enzyme immuno assay (GEI) (Platelia Aspergillus EIA, Bio-Rad) testing for diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA) in serum and broncho-alveolar lavage (BAL) in 200 patients with hematological malignancies and profound neutropenia. The incidence of proven and probable IA was 6% and 5.5%, respectively. In patients with fever or pneumonia, a single-positive GEI test result (galactomannan index >or= 0.5) had excellent specificity (100%). Sensitivity was relatively low (40%) at onset of fever, but increased to 94.7% after 6 days of fever. In patients with infiltrates in chest X-ray or computed tomography scan (n = 48), GEI testing in BAL had a favorable diagnostic accuracy as compared with GEI testing in serum (sensitivity 100% versus 71%). Our findings indicate that antifungal therapy should be started immediately at onset of fever in neutropenic patients with positive GEI tests. In patients with fever refractory to broad-spectrum antibiotics (>or=6 days of fever), the high diagnostic accuracy makes GEI testing a valuable diagnostic tool and questions the common strategy to carry out antifungal treatment irrespective of diagnostic testing in this situation. Our data also show that GEI testing in BAL can be useful for early diagnosis of IA in patients with hematological malignancies and pulmonary infiltrates.False-positive Aspergillus galactomannan antigenaemia after haematopoietic stem cell transplantation.Although Aspergillus galactomannan (GM) antigen detection is widely applied in the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA), false-positive reactions with fungus-derived antibiotics, other fungal genera or the passage of dietary GM through injured mucosa are a matter of concern. The aim of this study was to investigate the cumulative incidence and risk factors for false-positive GM antigenaemia.The records of 157 adult allogeneic haematopoietic stem cell transplantation (HSCT) recipients were retrospectively analysed. Episodes of positive GM antigenaemia, defined as two consecutive GM results with an optical density index above 0.6, were classified into true, false and inconclusive GM antigenaemia by reviewing the clinical course.Twenty-five patients developed proven or probable IA with a 1 year cumulative incidence of 12.9%, whereas 50 experienced positive GM antigenaemia with an incidence of 32.2%. Among the total 58 positive episodes of the 50 patients, 29 were considered false-positive. The positive predictive value (PPV) was lower during the first 100 days than beyond 100 days after HSCT (37.5% versus 58.8%). Gastrointestinal chronic graft-versus-host disease (GVHD) was identified as the only independent significant factor for the increased incidence of false-positive GM antigenaemia (PPV 0% versus 66.7%, P = 0.02).GM antigen results must be considered cautiously in conjunction with other diagnostic procedures including computed tomography scans, especially during the first 100 days after HSCT and in patients with gastrointestinal chronic GVHD.Galactomannan in bronchoalveolar lavage fluid: a tool for diagnosing aspergillosis in intensive care unit patients.Invasive aspergillosis (IA) is an important cause of mortality in patients with hematologic malignancies. However, IA appears to be gaining a foothold in the intensive care unit (ICU) in patients without classical risk factors. A recent study described 89 cases of IA in patients in a medical ICU without leukemia or cancer. The diagnosis of IA remains difficult and is often established too late. Galactomannan (GM) is an exo-antigen released from Aspergillus hyphae while they invade host tissue.This prospective single-center study was conducted to investigate the role of GM in bronchoalveolar lavage (BAL) fluid as a tool for early diagnosis of IA in the ICU.All patients with risk factors identified in our earlier study were evaluated. BAL for culture and GM detection, serum GM levels, and computed tomography scan were obtained for all included patients with signs of pneumonia. Patients were classified as having proven, probable, or possible IA.A total of 110 patients out of 1,109 admissions were eligible. There were 26 proven IA cases. Using a cutoff index of 0.5, the sensitivity and specificity of GM detection in BAL fluid was 88 and 87%, respectively. The sensitivity of serum GM was only 42%. In 11 of 26 proven cases, BAL culture and serum GM remained negative, whereas GM in BAL was positive.IA is common in immunocompromised, critically ill patients. GM detection in BAL fluid seems to be useful in establishing or excluding the diagnosis of IA in the ICU.[The value of serum galactomannan detection for diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis in hematopoietic stem cell transplant recipients].To evaluate the value of serum galactomannan (GM) detection for diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA) in hematopoietic stem cell transplant recipients.The serum GM concentration in 167 sera from 46 patients was detected by Platelia Aspergillus double-sandwich enzyme linked immunosorbent assay (PADSELISA). According to the diagnostic criteria of invasive fungal infections in China, the diagnostic changes were evaluated, the sensitivity, specificity and predictive values were calculated.The sensitivity and specificity of the PADSELISA were 81.8% and 93.3% and the positive and negative predictive values were 90.0% and 87.5% respectively. There were 15 positive cases, and 31 negative cases, and the probable IA cases were increased from 11 to 19 after the GM detection. Moreover, the serous level of galactomannan was correlated with the prognosis of the IA.The PADSELISA for GM detection is a reliable method for early diagnosis and treatment of IA in hematopoietic stem cell transplant recipients.Prospective Aspergillus galactomannan antigen testing in pediatric hematopoietic stem cell transplant recipients.The galactomannan (GM) assay is an approved noninvasive test for detection of invasive aspergillosis (IA) that has been validated in adult patients with hematologic malignancies who are undergoing bone marrow transplantation. There have been few studies with this assay in pediatric patients, but early reports suggest that there may be differences in the performance such that false-positive GM tests in pediatric patients are more common than in adult patients.We performed a prospective study in pediatric hematopoietic stem cell transplant recipients with twice-weekly sampling for GM detection during the highest risk periods of neutropenia and graft-versus-host disease. We analyzed 826 serum samples from 64 patients, including 15 serum samples from one patient diagnosed with probable IA according to defined criteria.Twenty of 811 samples tested positive on repeat testing (specificity, 97.5%; 95% CI: 96.2-98.4%) including samples from 8 of 63 patients without clinical evidence of IA according to study criteria (specificity, 87.3%; 95% CI: 76.9-93.4%). Eleven patients received piperacillin/tazobactam therapy, and 4 of the 11 patients had a positive assay result coinciding with the dates of piperacillin/tazobactam administration. When samples from these patients were excluded, specificity increased to 98.4% (95% CI: 97.2-99.1%) by sample and to 91.5% (95% CI: 81.6-96.3%) by patient.The GM assay holds promise for early, noninvasive diagnosis of IA in high-risk children and false-positive results were not common or unexplainable. This study supports further validation of this assay in a large-scale, pediatric-dedicated format.Assessment of Platelia Aspergillus enzyme immunoassay for the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis.This study investigated the diagnostic value of Platelia Aspergillus enzyme immunoassay (EIA) for galactomannan (GM) antigen in patients at risk of invasive aspergillosis (IA), and its association with clinical course and outcome.A total of 304 blood samples were collected from 189 patients at risk of IA during a 1-year period at a tertiary referral center. Classification of IA was made on the basis of the European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer case definitions.Of the 189 patients, 5 had proven IA, 9 had probable IA, 26 had possible IA, and 149 had no IA. Diagnostic levels of GM were detected in 80% of proven and in 77% of probable IA cases. The overall sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values for this assay, using a 1.5 index cut-off value, were 78.6%, 93.9%, 55.0%, and 97.9%, respectively. With the 0.5 index cut-off value, the sensitivity would increase to 100%. A close relationship was found between clinical course and the kinetics of GM indices in survivors.The Platelia Aspergillus EIA is a useful screening test for the detection of IA. Regular monitoring of the kinetics of GM-EIA indices is a useful predictor of clinical course and outcome.Optimization of the cutoff value for the Aspergillus double-sandwich enzyme immunoassay.Many health care centers worldwide use the Platelia Aspergillus enzyme immunoassay (PA-EIA; Bio-Rad Laboratories) for diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA). A cutoff optical density (OD) index of 1.5 was originally recommended by the manufacturer, but in practice, most institutions use lower cutoff values. Moreover, a cutoff OD index of 0.5 was recently approved in the United States. In the present study, we set out to optimize the cutoff level by performing a retrospective analysis of PA-EIA values for samples that had been obtained prospectively from adult patients at risk for IA at 2 European health care centers.In total, 239 treatment episodes were included of which there were 19 episodes of proven IA and 19 episodes of probable IA. Per-episode and per-test analyses and receiver operating characteristic curves were used to determine the optimal cutoff value.In the per-episode analysis, lowering the cutoff OD index for positivity from 1.5 to 0.5 increased the overall sensitivity by 21% (from 76.3% to 97.4%) but decreased the overall specificity by 7% (from 97.5% to 90.5%). Requiring 2 consecutive samples with an OD index > or = 0.5 resulted in the highest test accuracy, with an improved positive predictive value. At a cutoff OD index of 0.5, the antigen test result was positive during the week before conventional diagnosis in 65% of cases and during the week of diagnosis in 79.5% of cases.A cutoff OD index of 0.5--identical to the approved cutoff in the United States--improves the overall performance of the PA-EIA for adult hematology patients.Advances in the serological diagnosis of invasive Aspergillus infections in patients with haematological disorders.A reliable diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis in patients with haematological malignancies is seldom achieved antemortem. Conventional laboratory diagnostic methods are insensitive and time-consuming, resulting in late diagnosis and treatment and contributing to unacceptably high mortality. As a result, routine antifungal prophylaxis and early empirical treatment have been recommended. However, overtreatment associated with these strategies results in increased toxicity and cost. The use of sensitive and rapid non-culture-based diagnostic assays, such as detection of Aspergillus antigens (galactomannan, beta-D-glucan) or detection of genomic DNA sequences may allow a shift in emphasis from empirical to pre-emptive therapy, especially when substantiated by suggestive radiological findings. These new tools may be used to confirm a presumed diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis, or, when used to screen high-risk patients, may identify an infection at the early stage of disease. The excellent negative predictive value of these assays should convince clinicians to withhold antifungal therapy in persistently febrile neutropenic patients with no other signs of fungal infection. On the other hand, consecutive positive results in a high-risk population should at least trigger a complete diagnostic work-up. This review will focus on the diagnostic utility as well as on the pitfalls of serial screening for the presence of circulating fungal antigens in haematology patients.Use of Aspergillus galactomannan enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) in liver transplant patients.[The value of serum galactomannan antigen for detection of invasive aspergillosis in hematological patients].The incidence of invasive aspergillosis (IA) is increasing in patients with hematological disorders and it may lead to a high mortality rate. This study was to evaluate serum aspergillus galactomannan (GM) antigen assay as a potential early diagnosis and follow-up of IA.From October 2004 to October 2005, 302 blood samples were obtained from 81 neutropenic hematological patients with fever over 38.5 degrees C and shown to have no response to broad-spectrum antibiotics treatment. Blood samples were collected twice a week. The detection of aspergillus GM antigen was carried out with a sandwich enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay and a GM positivity was defined as A index > 1.5 in two consecutive mensuration. Furthermore, the patients with positive GM test received preemptive antifungal therapy with amphotericin B or itraconazole.Twenty seven patients (33.0%) were considered GM test positive from a total of 81 cases and 11 patients were diagnosed as proven or probable IA. The GM test correctly identified 7 of the 11 patients who had aspergillus antigen (63.6% sensitivity). When 14 patients without signs or symptoms of invasive fungal infection (IFI) were tested, the test correctly identified 12 of the 14 (85.7% specificity) as not having the antigen. GM positivity allowed also the anticipation of IA diagnosis (from 3 to 30 days before mycological culture). 19 of 27 GM test positive patients were given preemptive anti aspergillus therapy and there was a good response in 12 patients but no response in 7 cases with 36.8% mortality. After treatment, GM antigen decreased to normal with a good response. Otherwise, an elevated value hinted a unsatisfactory result as judged with Wilcoxon signed rank test (P < 0.0005).It is suggested that serum GM antigen detection may be a useful test for early diagnosis of IA and GM test-based preemptive antifungal therapy in hematological patients at high risk can decrease mortality of IA substantively. Moreover, the dynamic change of GM test value can be useful for assessing therapeutic response.Galactomannan antigen enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay for diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis after hematopoietic stem cell transplantation.Invasive aspergillosis is difficult to diagnose in patients undergoing hematopoietic stem cell transplantation (HSCT). In 2003, a serum enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) test for the detection of galactomannan (a glycoprotein found on the Aspergillus cell wall) became available in the United States. In 2004, patients undergoing HSCT were screened biweekly with the galactomannan ELISA at our institution. We performed a retrospective chart review of 121 SCT patients who underwent galactomannan testing. Thirteen of the patients (10.7%) had at least 1 positive galactomannan ELISA, and 4 had multiple positive tests. When calculated in reference to a proved or probable diagnosis of aspergillosis, the galactomannan ELISA had a sensitivity of 0.50 and a specificity of 0.94. The positive predictive value was 0.46, and the negative predictive value was 0.94. Galactomannan ELISA had fewer false-positive and false-negative results in pediatric patients than in adult patients. In 4 of the 12 cases of invasive aspergillosis, the galactomannan ELISA was positive before other microbiologic evidence of aspergillosis was available. In these cases, a positive ELISA predated culture and cytologic evidence of invasive aspergillosis by a mean of 5 days (range, 1-8 days). Our findings indicate that a biweekly serum galactomannan ELISA is a highly specific diagnostic tool for detecting invasive aspergillosis in patients undergoing HSCT. When used regularly, the ELISA may allow for earlier diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis in some patients. The test is troubled by a low sensitivity and high frequency of false-negative tests.Galactomannan antigenemia for the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis in neutropenic patients with hematological disorders.Invasive aspergillosis (IA) is among the most common invasive fungal infections in neutropenic patients with hematological disorders in the authors' institution, King Chulalongkorn Memorial Hospital (KCMH), Bangkok, Thailand Previous studies have reported the Aspergillus galactomannan enzyme immunosorbent assay (GMEIA) may be a useful diagnostic tool for IA. The authors evaluated the performance of the GM EIA for the diagnosis and monitoring of the course of IA in KCMH.The authors prospectively performed the study from June 2002 to January 2004 in a consecutive series of adult neutropenic patients with hematological disorders who were at risk for developing IA. During hospitalization, serum galactomannan levels were measured once or twice weekly using the Platellia Aspergillus EIA test kit. The sensitivity and specificity of the GM EIA were calculated according to the proportion of patients with true and false positive and negative tests.There were 50 treatment episodes in 44 patients with 5 proven, 12 probable, and 33 possible or no IA. The cutoff GM index of > 0.75 was determined with a sensitivity of 94.1% and a specificity of 78.8%. There was a close relationship between clinical outcome and the kinetics of GM indices.The GM EIA is a useful diagnostic toolfor the diagnosis and monitoring of the course oflA in the presented institute.[Analysis of serum Aspergillus galactomannan contents conducted at our hospital during the past 2 years].Usefulness of sequential Aspergillus galactomannan antigen detection combined with early radiologic evaluation for diagnosis of invasive pulmonary aspergillosis in patients undergoing allogeneic stem cell transplantation.Early diagnosis of invasive pulmonary aspergillosis (IPA) is important as prompt treatment with antifungal drugs may increase patient survival. Our study investigated the efficiency of routine testing of the Aspergillus galactomannan antigen (AGA) test in combination with chest CT scans for IPA diagnosis.From February 2002 to June 2004, 74 hemato-oncologic patients undergoing allogeneic stem cell transplantation were prospectively studied with serum AGA twice weekly from admission until death or discharge and weekly afterward when possible. Chest CT scans were performed when fever of unknown origin had lasted beyond 3 days of antibacterial therapy.Seven patients were classified with possible IPA and two patients, proven IPA. Fourteen patients showed positive results for AGA (OD index>or=1.0 on two subsequent sera). The sensitivity and specificity of the test were 100% and 93%, respectively; the positive and negative predictive values were 64% and 100%, respectively. All patients with possible/proven IPA showed abnormal CT signs; in four cases, imaging signs followed AGA positivity (median 5 days), whereas in five cases they preceded serologic positivity (median, 8 days). In the nine patients with IPA, antifungal therapy was promptly instituted, including lipid formulations of amphotericin B (n=5) or caspofungin (n=4). In only two of the nine patients (22%) with IPA, the primary cause of death was fungal infection.The combination of AGA detection and early chest CT scans might be considered useful tools to detect minimal changes of IPA. Based on these findings, aggressive antifungal therapy should be initiated.Use of galactomannan enzyme immunoassay for diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis in a tertiary-care center over a 12-month period.Prospective evaluation of a polymerase chain reaction-ELISA targeted to Aspergillus fumigatus and Aspergillus flavus for the early diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis in patients with hematological malignancies.Current laboratory and radiological methods for diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA) lack sensitivity and specificity.We prospectively evaluated the diagnostic value of twice-weekly screening for circulating Aspergillus fumigatus and A. flavus DNA with a polymerase chain reaction-enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (PCR-ELISA).Among the 201 adult patients with hematological malignancies who were included in the study, 55 IA cases were diagnosed. On the basis of the analysis of 1205 serum samples from 167 patients, the sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values of the PCR-ELISA for proven and probable IA cases were 63.6%, 89.7%, 63.6%, and 89.7%, respectively, when samples with 2 consecutive positive results were used. The use of a combination of the PCR-ELISA and a galactomannan (GM) assay increased the sensitivity to 83.3%, increased the negative predictive value to 97.6%, and decreased the specificity to 69.8%. In most patients with IA, PCR-ELISA positivity anticipated or was simultaneous with the initiation of antifungal therapy, the abnormalities found by computed tomography, the mycological/histological diagnosis, and the GM positivity. Overall, 56.3% of the patients had at least 1 positive sample, and the false single-positive rate was 44.8%.In addition to serial screening for GM antigenemia and radiological surveillance, PCR-ELISA may improve the rates of early diagnosis of IA and the management of patients with hematological malignancies.Prevention and monitoring of invasive fungal infections in pediatric patients with cancer and hematologic disorders.The occurrence of invasive fungal infection (IFIs) in a pediatric hematology/oncology unit after renovation of the ventilation system, and initiating routine azole antifungal prophylaxis was monitored. In addition, the value of serial screening for Aspergillus galactomannan (GM) for diagnosing invasive aspergillosis was assessed.A total of 98 consecutive high-risk pediatric patients were prospectively surveyed for signs of IFI and weekly monitored for serum GM. The data was not made available to treating physicians.Only 2 patients had proven and 27 possible IFI based on the European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer/Mycoses Study Group definitions. The incidence of proven IFI was 1/31 (3.2%) in the allogeneic stem cell transplant (SCT) (Aspergillus spp), 0/26 in the autologous SCT, and 1/60 (1.6%) in the induction therapy group (C. krusei). GM was detected at least in one tested sample in 12/98 patients (12.2%), in five patients in two or more sequential samples. In the latter group, IFI was proven in one patient and could not be excluded in the others. Four of the five patients belonged to the 31 allogeneic and one to the 26 autologous SCT patients. In patients with only one positive GM test none developed signs of IFI and only one received empirical amphotericin B.With the currently used preventative and prophylactic measures, IFI is uncommon in children with high-risk for infection. Regular screening for GM could be useful among allogeneic SCT patients and two positive samples should prompt further investigative procedures and pre-emptive antifungal therapy.Comparison of PCR-ELISA and galactomannan detection for the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis.To compare PCR with galactomannan antigen detection for the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA).We prospectively collected serial blood samples from haematological patients at risk of IA, and analysed their samples retrospectively for galactomannan (GM) antigen using the Platelia test and for aspergillus DNA using an in-house PCR-ELISA assay. Matched GM and PCR analyses were performed on 263 samples from 25 patients. Patients were classified for potential IA according to international consensus criteria, with five patients classified as positive (four proven, one probable) and 20 classified as negative (seven possible, 13 no evidence IA).All five patients with IA were positive by PCR with positive results in 24 of 82 samples, whereas three of five patients were positive by GM with four of 82 samples being positive. Three of 20 patients without IA were positive by PCR in 18 of 181 samples, whereas corresponding results for GM detection were one of 20 and one of 181, respectively. Adjustment of ELISA cut-off values and/or the requirement for two consecutive samples to be positive generated different results; however, lowering the positivity index (PI) for GM detection to 0.5 did not improve the sensitivity of the assay. Optimal results for PCR detection and GM were: 100% and 60% sensitivity, 85% and 95% specificity, 0.625 and 0.75 positive predictive value, and 1.0 and 0.8 negative predictive value, with a false-positive sample rate of 8 and 0.4%, positive likelihood ratio of 6.66 and 11.99 and negative likelihood ratio of 0 and 0.42, respectively.This PCR method is very sensitive for the diagnosis of IA but is associated with a moderate rate of false positives; the GM assay exhibited poor sensitivity but high specificity. Further evaluation of PCR assays for the diagnosis of IA and other invasive fungal infections is warranted.Galactomannan does not precede major signs on a pulmonary computerized tomographic scan suggestive of invasive aspergillosis in patients with hematological malignancies.Detection of serum galactomannan (GM) antigen and presence of the halo sign on a pulmonary computerized tomographic (CT) scan have a high specificity but a low sensitivity to diagnose invasive aspergillosis (IA) in patients at risk for this disease. To our knowledge, the relationship between the time at which pulmonary infiltrates are detected by CT and the time at which GM antigens are detected by enzyme immunoassay (EIA) has not been studied.In a prospective study, tests for detection of GM were performed twice weekly for patients with hematological malignancies who had undergone hematopoetic stem cell transplantation (HSCT) or had received induction and/or consolidation chemotherapy. A pulmonary CT scan was performed once weekly. Infiltrates were defined as either major or minor signs. IA was classified as proven, probable, or possible, in accordance with the definition stated by the European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer-Invasive Fungal Infections Cooperative Group and the National Institute of Allergy and Infectious Diseases Mycoses Study Group.We analyzed 161 episodes of infection in 107 patients (65 allogeneic HSCT recipients, 30 autologous HSCT recipients, and 66 induction and/or consolidation chemotherapy recipients). A total of 109 episodes with no IA, 32 episodes with possible IA, and 20 episodes with probable or proven IA were identified. Minor pulmonary signs were detected by CT in 70 episodes (43%), and major pulmonary signs were detected by CT in 11 episodes (7%). Univariate and multivariate analyses revealed no significant association between detection of GM by EIA and detection of abnormal pulmonary signs by CT. A significant association was found between GM levels and receipt of piperacillin-tazobactam. GM test results were not positive before major signs were seen on CT images. Only 7 (10%) of 70 patients with minor pulmonary signs had positive GM test results before detection of the greatest pathologic change by CT.We show that detection of GM by EIA does not precede detection of major lesions by pulmonary CT. In the clinical setting, the decision to administer mold-active treatment should based on detection of new pulmonary infiltrates on CT performed early during infection, rather than on results of EIA for detection of GM.The contribution of galactomannan detection in the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis in bone marrow transplant recipients.Until recently, accurate microbiological diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA) was seldom established in HSCT recipients. Blood samples are rarely positive for Aspergillus species, the reliability of the cultures depends of the specimen (if taken from a normally sterile site or not) and biopsy samples require invasive procedures, rarely recommended in patients with severe thrombocytopenia. Implementing the international consensus defining the microbiological criteria for the diagnosis of Aspergillus infection, we retrospectively evaluated the role of serum galactomannan (GM) detection by EIA to diagnose IA among HSCT patients with proven invasive fungal infection (IFI) and the impact of serum storage in GM concentrations. The EIA assay allowed categorizing as "probable" 5 of the 10 cases of "possible" aspergillosis (50%). Considering a lower cut-off level for the reaction (1.0), 80% of the cases could be categorized as "probable" aspergillosis. Positive or undetermined results were detected one to 4 months before the diagnosis of IA in eight of the 11 patients (72.7%) with proven IFI. Retesting the stored samples after a second storage for four years, we could observe lower reactivity in 20% of the samples. The detection of galactomannan by the EIA test represents a major advance in the diagnosis of IA in HSCT recipients at high risk of IA. A better understanding of the kinetics of the GM in different clinical situations is necessary to maximize the benefit of the test in Aspergillus surveillance.Comparison of non-culture-based methods for detection of systemic fungal infections, with an emphasis on invasive Candida infections.The accepted limitations associated with classic culture techniques for the diagnosis of invasive fungal infections have lead to the emergence of many non-culture-based methods. With superior sensitivities and quicker turnaround times, non-culture-based methods may aid the diagnosis of invasive fungal infections. In this review of the diagnostic service, we assessed the performances of two antigen detection techniques (enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay [ELISA] and latex agglutination) with a molecular method for the detection of invasive Candida infection and invasive aspergillosis. The specificities for all three assays were high (> or = 97%), although the Candida PCR method had enhanced sensitivity over both ELISA and latex agglutination with values of 95%, 75%, and 25%, respectively. However, calculating significant sensitivity values for the Aspergillus detection methods was not feasible due to a low number of proven/probable cases. Despite enhanced sensitivity, the PCR method failed to detect nucleic acid in a probable case of invasive Candida infection that was detected by ELISA. In conclusion, both PCR and ELISA techniques should be used in unison to aid the detection of invasive fungal infections.Poor performance of galactomannan and mannan sandwich enzyme-linked immunosorbent assays in the diagnosis of invasive fungal infection.Application of nucleic acid sequence-based amplification for diagnosis of and monitoring the clinical course of invasive aspergillosis in patients with hematologic diseases.We evaluated nucleic acid sequence-based amplification (NASBA) and a galactomannan enzyme immunosorbent assay (GM-EIA) for the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA) in neutropenic febrile patients and for monitoring of its clinical course and outcome. Blood samples were collected twice per week from 128 patients with hematologic diseases during periods of neutropenic fever after undergoing chemotherapy or hematopoietic stem cell transplantation. A total of 448 blood samples were tested.There were 14 patients with IA (2 patients with proven IA and 12 with probable IA). The median index of the initial NASBA in the IA group was more than 10-fold higher than that in the non-IA group. Galactomannan antigenemia (index, >0.5) was detected with a sensitivity of 86%. In receiver-operator characteristic analysis, the cutoff index of NASBA for the presumptive diagnosis of IA was determined to be 5.0. Combination of these 2 parameters (either a GM-EIA index of >or=0.5 or a NASBA index of >or=5.0) improved the sensitivity of diagnosis to 100%. There was a close relationship between patient outcome and the kinetics of NASBA values: failure of negative conversion during treatment resulted in death in almost all cases.If either GM-EIA or NASBA results suggest IA, the diagnostic yield for IA could be improved, and NASBA could be a useful marker for predicting the clinical course and outcome of treatment.Contribution of (1->3)-beta-D-glucan chromogenic assay to diagnosis and therapeutic monitoring of invasive aspergillosis in neutropenic adult patients: a comparison with serial screening for circulating galactomannan.Two noninvasive diagnostic tests, (1-->3)-beta-D-glucan (BG) (Glucatell) and galactomannan (GM) (Platelia Aspergillus), were used retrospectively in a twice-weekly screening for the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA) in 40 treatment episodes (one hospital visit per patient) in 40 neutropenic adult patients at high risk for IA. Five proven IA cases, three probable IA cases, and three possible IA cases were diagnosed. Diagnostic levels of both BG and GM were detected in 100% of patients with proven IA cases and in 66% of patients with probable IA cases. The kinetics of both markers in patients with IA were similar. The sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values for GM and BG were identical, namely, 87.5, 89.6, 70, and 96.3%, respectively. False-positive reactions occurred at a rate of 10.3% in both tests, but the patients showing false-positive results were different in each test. Both tests anticipated the clinical diagnosis, computed tomography abnormalities, and the initiation of antifungal therapy in most patients, but BG tended to become positive earlier than GM. A combination of the two tests improved the specificity (to 100%) and positive predictive value (to 100%) of each individual test without affecting the sensitivity and negative predictive values. In conclusion, BG and GM detection are useful tests for the diagnosis of IA in high-risk hematological patients, but a combination of the two tests was very useful to identify false-positive reactions by each test.[Value of Aspergillus galactomannan antigen detection in the diagnosis and follow-up of invasive aspergillosis in hematological patients].Serum galactomannan detection is considered to be a useful test for early diagnosis and follow-up of invasive aspergillosis. From February to September 2002, adult patients hospitalized in our Hematology Unit for receiving intensive chemotherapy and/or hematopoietic stem cell transplant were prospectively studied. We analyzed a total of 760 samples obtained from 100 patients. Eleven patients (11%) having a positive result (OD index >1.5 ng/ml) in two consecutive Platelia Aspergillus tests were considered galactomannan-positive cases. On the other hand, 12 patients (12%) were diagnosed of proven or probable invasive aspergillosis. Sensitivity (66.6%), specificity (95.5%), positive predictive value (72.7%) and negative predictive value (96.7%) were comparable to those of larger series. Galactomannan positivity allowed also to anticipate invasive aspergillosis diagnosis (from two to 17 days before radiographic findings and from two to 15 days before mycological culture). Moreover, kinetics of antigenemia could be useful for assessing therapeutic response. Once accepted galactomannan test as a diagnostic criterium for invasive aspergillosis knowing potential causes of false positive results is of paramount importance.[Usefulness of galactomannan detection in the diagnosis and follow-up of hematological patients with invasive aspergillosis].The usefulness of galactomannan detection using the Platelia Aspergillus test for the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis was studied in 849 sera from 54 hematological patients with prolonged neutropenia, which were classified according to the risk for invasive aspergillosis. Three patients developed a proven invasive aspergillosis, one a probable invasive aspergillosis and 17 patients a possible invasive aspergillosis. Thirty-three patients showed no evidence of invasive aspergillosis. All patients with proven invasive aspergillosis had a high risk for invasive aspergillosis, while the one having probable invasive aspergillosis had intermediate risk. Detection of galactomannan in this study showed a sensitivity of 66.7% for patients with proven invasive aspergillosis and 50% for patients with proven and probable invasive aspergillosis. The specificity was 98% or higher in all groups studied. The predictive positive and negative values for patients with proven invasive aspergillosis were 66.7% and 98%, respectively. A rise in the concentration of galactomannan was observed in patients who failed to respond to the antifungal treatment. Galactomannan antigenemia preceded post-mortem histological diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis in two patients by 17 and 81 days, respectively. In conclusion, detection of galactomannan by the Platelia Aspergillus test allows for a specific and relatively sensitive diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis in hematological patients with a high and intermediate risk for invasive aspergillosis.Prospective clinical evaluation of lower cut-offs for galactomannan detection in adult neutropenic cancer patients and haematological stem cell transplant recipients.The recent advent of an improved commercial serum enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) for the detection of circulating galactomannan (GM), a major constituent of Aspergillus cell walls, has contributed to the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA) in many haematology and transplant centres. However, the optimal threshold for positivity remains a matter of debate. We prospectively evaluated the impact of lowering the cut-off in 124 neutropenic episodes with a high pretest probability for IA. Two new cut-off points, lower than previously accepted, are proposed: (a) a 'static' cut-off at 0.8 and (b) a 'dynamic' cut-off at 0.5. A single assay with an optical density (OD) index > or = 0.8 warrants the initiation of anti-Aspergillus therapy. A further lowering of the 'static' threshold seems not clinically feasible given the drop in positive predictive value (PPV). However, the demonstration of at least two sequential sera with an OD > or = 0.5 ('dynamic' threshold) increased the specificity and the PPV to 98.6% and the efficiency to 98%. Applying both cut-offs to a subgroup of 21 'possible' fungal infections further identified and upgraded six cases of IA. However, the clinical benefit of lower cut-offs (particularly for earlier diagnosis) depends upon the kinetics of antigenaemia and the intensity of serum sampling.Detection of galactomannan antigenemia by enzyme immunoassay for the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis: variables that affect performance.Invasive aspergillosis (IA) is a frequent complication of blood or marrow transplantation. Previous studies have reported that the Aspergillus galactomannan enzyme immunoassay (GM EIA) may be a useful diagnostic tool for IA, but its sensitivity is variable. We examined the performance of the GM EIA in 986 serum samples from 67 patients. Results demonstrated that decreasing the index cutoff for positivity to 0.5 increased its sensitivity, with minimal loss of specificity. The low cutoff increased the duration of test positivity before diagnosis by clinical means. Sensitivity was highest in patients who did not receive preventative mold-active antifungals (87.5%). A rabbit model demonstrated that the level of circulating antigen correlated with the tissue fungus burden. A quantifiable response to antifungal therapy in clinical samples and the rabbit model supports the development of this assay for early diagnosis and therapeutic monitoring. The 0.5 cutoff may allow for better performance as an early diagnostic test.Prospective comparison of the diagnostic potential of real-time PCR, double-sandwich enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay for galactomannan, and a (1-->3)-beta-D-glucan test in weekly screening for invasive aspergillosis in patients with hematological disorders.The establishment of an optimal noninvasive method for diagnosing invasive aspergillosis (IA) is needed to improve the management of this life-threatening infection in patients with hematological disorders, and a number of noninvasive tests for IA that target different fungal components, including galactomannan, (1-->3)-beta-d-glucan (BDG), and Aspergillus DNA, have been developed. In this study, we prospectively evaluated the diagnostic potential of three noninvasive tests for IA that were used in a weekly screening strategy: the double-sandwich enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) for galactomannan (Platelia Aspergillus), a real-time PCR assay for Aspergillus DNA (GeniQ-Asper), and an assay for BDG (beta-glucan Wako). We analyzed 149 consecutive treatment episodes in 96 patients with hematological disorders who were at high risk for IA and diagnosed 9 proven IA cases, 2 probable IA cases, and 13 possible invasive fugal infections. In a receiver-operating characteristic (ROC) analysis, the area under the ROC curve was greatest for ELISA, using two consecutive positive results (0.97; P = 0.036 for ELISA versus PCR, P = 0.055 for ELISA versus BDG). Based on the ROC curve, the cutoff for the ELISA could be reduced to an optical density index (O.D.I.) of 0.6. With the use of this cutoff for ELISA and cutoffs for PCR and BDG that give a comparable level of specificity, the sensitivity/specificity/positive predictive value/negative predictive value of the ELISA and the PCR and BDG tests were 1.00/0.93/0.55/1.00, 0.55/0.93/0.40/0.96, and 0.55/0.93/0.40/0.96, respectively. In conclusion, among these weekly screening tests for IA, the double-sandwich ELISA test was the most sensitive at predicting the diagnosis of IA in high-risk patients with hematological disorders, using a reduced cutoff of 0.6 O.D.I.Detection of Aspergillus galactomannan by enzyme immunoabsorbent assay in recipients of allogeneic hematopoietic stem cell transplantation: a prospective study.Invasive aspergillosis (IA) has become the leading infectious cause of death after allogeneic hematopoietic stem cell transplantation (allo-HSCT). This is partially because of the lack of a sensitive, specific, and noninvasive diagnostic test. New diagnostic tests for IA, such as the detection of Aspergillus galactomannan antigen (AGA) by sandwich enzyme-linked immunoabsorbent assay (ELISA), have recently been described. This study validates the usefulness of this diagnostic tool in the allo-HSCT setting.From January 1999 to January 2001, all consecutive adult patients undergoing allo-HSCT were prospectively studied with a galactomannan antigenemia assay (ELISA test) twice weekly from admission until death or discharge, and weekly afterward if the patient received immunosuppressive therapy. Proven, probable, and possible IA were defined according to the European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer/Mycoses Study Group criteria.During the 2 years of study, 74 patients underwent an allo-HSCT. A total of 832 serum samples were collected. According to the European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer/Mycoses Study Group criteria, it was ascertained that 66 patients did not fulfill any criteria of IA, 2 patients were classified with possible IA, 5 patients were classified with probable IA, and 1 patient was classified with proven IA. Fourteen samples were positive for AGA, all from patients with IA. The sensitivity and specificity of the test were 75% and 100%, respectively. The positive predictive and negative predictive values were 100% and 97%, respectively.In this study, AGA detection was clearly related to IA. Although the ELISA test did not have any role in the anticipation of the diagnosis, it clarifies the diagnosis of IA in allo-HSCT.Prospective assessment of Platelia Aspergillus galactomannan antigen for the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis in lung transplant recipients.The clinical utility of Platelia trade mark Aspergillus galactomannan antigen for the early diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis was prospectively assessed in 70 consecutive lung transplant recipients. Sera were collected twice weekly and tested for galactomannan. Invasive aspergillosis was documented in 17.1% (12/70) of the patients. Using the generalized estimating equation model, at the cutoff value of >or= 0.5, the sensitivity of the test was 30%, specificity 93% with positive and negative likelihood ratios of 4.2 and 0.75, respectively. Increasing the cutoff value to >or= 0.66 yielded a sensitivity of 30%, specificity of 95%, and positive and negative likelihood ratios of 5.5 and 0.74. A total of 14 patients had false-positive tests, including nine who had cystic fibrosis or chronic obstructive pulmonary disease. False-positive tests occurred within 3 days of transplantation in 43% (6/14) of the patients, and within 7 days in 64% (9/14). Thus, the test demonstrated excellent specificity, but a low sensitivity for the diagnosis of aspergillosis in this patient population. Patients with cystic fibrosis or chronic obstructive pulmonary disease may transiently have a positive test in the early post-transplant period.Prospective clinical evaluation of a LightCycler-mediated polymerase chain reaction assay, a nested-PCR assay and a galactomannan enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay for detection of invasive aspergillosis in neutropenic cancer patients and haematological stem cell transplant recipients.Invasive aspergillosis (IA) is a considerable clinical problem in neutropenic patients with haematological malignancies but its diagnosis remains difficult. We prospectively evaluated a LightCycler polymerase chain reaction (PCR) assay, a nested-PCR assay and a galactomannan (GM) enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) to validate their significance in diagnosing IA. During 205 treatment episodes in 165 patients from six centres, a nested-PCR assay and GM testing was performed at regular intervals. Positive nested-PCR results were quantified by a LightCycler PCR assay. Patient episodes were stratified according to the 2002 European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer/Mycosis Study Group consensus criteria and the PCR and serology results were correlated with the clinical diagnostic classification. Sensitivity and specificity rates for the nested-PCR assay were up to 63.6% [95% confidence interval (CI): 30.8-89%) and 63.5% (95% CI: 53.4-72.7%) respectively, and 33.3% and 98.9% (95% CI: 7.5-70.1% and 94.2-99.9%) for GM respectively. The LightCycler PCR assay yielded positive results in 21.4%, lacking discrimination by quantification across the different clinical categories. In this prospective comparison, PCR was superior to GM with respect to sensitivity rates. In patients at high risk for IA, positive results for Aspergillus by PCR of blood samples are highly suggestive for IA and contribute to the diagnosis.Treatment with piperacillin-tazobactam and false-positive Aspergillus galactomannan antigen test results for patients with hematological malignancies.We report the occurrence of a high rate of false-positive test results during the surveillance of hematology patients for galactomannan (GM) antigenemia. Among 218 patients surveyed from June 2002 through June 2003, 42 (19.3%) had > or =1 serum sample positive for GM (optical density index, >1.5). Of these patients, 38 had no additional evidence of invasive aspergillosis, and, therefore, their test results were considered to be false-positives. Case-control analysis showed that treatment with piperacillin-tazobactam was the only risk factor significantly associated with receiving false-positive test results. When tested for GM antigen, 3 of 4 piperacillin-tazobactam batches had positive results. Physicians should be aware of the possible interference of treatment with piperacillin-tazobactam when interpreting the results of the GM assay.Development of a serum-based Taqman real-time PCR assay for diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis.We compared an Aspergillus fumigatus-specific Taqman real-time PCR assay for the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA) with the enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay Platelia Aspergillus method. Patients with proven or probable IA had positive results with at least one of the two methods. The PCR method seems to be more specific, and a combination of the two should improve the diagnosis of IA.Detection of circulating Aspergillus fumigatus galactomannan: value and limits of the Platelia test for diagnosing invasive aspergillosis.The effectiveness of galactomannan detection with the Platelia test was evaluated in a prospective study of 3,327 sera from 807 patients. The specificity was 99.6% (748 of 751 cases). For the groups of patients with proven and probable invasive aspergillosis, the sensitivity was 50.0% (17 of 34 cases). The disappointing sensitivity associated with the presence of rare false-positive cases underlines the limits of this test.Galactomannan detection in computerized tomography-based broncho-alveolar lavage fluid and serum in haematological patients at risk for invasive pulmonary aspergillosis.We determined the value of galactomannan (GM) detection in computerized tomography (CT)-based broncho-alveolar lavage (BAL) fluid and serum for the diagnosis of invasive pulmonary aspergillosis (IPA) in haemato-oncological patients with neutropenia. CT of the thorax and BAL were performed systematically at predefined clinical indications. GM was determined by sandwich enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay; the clinicians were unaware of the results. Of 160 patients, 17 patients (10.6%) presented with proven, probable or suspected IPA. The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value (PPV) and negative predictive value (NPV) of GM detection in CT-based BAL fluid were all 100%. For GM detection in serially sampled serum, the sensitivity was 47%, the specificity 93%, the PPV 73% and the NPV 82%. A non-blinded follow-up study was performed to validate these results. In this study, 22 of 198 patients (11.1%) presented with IPA, and the sensitivity, specificity, PPV and NPV of GM detection in CT-based BAL fluid were 85%, 100%, 100% and 88% respectively. None of BAL fluids obtained after antifungal treatment of 3 d or more were positive. These results indicate that, when CT is used systematically and at an early stage, GM detection in CT-based BAL fluid has a high PPV for diagnosing IPA early in untreated patients.Use of circulating galactomannan screening for early diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis in allogeneic stem cell transplant recipients.Screening for galactomannan (GM) has been adopted by many European centers as part of the management plan for allogeneic stem cell transplant recipients. However, the temporal onset of GM antigenemia remains unknown. A series of allogeneic stem cell transplant recipients were monitored prospectively, and the relationship between antigenemia and other diagnostic triggers for initiation of antifungal therapy was analyzed. GM detection had a sensitivity of 94.4% and a specificity of 98.8%. Positive and negative predictive values were 94.4% and 98.8%, respectively. This statistical profile was better than that of other triggers, including unexplained fever, new pulmonary infiltrates, isolation of Aspergillus species, and abnormalities seen on computed tomography. Antigenemia preceded diagnosis on the basis of radiologic examination or Aspergillus isolation by 8 and 9 days in 80% and 88.8% of patients, respectively. Antigenemia preceded therapy in 83.3% of patients. Detection of GM was especially useful when patients were receiving steroid treatment or when coexisting conditions masked the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis. Prospective screening for GM allows earlier diagnosis of aspergillosis than do conventional diagnostic criteria.Aspergillus antigen and PCR assays in bone marrow transplanted children.Screening for Aspergillus antigen and DNA has been introduced for the early diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA) in adults, but data in children at risk are scarce. Seventeen 1-108 month-old children were screened for Aspergillus antigenaemia by a commercial assay before and after bone marrow transplantation (BMT). Seventy-one serum samples were examined retrospectively by a novel nested PCR assay. Results of both assays were correlated with clinical, radiological and microbiological findings used for the definition of invasive aspergillosis by the European Organisation for Research and Treatment of Cancer (EORTC). Three cases of probable or possible IA were defined, and in 14 children invasive aspergillosis was ruled out. In 10 children, Aspergillus antigen was detected in at least two consecutive serum samples, a microbiological EORTC criteria of IA. Specific DNA was detected in 8 antigen-positive and 2 antigen-negative sera. A positive predictive value of 20% was calculated for both assays. Hence, a high rate of positive results of antigen Elisa and PCR assays in BMT children are due to transient antigenaemia and fungaemia without clinical relevance. According to our data, prospective studies in well defined pediatric patients are urgently needed to determine the value of serial Aspergillus PCR assays for the early diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis in children at risk.Surveillance of Aspergillus galactomannan antigenemia for invasive aspergillosis by enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay in neutropenic patients treated for hematological malignancies.The incidence of invasive fungal infections is increasing in patients with hematological malignancies. Invasive aspergillosis is one of the most frequently encountered infections with a high mortality rate. New diagnostic tests for invasive aspergillosis such as the detection of Aspergillus galactomannan antigen by a sandwich enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) have recently been described. The objective of this study was to evaluate this assay as a potential surrogate for invasive procedures used to diagnose IA.We analyzed the performance of a commercially available ELISA test which we routinely use for the surveillance of galactomannan antigenemia in patients with hematological malignancies experiencing chemotherapy-induced prolonged neutropenia (ANC < 500/mm(3) for more than 7 days). Serum samples were collected on a weekly basis. Test positivity was defined in accordance with the manufacturer's recommendations.Over the 2 year study period, we analyzed 507 samples obtained during 193 neutropenic episodes from 135 patients. Ten, six and two patients were considered to have proven, probable or possible invasive aspergillosis, respectively, based on clinical, radiological or microbiological data. Forty-four positive (Index>1.5) and 26 'undetermined' (1.5 > Index > 1.0) test results were observed in 17 and ten patients respectively. All invasive aspergillosis cases had at least a positive or an undetermined test result. Only one positive and one undetermined result were found in two patients before the onset of clinical or radiological signs suggesting invasive aspergillosis. Sensitivity was 69% and specificity 96% if only positive results are considered; when 'undetermined' test results were combined with positive results, sensitivity attained 100% and specificity 92% suggesting that the cutoff value for positivity can be lowered from 1.5 to 1.0.Although the ELISA test did not appear to play a role in the early diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis and in the anticipation of antifungal therapy in our experience, it clarifies the diagnosis of infection in probable or possible invasive aspergillosis especially when the cutoff value is lowered and is useful for monitoring patients receiving specific therapy.Aspergillus galactomannan detection in the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis in cancer patients.To assess the Aspergillus galactomannan enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) in the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA) in adult and pediatric oncohematologic patients.The study was conducted in four patient groups: those with fever of unknown origin (FUO) during neutropenia, suspected pulmonary infection (PI), or nonpulmonary aspergillosis (NPA) and those undergoing surveillance (S) after hematopoietic stem-cell transplantation (HSCT). IA was classified as definite, probable, or possible, according to European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer/Mycosis Study Group definitions.A total of 3,294 serum samples were collected during 797 episodes (FUO, 261; PI, 297; NPA, 28; and surveillance, 211), and 153 episodes of IA were diagnosed (31 definite, 67 probable, and 55 possible). Three episodes were first suspected from galactomannan ELISA; the remaining 150 cases were diagnosed from clinical or radiologic evidence. Sensitivity of the ELISA was 64.5%, 16.4%, and 25.5% in definite, probable, and possible episodes of IA, respectively, and was lower in patients positive for anti-Aspergillus antibodies than in antibody-negative patients. Most false-positive results occurred in children and in allogeneic HSCT (allo-HSCT) patients. Overall specificity of the ELISA was 94.8%. It was lower in children compared with adults (P <.0001) and in allo-HSCT patients compared with non-allo-HSCT adults (P =.0002). Lowering the ELISA cutoff value from 1.500 to 0.700 seemed more relevant for non-allo-HSCT adults (sensitivity, 73.1%, 44.3%, and 44.7% in definite, probable, and possible IA, respectively; specificity, 94%).Galactomannan ELISA seems less sensitive than previously described, and sensitivity can be further reduced by the presence of anti-Aspergillus antibodies. A new cutoff value for the ELISA of 0.700 is proposed for non-allo-HSCT adults.Aspergillus antigenemia sandwich-enzyme immunoassay test as a serodiagnostic method for invasive aspergillosis in liver transplant recipients.Invasive aspergillosis (IA) is an important cause of mortality in liver transplant patients. Clinical and microbiological diagnosis is difficult, and it is frequently achieved only after autopsy. Early diagnosis and antifungal therapy could improve the survival of these patients.A retrospective case-control study of IA in liver transplant recipients (OLT) was performed to determine the value of the detection of galactomannan Aspergillus antigen in serum using a sandwich-ELISA test (Platelia, Sanofi Diagnostic Pasteur). Stored frozen serum specimens obtained during the posttransplantation period were used.Fourteen cases of IA were diagnosed in 240 OLT recipients (IA incidence: 5.8%) during 5 years with 13 deaths (mortality: 93%). Nine case patients and 33 control patients met the criteria required for being considered "valid" for antigenemia analysis. In five of the nine case patients, a serum sample was positive for Aspergillus antigenemia detection. The median value was 5.7 ng/ml (range: 1.6-6.6). Sensitivity of the test was 55.6%, specificity was 93.9%, the positive predictive value was 71.4%, and the negative predictive value was 88.6%. The likelihood ratio of a positive test was 9.2.Galactomannan detection in serum could be useful for an early diagnosis of IA in OLT recipients.Value of antigen detection using an enzyme immunoassay in the diagnosis and prediction of invasive aspergillosis in two adult and pediatric hematology units during a 4-year prospective study.Invasive aspergillosis (IA) is a well recognized, life-threatening infection in neutropenic patients and stem cell transplantation recipients. Early diagnosis is important to achieve the best outcome for these patients; however, definite proof often is difficult to obtain due to counterindicated invasive procedures.This study evaluated the specificity and sensitivity of the detection of galactomannan (GM) for the diagnostic and prediction of IA in 347 children from the Pediatric Hematology Service and 450 patients from the Bone Marrow Transplantation Unit at the Hôpital Saint-Louis in Paris. Serial screening of Aspergillus GM circulating antigen was evaluated using a double sandwich ELISA assay (Platelia Aspergillus) on 6209 sera. Among the patients studied, 53 presented with confirmed IA (n = 27 patients) or probable IA (n = 26 patients).Antigen was detected on at least two sequential sera in 48 of 53 patients, with a sensitivity of 90.6%. GM antigenemia was detected before the onset of radiologic signs in 31 of 48 patients (64.6%), with a mean of -8.4 days, and before clinical symptoms in 18 of 48 patients (39.6%), with a mean of -6.9 days. In patients without IA, 44 of 744 had positive antigenemia, resulting in a specificity of 94%. False positive results could not be related to the presence of a concurrent mucositis.This large, prospective study allowed the authors to define better the conditions for the use of GM immunocapture ELISA in surveying patients who are at high risk for IA. The presence of antigen has a good diagnostic value mainly when there is an increase in the titer on two consecutive sera samples. A repeated negative result is a strong argument against the diagnosis of IA; however, an awareness of the possibility of unexplained false negative results is important.Aspergillus antigen testing in bone marrow transplant recipients.To assess the clinical usefulness of a commercial aspergillus antigen enzyme linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) in the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA) in bone marrow transplant recipients, and to compare it with a commercial latex agglutination (LA) test.In total, 2026 serum samples from 104 bone marrow transplant recipients were tested. These comprised 67 sera from seven patients who had died with confirmed IA, 268 sera from nine patients who had died with suspected IA, and 1691 sera from 88 patients with no clinical, radiological, or microbiological signs of IA.The ELISA was more sensitive than the LA test. All patients who were ELISA positive were also LA positive, and a positive LA result never preceded a positive ELISA. Twelve of 16 patients with confirmed or suspected IA were ELISA positive on two or more occasions, compared with 10 of 15 who were LA positive. ELISA was positive before LA in five patients (range, 2-14 days), and became positive on the same day in the remainder. Aspergillus antigen was detected by ELISA a median of 15 days before death (range, 4-233). Clinical and/or radiological evidence of IA was noted in all patients, and a positive ELISA was never the sole criterion for introduction of antifungal treatment. Two samples (one from each of two patients without IA) gave false positive results.The aspergillus ELISA is a specific indicator of invasive aspergillosis if the criterion of two positive samples is required to confirm the diagnosis. However, the test is insufficiently sensitive to diagnose aspergillosis before other symptoms or signs are apparent, and hence is unlikely to lead to earlier initiation of antifungal treatment. It is therefore unsuitable for screening of asymptomatic patients at risk of invasive aspergillosis, but does have a useful role in confirming the diagnosis in symptomatic patients.Comparison of serum galactomannan antigen detection and competitive polymerase chain reaction for diagnosing invasive aspergillosis.To improve the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA), we retrospectively compared competitive polymerase chain reaction (PCR) and sandwich ELISA for detection of serum galactomannan (GM) antigen. We studied 281 serum samples collected weekly during the period at risk for IA from 41 selected hematology patients. Twenty-two patients had confirmed, probable, or suspected IA, according to clinical and mycologic data. Fifteen of them had positive GM titers (87 samples) and 12 had positive PCRs (20 samples). Nineteen of the 20 PCR-positive samples were also GM-positive. Of the 19 patients without IA (83 samples), one had 3 GM-false-positive samples. Neither test anticipated the initiation of antifungal therapy on the basis of clinical suspicion. Both tests were more likely to be positive before death. This study suggests that PCR on serum samples is not more sensitive than GM detection. However, PCR can improve the specificity of the GM test. Together, these noninvasive tests should improve the diagnosis of IA.Comparison of an enzyme immunoassay and a latex agglutination system for the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis in bone marrow transplant recipients.The performance of two Aspergillus antigenemia systems, the sandwich enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA), Platelia Aspergillus test, and the latex agglutination (LA), Pastorex Aspergillus test, in the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis were compared by testing 364 serum samples from 22 bone marrow transplant (BMT) recipients. Sensitivity and specificity for the ELISA test were 60% and 82% respectively, vs 40% and 94% for the LA test. In the two patients found positive with both methods, the ELISA test became positive earlier than the LA test or remained positive after the LA test had become negative. These results encourage further evaluation of the Platelia Aspergillus test, to assess its role in the management of invasive aspergillosis in BMT patients.Serum Aspergillus galactomannan antigen testing by sandwich ELISA: practical use in neutropenic patients.The double sandwich ELISA detecting Aspergillus galactomannan (GM) was prospectively evaluated for the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA) in 50 haematological patients at risk for IA. Serum samples were collected once weekly as long as the risk factors persisted. Six patients had proven or probable IA (3 A. fumigatus, 1 A. flavus, 1 A. niger, 1 A. ustus) and the GM titres were parallel to the clinical evolution of IA. Six of nine patients with suspected IA had at least two consecutive serum GM titres above 1 ng/ml and died with increasing titres, whereas the GM-negative patients survived. Positive GM titres did not anticipate the isolation of fungi. Unfortunately, positive GM titres did not anticipate the initiation of antifungal therapy, based on clinical suspicion. Moreover, if a true-positive result was defined as two consecutive positive serum samples, four patients out of 35 without proven, probable or suspected IA were positive. Then, the rate of false-positive results was high (12%) in the range previously reported. Nevertheless, the GM ELISA appears useful to assess IA and to follow the efficacy of antifungal treatment.Comparison of an enzyme immunoassay and latex agglutination test for detection of galactomannan in the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis.Aspergillus antigenemia was followed up in 215 consecutively observed bone marrow transplant (BMT) patients over a period of two years, using both a latex agglutination test and a sandwich immunocapture enzyme immunoassay (EIA) with a rat antigalactomannan monoclonal antibody as capture and detector antibody. For each patient, sequential sera (3 to 20) were obtained before and after BMT. No positivity was observed before BMT. After BMT, the EIA and latex agglutination test were positive in 19 and 4 patients respectively of 25 patients with confirmed aspergillosis and 14 and 7 of 15 patients with probable aspergillosis. In 19 of 25 patients with confirmed aspergillosis and 9 of 15 patients with probable aspergillosis, the EIA was more sensitive and detected infection earlier than the latex test. In all positive cases, antigenemia rapidly increased in sequential samples and remained strongly positive. In 31 of 169 (19%) BMT patients without clinical signs of aspergillosis, the EIA was occasionally positive in samples taken within the first month after BMT, giving a specificity of 81% in these patients. In non-BMT patients suffering from other diseases (n = 77), the specificity was 98.7%. The overall positive and negative predictive values for the EIA were 54% and 95% respectively. These results favour the use of EIA for early diagnosis and monitoring of aspergillosis in BMT patients, although the predictive value of transient positivity remains to be ascertained.Comparison of antigen detection and PCR assay using bronchoalveolar lavage fluid for diagnosing invasive pulmonary aspergillosis in patients receiving treatment for hematological malignancies.The performance of a sandwich enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) which detects Aspergillus galactomannan (GM) was evaluated in bronchoalveolar lavage (BAL) fluid samples from 19 patients who were treated for hematological malignancies and who were suspected of having invasive pulmonary aspergillosis (IPA). All patients had fever and pulmonary infiltrates on the chest roentgenogram on the day that the BAL fluid was obtained. The ELISA results were compared with the results of culture and Aspergillus genus-specific PCR analysis of BAL fluid samples. ELISA was also performed with serum samples. Aspergillus species were detected by PCR or ELISA with BAL fluid samples from five of seven patients who had radiological evidence of IPA. Serum ELISA results were positive for all patients with ELISA-positive BAL fluid, and for four patients the serum ELISA was positive before the BAL fluid was obtained. PCR and ELISA were positive for 2 and 1 of 10 BAL fluid samples, respectively, obtained from patients without radiological evidence of IPA, and 5 and 2 of 35 BAL fluid samples, respectively, obtained from nonneutropenic patients. This preliminary investigation suggests that GM may be detected by ELISA in BAL fluid samples from patients at risk of IPA, but that monitoring of serum GM levels may allow for the earlier diagnosis of IPA. However, further evaluation in prospective studies is required.Serum galactomannan assay for diagnosis of probable invasive Aspergillosis in acute leukemia and hematopoietic stem cell transplantation.Invasive aspergillosis (IA) is a leading cause of mortality in acute leukemia and hematopoietic stem cell transplantation (HSCT).To determine the yield of galactomannan (GM) assay for the diagnosis of probable IA, its temporal relationship with the computed tomography (CT) scans and correlation with mortality in AL and HSCT.Consecutive neutropenic episodes (n=150) among inpatients aged ≥15 years with AL or recipients of HSCT were prospectively evaluated over 1½ years. All patients underwent weekly serum GM assay and optical density index >0.5 for ≥2 samples was defined as positive. IA was diagnosed according to EORTC 2008 guidelines.Of the 150 episodes enrolled, 43 (28.7%) were diagnosed with IA: possible 25 (16.7%), probable 17 (11.3%) and proven 1 (0.7%). The yield of GM assay in diagnosing probable IA was 17/42 (40.5%). In 88.2% of probable IA episodes, GM was positive before high-resolution CT at a median of 10 days (range 1-16). In the episodes with ≥2 samples tested, fatality was higher in those ≥2 values positive for GM, compared to the rest (31% vs. 13.2%, odd ratio 2.96, 95% CI 1.09-8.00; P=0.04).In AL and HSCT, GM assay could identify patients with probable IA earlier than CT chest and also predicted a higher risk of death.Prevention and diagnosis of invasive fungal disease in high-risk patients within an integrative care pathway.The aim of this study was to assess the clinical utility of enhanced diagnostics on the management of invasive fungal disease in high risk patients within an integrated care pathway and to audit compliance and efficacy of antifungal prophylaxis.A cohort of 549 high risk haematology and stem-cell transplant recipients was followed over a 5 year period. The routine standard of care involved the use of antimould prophylaxis and a neutropenic care pathway utilizing twice weekly antigen and PCR testing.Prophylaxis with itraconazole was poorly tolerated and therapeutic levels could not be maintained. Antigen testing and PCR showed good clinical utility in the management of invasive aspergilosis with high sensitivity (98%) and negative predictive value (99.6%) when both tests were used together, allowing a diagnosis IA to be excluded and obviating the need for empirical antifungal agents. When used serially, multiple positive PCR and antigen test results enabled accurate diagnosis of IA with a specificity of 95% and a positive likelihood ratio of 11. Biomarkers preceded clinical signs in 85% of proven and probable invasive disease.The combination of both tests showed optimum clinical utility for the diagnosis and management of IA in this high risk group.Combined real-time PCR and galactomannan surveillance improves diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis in high risk patients with haematological malignancies.Invasive aspergillosis (IA) is a leading complication of intensive treatment for haematological malignancies. Earlier diagnosis should facilitate effective antifungal therapy and prevent progression to invasive disease, which is often lethal. Polymerase chain reaction (PCR) assays, targeting the 28S and ITS ribosomal gene regions respectively, were evaluated for early detection of Aspergillus DNA and for diagnostic utility in patients receiving treatment in two busy haematopoietic stem cell transplant centres. Patients undergoing intensive chemotherapy, autologous or allogeneic transplant were eligible for inclusion in the study. EDTA blood and serum samples for circulating Aspergillus biomarkers, including galactomannan (GM), were collected twice-weekly on a prospective basis from all study patients who were categorized according to international consensus criteria for defining invasive fungal disease (IFD). Of 278 patients recruited there were 44 probable IA cases and only one proven case. Moderate sensitivity and specificity, poor positive predictive value (50-80%), but good negative predictive value (>80-90%) were common to both PCR assays. Overall biomarker performance could be improved by combining positive results of either PCR assay with GM taken within a 12-d period. The addition of PCR to GM monitoring in high-risk patients with haematological malignancies provides greater diagnostic accuracy in invasive aspergillosis.Variables affecting the performance of galactomannan assay in high-risk patients at a tertiary care centre in India.Diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA) in immunocompromised patients using galactomannan ELISA (GM-ELISA) has shown variable sensitivity and specificity.To assess the diagnostic performance of GM-ELISA and analyze the effect of decreasing the cut off value, neutropenia, antifungals and piperacillin-tazobactam (PTZ). Prognostic value using 30 day all-cause mortality was also determined.Serum samples from 81 patients categorized into "proven," "probable," and "possible," categories based on revised EORTC/MSG definitions were tested by GM-ELISA.Sensitivity of GM-ELISA in proven, probable and possible cases was 91.7%, 84.6% and 83.3% respectively. At an index cut-off value of 0.5 an increased sensitivity with minimal loss of specificity was observed. Use of antifungals demonstrated a decrease in sensitivity in proven and possible cases whereas it remained unaffected in probable category. Specificity increased from 75% to 100% with a positivity criterion of >2 consecutive samples. Although an increase in specificity was observed in patients not receiving PTZ, it was not statistically significant. Serial GM index values increased significantly in neutropenic patients and were associated with a poor prognosis.GM-ELISA may be a useful diagnostic and prognostic modality for the detection of IA in high risk patients.Comparison of galactomannan enzyme immunoassay performance levels when testing serum and plasma samples.Diagnostic galactomannan (GM) enzyme immunoassay (EIA) testing is formally validated only for serum, though in practice, plasma is occasionally tested. It is assumed, but not confirmed, that results will be comparable to those for serum. GM EIA when testing plasma was evaluated, providing sensitivity (85.7%) and specificity (85.4%) comparable to those for serum. Plasma index values were higher than those for serum; if plasma GM EIA were used to define probable cases, four additional cases would have been diagnosed.Serum galactomannan assay for the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis in children with haematological malignancies.Diagnostic efficacy of Galactomannan (GM) assay for invasive aspergillosis (IA) is variably reported. Data from developing countries are scant. Children with haematological malignancies and fever were enrolled prospectively. Blood sample for GM was drawn on the day of admission; levels were measured with Platellia Aspergillus enzyme immunoassay. Diagnostic criteria were adapted from EORTC-MSG-2002. Proven, probable and possible episodes were considered as the disease group. One hundred febrile episodes in 78 patients were evaluated. The mean age was 6.1 years. Majority (75%) episodes were in patients with acute lymphoblastic leukaemia. One episode each was diagnosed with proven and probable IA, while 23 were diagnosed with possible IA. Best results were obtained with a cut-off value of 1.0, with sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive value of 60%, 93%, 75 and 87 respectively. The sensitivity dropped to 40%, at cut-off value of 1.5 and specificity was 38%, at a cut-off of 0.5. A higher value of GM correlated with pulmonary nodules (P = 0.037) and mortality (P = 0.001). GM assay is adjunctive to clinical/radiological evidence. A negative GM assay may not reassure the physician against the use of amphotericin in patients with febrile neutropenia, as it does not exclude the diagnosis of clinically relevant other fungal infections, particular mucormycosis.Diagnosis of invasive pulmonary aspergillosis in children with bronchoalveolar lavage galactomannan.Invasive pulmonary aspergillosis (IPA) is a life-threatening complication in immunocompromised patients. Early diagnosis and therapy improves outcome. Assessment of galactomannan (GM) in bronchoalveolar lavage (BAL) fluid is a proposed tool to diagnose IPA. Little is known about the diagnostic value of BAL GM in children.Retrospectively, 72 bronchoscopies were analyzed for GM in patients fulfilling the host factor criteria as defined by the EORTC/MSG. A cut-off index value GM of ≥0.5 was used. Clinical data, results of chest CT-scans and BAL cultures were collected.Sensitivity, specificity, PPV, and NPV of BAL GM for a diagnosis of proven and probable IPA (n = 41) were 82.4%, 87.5%, 82.4%, and 87.5% respectively. A significant relation was found for BAL GM and abnormal chest CT (P = 0.01). No significant relationship was observed between BAL Aspergillus sp. culture and chest CT (n = 47). BAL GM and serum GM correlated significantly. In 9 out of 12 patients classified as possible IPA, antifungal therapy was continued or started, despite a negative BAL GM.BAL GM test had good diagnostic value in children suspected of IPA. However, the decision to continue or start antifungal therapy was mainly determined by the clinical suspicion of IPA based on chest CT-outcome, serum GM index values and failure of antibiotic therapy.Using the galactomannan antigen assay in the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis after hematopoietic stem cell transplantation.Invasive aspergillosis (IA) is the most common life-threatening infections after hematopoietic stem cell transplant (HSCT). The serum galactomannan (GM) is recognized as an indirect mycological criteria for an early diagnosis of IA. Starting January 2011, we implementing in Fundeni Clinical Institute, Bucharest, for the first time in Romania, the detection of GM antigen (Platelia Aspergillus EIA, Bio-Rad). In 2011, patients undergoing HSCT were screened with the galactomannan ELISA; we performed a retrospective chart review of 162 SCT patients who underwent galactomannan testing. Thirteen of the patients (8.02%) had at least one positive galactomannan ELISA, and four had multiple positive tests. When calculated in reference to a proved or probable diagnosis of aspergillosis, the galactomannan ELISA had a sensitivity of 0.857 and a specificity of 0.913. The positive predictive value was 0.46, and the negative predictive value was 0.993. The Platelia Aspergillus galactomannan antigenemia assay may assist physicians in making an early diagnosis of IA, in correlation with clinical and radiological criteria. The test has a high sensitivity and specificity and a very good negative predictive value. We found the screening of GM ELISA to be a highly specific diagnostic tool in detecting IA manifested in patients undergoing HSCT.[Serum antigens assay combined with chest CT scan in diagnosis of invasive pulmonary aspergillosis].To evaluate serum antigens assay combined with chest CT scan in the diagnosis of patients of invasive pulmonary aspergillosis (IPA) without neutropenia.One hundred and thirteen patients with suspected IPA admitted in Department of Respiratory Medicine, Infectious Diseased, Kidney Disease Centre and ICU were included in the study. Serum levels of 1-3-β-D-glucan (G) antigen and galactomannan antigen (GM) were assayed and chest CT scans were performed in all cases. Clinically invasive pulmonary aspergillosis was defined as proven, probable and possible. Treatment effectiveness was recorded.In this series 4 proven IPA, 36 probable IPA, 16 possible IPA, and 57 non-aspergillosis infection were diagnosed. GM test was more sensitive than G test. The specificity of two serum test was 84.2% and 87.7%, respectively. The sensitivity of chest CT was 30.0 %. The specificity of GM assay combined with chest CT was 100.0 %, while the sensitivity was 47.5%.The GM assay combined with chest CT may increase the specificity of diagnosis for IPA patients without neutropenia.Comparison of serum and bronchoalveolar lavage galactomannan in diagnosing invasive aspergillosis in solid-organ transplant recipients.This study sought to compare the sensitivities of serum galactomannan and bronchoalveolar lavage galactomannan in diagnosing invasive aspergillosis in solid-organ transplant recipients (lung and heart).This study took place in the lung transplant center of the National Research Institute for Tuberculosis and Lung Disease. All patients with clinical and radiologic manifestations suggestive of pulmonary infection were included. Serum and bronchoalveolar lavage galactomannan were measured.Seventeen patients were included (lung, 15; heart, 1; heart-lung, 1). Probable or definite invasive aspergillosis was diagnosed in 9 patients. With a cutoff ≥ 0.5, serum galactomannan sensitivity and specificity for diagnosing invasive aspergillosis were 77.18% and 100%. Negative predictive value and positive predictive value were 80% and 100%. The sensitivity and specificity of bronchoalveolar lavage galactomannan for diagnosing invasive aspergillosis with cutoff of ≥ 0.5 was 100%.Regarding the high levels of mortality and problems in diagnosing this disease, using bronchoalveolar lavage galactomannan could be a suitable option.Diagnostic potential of nested PCR, galactomannan EIA, and beta-D-glucan for invasive aspergillosis in pediatric patients.Limited specific data and investigations are available for invasive aspergillosis (IA) in pediatric patients. We evaluated the diagnostic potential of three noninvasive tests including the Platelia Aspergillus EIA kit for using galactomannan antigen, (1,3)-β-D-glucan Detection Reagent Kit, and nested-PCR for Aspergillus DNA in sera. We evaluated the diagnostic potential of three noninvasive tests including EIA for galactomannan antigen (Platelia Aspergillus), nested PCR assay for Aspergillus DNA and test for (1→3)-β-D-glucan (Glucatell assay Kit).All pediatric patients treated at the hematology/oncology unit who were at increased risk of developing invasive aspergillosis were enrolled. Clinical samples were examined for Aspergillus infections by mycological methods. Serial blood samples were collected twice weekly and evaluated by noninvasive tests.We analyzed 230 consecutive blood samples from 62 pediatric patients. The incidence rate of invasive aspergillosis in the patients was found to be 27.4%, and the etiologic agents were Aspergillus flavus, Aspergillus fumigatus, and Aspergillus spp. The sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values, and likelihood ratios for positive and negative results of galactomannan in patients with proven and probable IA were 90%, 92%, 81.8%, 96%, 11.25, and 0.1; for beta-D-glucan they were 50%, 46%, 26%, 70.6%, 0.9, 0.9; and for nested-PCR they were 80%, 96.2%, 88.9%, 92.6%, 21, and 0.2, respectively.The conventional methods are not able to detect IA, due to the lack of valid and proper sampling. Galactomannan and nested-PCR tests in serum, with enough accuracy and reliability, can serve as noninvasive methods for the detection of IA in pediatric patients. However, the beta-D-glucan test cannot serve as an efficient diagnostic tool in those with hematologic disorders. Diagnostic value of the serum galactomannan assay for invasive aspergillosis: it is less useful in non-haematological patients.The serum galactomannan assay (GMA) has been widely used for the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA). GMA is mainly used in patients with haematological malignancies or in those who have undergone haematopoietic stem cell transplantation (HSCT). However, there are few data from non-haematological patients. We evaluated whether GMA is useful for the diagnosis of IA in non-haematological patients.Patients who were subjected to serum GMA testing from January 2007 to December 2009 were evaluated retrospectively. Patients with haematological diseases or who underwent HSCT were excluded from our analysis. According to the criteria of the European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer/Mycoses Study Group revised in 2008, the patients were categorized as proven, probable, possible, or non-IA. Proven and probable cases were defined as IA in this study.Out of 778 patients, 13 (1.6%) had proven (n =9) or probable (n =4) IA. The sensitivity of the GMA was 23.1% (95% confidence interval (CI) 6.1-54.0%) and the specificity was 76.1% (95% CI 72.9-79.0%). The positive predictive value was 1.6% (95% CI 0.4-5.0%) and the negative predictive value was 98.3% (95% CI 96.8-99.1%). The likelihood ratios of a positive and negative test were 0.96 (95% CI 0.35-2.62) and 1.01 (95% CI 0.75-1.36), respectively.In this study, the sensitivity of the GMA for the diagnosis of IA was very low in non-haematological patients. Although the GMA test is considered useful for the diagnosis of IA in haematological patients, it had low diagnostic value for IA in non-haematological patients.Prospective evaluation of clinical and biological markers to predict the outcome of invasive pulmonary aspergillosis in hematological patients.Early evaluation of treatment efficacy in invasive aspergillosis (IA), a leading cause of morbidity and mortality in hematological patients, remains a challenge. We conducted a prospective study to evaluate the performance of different markers in predicting the outcome of patients with IA. Both clinical and biological criteria were assessed 7, 14, 21, and 45 days after inclusion in the study, and mortality was assessed at day 60. The association between baseline data and their evolution and the day 45 response to treatment was analyzed. A total of 57 patients (4 with proven, 44 with probable, and 9 with possible aspergillosis according to the revised EORTC/MSG [European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer/Invasive Fungal Infections Cooperative Group and National Institute of Allergy and Infectious Diseases Mycoses Study Group] definitions) were included. At day 45, 30 patients (53%) were determined to be responders, 25 (44%) were nonresponders, and 2 were not able to be evaluated. Twenty patients died within the 60 days of follow-up. We found that a poor day 45 outcome was associated with patients who had high baseline serum galactomannan (GM) antigen levels and those receiving steroids at the time of IA. A consistently negative serum GM index was associated with a good outcome, and the day 14 clinical evaluation was predictive of the day 45 outcome. No association was found between Aspergillus antibodies or DNA detection and patients' outcome. We conclude that the GM index value at diagnosis of IA, GM index kinetics, and clinical evaluation at day 14 are good markers for predicting the outcome of patients with IA and should be taken into account for adapting antifungal treatment.Prospective study in critically ill non-neutropenic patients: diagnostic potential of (1,3)-β-D-glucan assay and circulating galactomannan for the diagnosis of invasive fungal disease.Diagnosis of invasive fungal disease (IFD) in patients under intensive care is challenging. Circulating biomarkers, (1,3)-β-D-glucan (BG) and galactomannan (GM), were prospectively assessed in 98 critically ill patients at risk of IFD. There were 11 cases of invasive aspergillosis (IA; 4 proven and 7 probable), 9 cases of proven invasive candidiasis (IC), 1 case of mixed proven IC and probable IA, 1 case of proven zygomycosis, and 1 case of mixed mycelial proven IFD. In all IA cases there was no significant difference when the area under the receiver operating characteristic curve (AUC) of GM (0.873 [95%CI, 0.75-0.99]) and BG (0.856 [95% CI, 0.71-0.99]) were compared (p = 0.871). The AUC for BG in IC and for the rest of the IFD cases was 0.605 (95% CI, 0.39-0.82) and 0.768 (95% CI, 0.63-0.90) respectively. Positive BG (40%) predated blood culture (n = 3) and abdominal pus (n = 1) a mean of 3.25 days before Candida was grown. In patients with IFD caused by molds, BG appeared a mean of 5.65 days before culture results. For the diagnosis of patients at risk of IC, BG has shown a high NPV (94.5%), with positive results also predating blood cultures in 30% of patients. In conclusion, early BG results permit a timely initiation of antifungal therapy in patients at risk of IFD.Retrospective assessment of β-D-(1,3)-glucan for presumptive diagnosis of fungal infections.β-D-(1,3)-glucan (BG) is a component of the cell walls of many fungal organisms. Our aims were to investigate the feasibility of the BG assay and its contribution to early diagnosis of different types of invasive fungal infections (IFI) commonly diagnosed in a tertiary care centre. The BG serum levels of 28 patients diagnosed with six IFI [13 probable invasive aspergillosis (IA), 2 proven IA, 2 zygomycosis, 3 fusariosis, 3 cryptococcosis, 3 candidaemia and 2 pneumocystosis] were retrospectively evaluated. The kinetic variations in BG serum levels from the 15 patients diagnosed with IA were compared with those of the galactomannan antigen (GM). In 5/15 cases of IA, BG was positive earlier than GM (time lapse from 4 to 30 days), in 8/15 cases, BG was positive at the same time as GM and, in 2/15 cases, BG was positive after GM. For the five other fungal diseases, BG was highly positive at the period of diagnosis except for the two cases of zygomycosis and one of the three cases of fusariosis. This study, which reflects the common activity of a tertiary care centre, confirms that BG detection could be of interest for IFI screening in patients with haematological malignancies.[The significance of serum GM and BG antigens assay for invasive fungal infections in hematological malignancies patients].To evaluate the diagnostic value of serum galactomannan antigen (GM) and (1→3)-β-D-glucan antigen (BG) assay in invasive fungal infections (IFI) in the patients with hematologic malignancies and the role in monitoring therapeutic response.Fifty one patients with hematological malignancies met the criteria for inclusion: (1) body temperature above 38°C for 48 hours, (2) failure to respond to broad-spectrum antibiotic treatment, or (3) temperature rose again after the responded drop. Blood samples were collected twice at the first week, then once a week in at least four weeks. The double antibody sandwich enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) and colorimetric assay were used for detecting GM and BG. The positive GM test is defined as two consecutive tests at different time GM value > 0.5 or > 0.8 and the positive G test is defined as BG value > 80 pg/ml. The patients were assigned into four groups as proven, probable, possible, and non-fungal infection respectively, and 21 normal volunteers were as controls.Two hundred and forty serum samples were collected from 51 patients including 2 of proven IFI, 26 probable IFI, 17 possible IFI and 6 non-fungal infection. The true-positive group including the proven and probable groups, and true negative group was the non-fungal infection group. GM tests were positive in 21 of 28 cases in true positive group, and only one of 6 cases in non-fungal infection. The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value and negative predictive value were 75%, 83.3%, 95.5% and 41.7%, respectively. G tests were positive in all 28 cases of the true positive group, and 4 in 6 non-fungal infection cases. The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value and negative predictive value were 100%, 33.3%, 87.5% and 100%, respectively. G test is more sensitive than GM test (P = 0.015), but there was no significant difference in specificity of the two tests (P = 0.242). In 19 of 21 patients with GM test positive, anti-fungal treatment was effective, and GM value gradually decreased to negative, two invalid patients were persistent with GM test positive. After two weeks treatment, the average GM value was significantly lower in the effective group than in the ineffective group (P < 0.05). BG values in the responded patients showed a gradual decline similar to that of GM values, but not to negative. The changes of BG value in ineffective group varied with a trend upward. The changes in BG value had no relation with treatment effectiveness.Serum GM and BG antigens detection provides strong evidence for early diagnosis of IFI. Combination of GM and G tests can improve the diagnostic specificity and reduce the false positive GM test seems superior to G test for monitoring GM and BG values during treatment.[Early antigen diagnosis of invasive fungal infection in patients with hematological malignancies and patients receiving hematopoietic stem cell transplantation].This study was purposed to evaluate the sensitivity and specificity of G/(1, 3-β-D glucan)/GM (galactomannan) combined detection for early diagnosis of invasive fungal disease (IFD), determine the GM positive cut-off value, and investigate the change of diagnostic level before and after G/GM test and the relation of GM value with therapeutic effect. The ELISA with double antibody sandwich was used to detect the serum levels of G and G/M. The results showed that according to determined GM positive cut-off value, the sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive value of G/GM combined detection were 100%, 65.7%, 67.6% and 100%, respectively. The case number of the clinical diagnosis of IFD increased from 1 to 24 cases, the diagnosis of 12 non-infective patients was changed as suspected IFD with the help of G/GM combined detection; the GM cut-off value decreased in patients whose GM cut-off value was higher before therapy and antifungal therapy was effective, while the GM cut-off value increased in patients no-responded to therapy. It is concluded that G/GM combined detection can increased the sensitivity of the diagnosis and reduce false negative rate in the early diagnosis of IFD. The dynamically monitoring G/GM cut-off value can be used as evaluation indicator of therapeutic efficacy.Comparison of PCR-ELISA and Real-Time PCR for invasive aspergillosis diagnosis in patients with hematological malignancies.This study aimed at comparing a real-time PCR assay and a PCR-ELISA assay of both serum and bronchoalveolar lavage (BAL) samples for the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA) in patients with hematological malignancies. Using a nested case-control design, 163 patients at risk were prospectively monitored and PCR assays were performed on frozen aliquots of 459 sera which were prospectively sampled twice weekly and 42 BAL specimens sampled from 43 probable and one proven IA cases and 47 matched controls. The data from three patients classified as possible IA were excluded from the nested case-control study. The sensitivity of real-time PCR and PCR-ELISA assays in serum was 73% and 86%, respectively and specificity was 100% for both. In BAL, sensitivity was 64% for real-time PCR, 71% for PCR-ELISA and 86% for Galactomannan antigen (GMA) assays with specificities of 96%, 96%, and 93%, respectively. While slightly less sensitive, the real time-PCR assay was highly specific and considerably faster and more workable than PCR-ELISA. Combining real-time PCR and GMA detection for both serum and BAL samples enhances routine laboratory IA diagnosis.Positive results of serum galactomannan assays and pulmonary computed tomography predict the higher response rate of empirical antifungal therapy in patients undergoing allogeneic hematopoietic stem cell transplantation.Invasive fungal disease (IFD) is a leading cause of infection-related mortality among patients undergoing allogeneic hematopoietic stem cell transplantation (allo-HSCT). Although the mortality of IFD has been decreased with empirical antifungal therapy in this population, overtreatment remains a problem, for the persistent or recurrent fever is nonspecific for an IFD. Hence, we explored retrospectively the value of incorporating serum galactomannan (GM) test and pulmonary high-resolution computed tomography (HRCT) as predictors for higher response rate of empirical treatment. In our study, all of 124 patients after allo-HSCT received empirical antifungal therapy when the persistent or recurrent fever developed after receiving broad-spectrum antibiotics. Meanwhile, the levels of serum GM were monitored twice weekly and pulmonary HRCT was performed serially. It showed that the response rate of empirical antifungal therapy was higher in patients with positive results of serum GM tests and/or chest CT scan than that in all patients (66.1% versus 44.6%, P = .008). Moreover, only 10 of 55 patients with both negative GM tests and pulmonary HRCT responded to empirical treatment, and 7 of these 10 patients did not take antifungal agents for prophylaxis. It suggested that these 2 diagnostic tools could not predict patients without adequate Candida prophylaxis well. Thus, we concluded that serum GM assays and pulmonary CT scan could find out patients who really need empirical antifungal therapy, which resulted in improving the efficiency of the treatment.The accuracy of serum galactomannan assay in diagnosing invasive pulmonary aspergillosis.Galactomannan (GM) antigen is an aspergillus specific antigen that is released during the growth phase of invasive aspergillosis. We aimed to find the optimum cutoff and accuracy of serum Galactomannan assay in immunocompromised patients. Immunocompromised patients diagnosed with invasive pulmonary aspergillosis (IPA) based on the European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer/Invasive Mycosis Study Group (EORTC/MSG) with three levels of certainty proven, probable and possible, referred for GM antigen measurement at Immunology, Asthma and Allergy Research Institute (IAARI) from 2006 to 2009 and if they met the criteria were enrolled in this study. Totally 49 patients with IPA were enrolled in our study. According to EORTC/MSG, patients categorized into three levels of certainty: They were diagnosed as 'proven' invasive pulmonary aspergillosis 16(32.7%), 'probable' 18(36.7%) and 'possible' 15(30.6%). The most common host risk factor was solid tumors 17(34.7%). The accuracy of Galactomannan assay increased from 0.5 to 2 cutoffs. The optimum sensitivity and specificity obtained at the index cutoff of ≥1.5 for diagnosis of "proven" IPA; which were respectively, 69.2% and 72.2%. Other cutoffs had high variance between sensitivity and specificity for diagnosis of IPA. The calculated cutoff gained by receiver operating characteristic (ROC) analysis for detecting proven IPA was 1.5. Intermediate accuracy of serum GM test in conjunct with clinical findings would help early IPA detection among immunocompromised patients.Value of consecutive galactomannan determinations for the diagnosis and prognosis of invasive pulmonary aspergillosis in critically ill chronic obstructive pulmonary disease.Critically ill chronic obstructive pulmonary disease (COPD) patients who are admitted to intensive care units (ICU) are at particular risk for invasive pulmonary aspergillosis (IPA). The objective of this investigation was to assess the value of consecutive galactomannan (GM) tests in determining the diagnosis and prognosis of IPA in this patient population. We studied 90 critically ill COPD patients admitted to our ICU between February 2007 and November 2009. Two consecutive serum GM tests were done on the first and fourth days of their ICU admissions. Patients were classified as proven IPA (n = 1), probable IPA (n = 18), or non-IPA (n = 71). The sensitivities, specificities, and positive and negative predictive values of GM test results for (i) the first test, (ii) the second test, (iii) at least one positive of two consecutive tests and (iv) two positive consecutive GM tests were, respectively, 57.9%/64.7%/70.6%/47.1%; 87.3%/84.6%/80.8%/94.2%; 55.0%/57.9%/54.5%/72.7%; and 88.6%/88.0%/89.4%/84.5%. The mortality values of IPA patients with (i) a positive first GM test, (ii) at least one of two tests positive, and (iii) both tests positive were (a) 81.8% (9/11), (b) 83.3% (10/12), and (c) 72.7% (8/11), respectively. These results indicate that at least one positive result of two consecutive GM tests appears to be useful in the diagnosis of IPA in critically ill COPD patients in an ICU. In addition, positive serum GM results combined with the isolation of Aspergillus from respiratory samples may be a potential marker of high mortality.A prospective comparison of galactomannan in bronchoalveolar lavage fluid for the diagnosis of pulmonary invasive aspergillosis in medical patients under intensive care: comparison with the diagnostic performance of galactomannan and of (1→ 3)-β-d-glucan chromogenic assay in serum samples.Diagnosis of fungal pneumonia (FP) in critically ill patients is challenging. Circulating biomarkers for the diagnosis of FP have limitations and the combination of different assays in serum samples and directly from the target organ may further improve the diagnosis of FP. We prospectively assessed the diagnostic utility of paired galactomannan (GM) in bronchoalveolar lavage fluid (BAL) and serum GM and (1→3)-β-D-glucan (BG) assays in critically ill patients at risk of FP. Patients with FP were classified according to European Organisation for Research and Treatment of Cancer-Mycoses Study Group criteria, with modifications. Out of 847 admissions, 51 patients were eligible. There were nine invasive aspergillosis (IA) cases (four proven, five probable), three proven Pneumocysitis jirovecii pneumonia (PJP) cases and one mixed FP case (probable IA and proven PJP). The diagnostic accuracy as given by the area under the receiver operating characteristic curve in IA cases (proven and probable) for GM in BAL was 0.98 (95% CI, 0.94-1.00), whilst for GM and BG in serum it was 0.85 (95% CI, 0.74-0.96) and 0.815 (95% CI, 0.66-0.96), respectively. For IA cases (proven and probable) AUC for GM in BAL was significantly higher than GM and BG in serum (p 0.025 and p 0.032, respectively). In one of four proven and one of six probable IA cases, GM in serum remained negative, whereas GM in BAL was positive. In patients with IA, GM (90%) and BG (80%) appeared a mean of 4.3 days (range, 1-10 days) before Aspergillus was cultured. GM detection in BAL appears to improve the diagnosis of IA in critical patients.Early Diagnosis of Invasive Aspergillosis in Neutropenic Patients. Comparison between Serum Galactomannan and Polymerase Chain Reaction.Invasive aspergillosis (IA) is a major cause of morbidity and mortality in profoundly neutropenic patients, so early diagnosis is mandatory.Consecutive patients with hematological malignancies undergoing intensive chemotherapy were screened for IA with two different methods which were compared.From October 2000 to August 2003 we tested 1311 serum samples from 172 consecutive patients with a polymerase chain reaction assay and between April 2005 and April 2008 we tested 806 serum samples from 169 consecutive patients with a Galactomannan (GM) test. Bronchoalveolar (BAL) samples were obtained whenever the patient's condition allowed and tested with either method.The serum PCR assay had a sensitivity of 75.0% and a specificity of 91.9% and the serum GM assay had a sensitivity of 87.5% and a specificity of 93.1%, (P > 0.05). The presence of two or more consecutive positive serum samples was predictive of IA for both assays. BAL GM/PCR was positive in some patients without serum positivity and in patients with 2 or more positive serum GM/PCR.No significant differences between the 2 serum tests were found. The GM assay has the advantage of being standardized among several laboratories and is incorporated in the criteria established by the European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer/Invasive Fungal Infections Cooperative Group and the National Institute of Allergy and Infectious Diseases Mycosis Study Group (EORTC/MSG), however is much more expensive. BAL GM and PCR sampling aids in IA diagnosis but needs further validation studies to differentiate between colonization and true infection in cases where serum GM or PCR are negative.[Combination of real-time polymerase chain reaction assay and serum galactomannan in the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis in patients with hematological malignancies and recipients of hematopoietic stem cell transplantation].To evaluate the role of real-time polymerase chain reaction (real-time PCR) assay combined with serum galactomannan (GM) detection in the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA) with hematological malignancies or hematopoietic stem cell transplantation.Eighty patients were enrolled. PCR and GM were performed simultaneously on 205 serum samples. The agreement between these two assays and the diagnostic value of the combination were analyzed.There were 5 proven IA, 20 probable IA, 34 possible IA and 21 non-IA. Agreement between real-time PCR and GM was 77.5%. When both positive, the positive predictive value could reach 100%; when both negative, the negative predictive value could reach 90.9%.PCR agrees well with GM. When these two assays are combined, invasive aspergillosis can be diagnosed more accurately.[Utility of galactomannan enzyme immunoassay and (1,3)beta-D-glucan assay in invasive fungal infection].To evaluate the performance of the galactomannan enzyme immunoassay (GM test) and (1,3)beta-D-glucan assay (G test) for the diagnosis of invasive fungal infection (IFI).A retrospective study was performed in 115 hospitalized patients at Peking University First Hospital who were at risk of IFI. Patients were diagnosed as IFI according to revised definitions of invasive fungal disease from the European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer/Invasive Fungal Infections Cooperative Group and the National Institute of Allergy and Infectious Diseases Mycoses Study Group (EORTC/MSG) Consensus Group. The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value (PPV), and negative predictive value (NPV) were calculated at different cutoff values for two assays respectively. Two tests were combined to evaluate the changes of sensitivity, specificity, PPV and NPV.The best sensitivity (54.5%, 63.6%) and specificity (77.9%, 69.2%) were obtained with the cutoff values of 0.5 and 20 x 10(3) pg/L in GM test and G test respectively. The PPV were 20.7% and 17.9%, and the NPV were 94.2% and 94.7% respectively. The sensitivity increased to 90.9% and the specificity was 52.9% after a combined utility of two tests.The GM test and G tests are both useful in diagnosis of IFI with the cutoff values of 0.5 and 20 x 10(3) pg/L. A better sensitivity is acquired if there is a combined utility of two tests.Performance of the galactomannan antigen detection test in the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis in children with cancer or undergoing haemopoietic stem cell transplantation.Serum galactomannan (GM) antigen detection is not recommended for defining invasive aspergillosis (IA) in children undergoing aggressive chemotherapy or allogeneic haemopoietic stem cell transplantation (HSCT). The ability of the GM test to identify IA in children was retrospectively evaluated in a cohort of children. Test performance was evaluated on samples that were collected during 195 periods at risk of IA. Proven IA was diagnosed in seven periods, all with positive GM test results (true positives, 4%), and possible IA was diagnosed in 15 periods, all with negative GM test results (false negatives, 8%). The test result was positive with negative microbiological, histological and clinical features in three periods (false positives, 1%), and in 170 periods it was negative with negative microbiological, histological and clinical features (true negatives, 87%). The sensitivity was 0.32 and the specificity was 0.98; the positive predictive value was 0.70 and the negative predictive value was 0.92. The efficiency of the test was 0.91, the positive likelihood ratio was 18.3, and the negative likelihood ratio was 1.4. The probability of missing an IA because of a negative test result was 0.03. Test performance proved to be better during at-risk periods following chemotherapy than in periods following allogeneic HSCT. The GM assay is useful for identifying periods of IA in children undergoing aggressive chemotherapy or allogeneic HSCT.Galactomannan on the stage: prospective evaluation of the applicability in routine practice and surveillance.Invasive aspergillosis (IA) presents a diagnostic and therapeutic dilemma for the physicians who take care of the patients with severe underlying diseases and immunosuppression. This study aimed to evaluate the usefulness of serum galactomannan (GM) measurements in the routine practice and surveillance of IA along with possible caveats in diagnosis and treatment. Adult patients with high-risk haematological malignancies admitted to the Internal Medicine wards during the 2-year study period were followed up by daily visits for vital signs, existing or newly developing signs and symptoms, clinical and laboratory findings. Blood samples were analysed for GM levels by the ELISA method at the end of the study period. Data of 58 hospitalisation episodes in 45 patients were analysed. Proven IA was diagnosed in one patient, probable IA was diagnosed in four patients. The sensitivity was 60% and the specificity was 21% when the index cut-off for positivity was accepted as 0.5. The yield of GM testing may be influenced by many variables and each centre should evaluate the usefulness of this test in its own conditions.Detection of sputum Aspergillus galactomannan for diagnosis of invasive pulmonary aspergillosis in haematological patients.We investigated the diagnostic utility of Aspergillus galactomannan (GM) in sputum for diagnosis of invasive pulmonary aspergillosis (IPA) in haematologic patients and compared the results with those of bronchial lavage fluid (BLF) and serum. Patients were classified into 4 groups using modified European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer criteria: group A, proven IPA; group B, probable IPA; group C, possible IPA; group D, others. Groups A and B were considered the IPA group (n = 6); group D was considered non-IPA group (n = 37); group C (n = 13) was equivocal for IPA. As a true negative control, sputa from patients with community-acquired pneumonia (CAP) without risk factors (group E, n = 22) were used. From the receiver-operating characteristic curves, the cut-off levels were determined as 1.2 in sputum, 0.5-1.3 in BLF and 0.5 in serum. The sensitivity and specificity of sputum, BLF and serum GM were 100 and 62.2%, 66.7 and 100%, and 83.3 and 81.1%, respectively. Twenty-two patients with CAP (group E) showed median GM levels in the sputa of 0.1 (range 0.0-1.0). Sputum GM is a useful non-invasive test for screening of IPA in haematological patients, and may also be useful for assessment of the risk of developing IPA.Contribution of galactomannan antigen detection in BAL to the diagnosis of invasive pulmonary aspergillosis in patients with hematologic malignancies.Invasive pulmonary aspergillosis (IPA) is difficult to diagnose. The detection of galactomannan (GM) in serum samples is useful for diagnosing IPA. A positive test for GM antigen in BAL has also been proposed as a criterion of IPA, although it has not been fully validated. The aim of our study was to evaluate the contribution of GM antigen detection in BAL to the diagnosis of IPA in hematologic patients.One hundred one consecutive patients treated for hematologic malignancy were explored by bronchoscopy and BAL for new pulmonary infiltrates. Both BAL fluid and serum samples were evaluated for GM using an enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay test, with an optical density index >or= 0.5 considered positive. Respiratory samples were also examined for the presence of fungi.IPA was diagnosed in 33 patients according to European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer and Mycoses Study Group consensus group criteria (six proven, 23 probable, four possible). Nineteen of these 33 patients had a positive BAL GM test, whereas three patients without IPA had false-positive results. GM detection in BAL had a sensitivity of 57.6% (95% CI, 40.8%-72.8%) and a specificity of 95.6% (95% CI, 87.8%-98.5%). Among the 19 patients with IPA whose BAL was positive for GM, 15 also had a positive serum GM test. In 11 of these 19 patients, Aspergillus was identified in the respiratory samples.Detection of GM in BAL is complementary of serum GM testing and mycologic evaluation of the respiratory samples for the diagnosis of IPA. Positive GM BAL was the sole microbiologic criterion in two of 33 patients studied.Comparison of Aspergillus galactomannan antigen testing with a new cut-off index and Aspergillus precipitating antibody testing for the diagnosis of chronic pulmonary aspergillosis.The usefulness of two tests in the serodiagnosis of chronic pulmonary aspergillosis (CPA) was compared. The tests were the serum Aspergillus galactomannan antigen test (Platelia (R) Aspergillus) by enzyme-linked immunoassay (EIA) using old and new cut-off indexes, and the Aspergillus precipitating antibody test.Both Aspergillus-precipitating antibody and Platelia Aspergillus EIA positivity were measured in the sera of 28 patients at the time of diagnosis of CPA.Serum Aspergillus precipitating antibody positivity was 89.3% (25/28) in CPA patients. Serum Platelia Aspergillus EIA positivity was 21.4% (6/28) using the old cut-off index (> or =1.5) and 50% (14/28) using the new cut-off index (> or =0.5)-still less than that for Aspergillus precipitating antibody. Three of the 28 CPA patients had positive reactions in the Platelia Aspergillus EIA using the old cut-off index but not in the Aspergillus precipitating antibody test. Positivity for (1,3) beta-d glucan was 15.4%, and that for culture on CHROMagar Candida was 17.9%. One patient with pulmonary actinomycosis had a false-positive reaction in the Platelia Aspergillus test with the new cut-off index.For the diagnosis of CPA, Aspergillus precipitating antibody testing is more sensitive than the Platelia Aspergillus EIA, even with the new cut-off index. False-positive reactions are observed with the Platelia Aspergillus EIA in patients with conditions such as pulmonary actinomycosis. Results should be interpreted with care when patients are positive for the Platelia Aspergillus EIA but negative for Aspergillus precipitating antibody.Invasive Aspergillus infections in allo-SCT recipients: environmental sampling, nasal and oral colonization and galactomannan testing.A study was performed to investigate the air quality of a haematopoietic SCT ward, colonization of the upper airways with Aspergillus spp. and the role of galactomannan (GM) ELISA testing in serum in the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA). In 102 allo-SCT recipients, two cases of IA (one proven and one probable) were seen. Of 2071 serum samples, 12 were positive, two in a patient with proven IA and 10 in patients without IA. Of the 2059 negative samples, 22 were taken from the patient with probable IA. Of the 245 environmental samples, 20 (8.2%) were positive for filamentous fungi. Aspergillus fumigatus was seen in 14 samples. A total of 657 oral and nasal swabs were taken. Seven nasal samples and one oral sample were positive for Aspergillus species (A. fumigatus 4, A. niger 4) in four patients, one of whom had probable IA. In summary, most environmental samples were negative, colonization of the oral and nasal cavities was rare and IA was diagnosed in only 2% of patients. The GM ELISA test remained negative in one of two patients with IA and does not seem useful in a population of patients with a low incidence of IA.[The role of galactomannan detection in the diagnosis of invasive pulmonary aspergillosis in critically ill patients].To evaluate the usefulness of serum galactomannan (GM) for the diagnosis of invasive pulmonary aspergillosis (IPA) in critically ill patients.Study was conducted between February 2007 and July 2008. Included patients on admission ICU who suffer from suspected IPA. GM test and culture were collected 2 weekly. Clinical feature, mycological evidence and optical density index (ODI) were noted. Clinically invasive fungal infection (IFI) were defined proven, probable and possible. The patients were classified into neutropenia, non-neutropenia and treated with immunosuppressive agents, non-neutropenia and non-immunosuppressive agents. To compared of the sensitivity and specificity of GM in different patients.94 patients were included, 4 patients were proven, 29 patients were probable, 34 patients were possible IFI, 27 patients were non-IPA. The positive rate of the GM was 31.9% (30/94). The sensitivity and specificity of GM in proven cases and probable cases are 66.7% and 92.6%. GM assay tended to become positive earlier than the culture 2 - 10 (5.33 +/- 2.17) d. We found that differences in patient diagnosis and selection might account for the disparities seen for positive rate for the GM test. There was positive in three of the four patients with proven, the positive rate of GM was 65.5% for probable cases, for possible cases was 17.6%, for non-IPA cases was 7.4% (P = 0.001). For patient with neutropenia, treated with immunosuppressive agents and without immunosuppressive agents, the positive rate of GM was 52.9% vs 41.7% vs 34.6% (P = 0.015); the sensitivity was 80.0% vs 70.0% vs 53.8% (P = 0.011), the ODI was 1.365 (0.582 - 6.736) vs 1.123 (0.623 - 6.868) vs 0.554 (0.522 - 0.823), P = 0.005, respectively.These results show that GM test is useful for early diagnosis IPA in critically ill patients. Differences in patient selection and diagnosis might account for the disparities seen for positive rate and sensitivity for the GM test. It has been higher sensitivity and ODI in the patient treated by immunosuppressive agents.[Value of serum galactomannan assay in the diagnosis of pediatric invasive pulmonary aspergillosis].Galactomannan (GM) is a major aspergilli cell-wall constituent released into circulation during the early stage of invasive disease, and can be detected. Many studies suggest that serum galactomannan assay has an excellent sensitivity and specificity for the early diagnosis of adult invasive aspergillosis (IA). However, there have been few studies on serum galactomannan assay in pediatric patients. Therefore, we evaluate the value of serum galactomannan assay in the diagnosis of pediatric invasive pulmonary aspergillosis in this study.Blood samples were obtained from 88 children, of whom 14 had definitive or possible invasive pulmonary aspergillosis (IPA), 16 had other invasive pulmonary fungal infection and 58 had pulmonary non-fungal infection. Of the 58 patients, 23 had bacterial pneumonia, 20 had mycoplasma pneumonia and 15 had pulmonary tuberculosis. A double-direct sandwich ELISA was employed to detect GM optical density index (ODI) in the serum sample. GM ODI were observed before and after treatment in six children with IPA. Measurement data followed the Gaussian distribution were expressed as x(-) +/- s; differences among groups were tested using a single factor analysis of variance. If the s>1/3 x(-), measurement data were expressed as M [minimum, maximum], and the differences among groups were tested by a rank sum test. P < 0.05 was considered to be statistically significant.The serum GM ODI in IPA group [1.03 (0.16 - 3.73)] was significantly higher than that in the other invasive pulmonary fungal infection group [0.30 (0.04 - 1.28)] and pulmonary non-fungal infection group [0.24 (0.08 - 0.69)] (P < 0.05). If the cut-off GM ODI was set at 0.5, the sensitivity and specificity of the assay for IPA were 71.4% and 91.9% respectively. The accuracy rate for IPA was 88.6%. If the cut-off GM ODI was set at 0.8, the sensitivity, specificity and accuracy rate for IPA were 64.2%, 98.6% and 93.2% respectively. Of 6 children whose GM were observed serially, GM ODI declined consistently with the clinical remission in 3 children. GM ODI raised in 2 children corresponding to clinical exacerbation. Whereas GM ODI elevated paradoxically regardless of clinical remission in the remaining one patient.Serum GM detection was an effective method for the diagnosis of pediatric IPA.[A preliminary investigation on early diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis in patients with blood diseases by using circulating galactomannan test].The objective of this study was to explore the useful value of circulating galactomannan (GM) for early diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis. All 141 patients were classified as 103 patients of clinical and possible diagnosis, and 38 non-Aspergillus patients. 209 serum samples for the detection of GM by Platelia Aspergillus were collected before anti-fungal vaccine therapy. ELISA method was used in detection of GM. The results showed that (1) the sensitivity of 87.5%, specificity of 81.6%, positive prediction of 66.7% and negative prediction of 93.9% were determined by using cut-off value. According to the result of ELISA, the clinical diagnosed patients was up to 48, while the possible diagnosed patients were 55. (2) Among 62 patients with consecutive examinations of serum samples, 50 patients were successfully diagnosed and treated, while 12 patients died. A progressive reduction of GM level was found in survivors, however, the patients of poor prognosis showed higher antigen titres. It is concluded that GM test has more significance for earlier diagnosis of aspergillosis, the concentration of GM is related to prognosis of disease.The role of bronchoalveolar lavage galactomannan in the diagnosis of pediatric invasive aspergillosis.: Molecular biomarkers such as the galactomannan assay are of increasing interest in clinical settings for diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA). The use of bronchoalveolar lavage galactomannan (BAL GM) is being validated in adult populations, but has not been systematically evaluated in pediatric patients.: A retrospective analysis was performed of patients for whom GM assays from BAL were submitted between November 1, 2006 and November14, 2007 at Childrens Hospital Los Angeles. Medical charts were reviewed and patients were categorized as having no, possible, probable, and proven IA, per established definitions.: Of 85 pediatric patients who had a BAL GM submitted during the study, 59 were immunocompromised. Three patients were identified as having proven IA, 6 had probable IA, 37 had possible IA, and 39 had no evidence of IA; 38 had a concurrent serum GM performed. A positive, linear correlation was established between BAL and serum GM, using OD index values (rho = 0.48, P = 0.002). Among immunocompromised patients, receiver operating characteristic curves demonstrated an optimal BAL GM OD cut-off value of 0.87, that yielded a sensitivity for probable/proven IA of 78% and a specificity of 100%. At 0.87, the positive and negative predictive values among immunocompromised patients were 58% and 96%, respectively.: We found a correlation between BAL GM values and a diagnosis of IA. We also noted a linear relationship between serum and BAL GM values. Receiver operating characteristic curves obtained from our pediatric data validate the current cut off for serum and suggest a possible cut off for BAL specimens.[Evaluation of galactomannan antigen and beta-D-glucan value for diagnosis of chronic necrotizing pulmomary aspergillosis].In order to establish the reliable cut-off value of galactomannan (GM) antigen as well as that for beta-D-glucan for CNPA diagnosis, we conducted the following study. From 2001 to 2008, in a total of 1511 patients we measured GM and anti-aspergillus antibody simultaneously. These patients had chronic pulmonary disease including old tuberculosis, nontuberculous mycobacteriosis, COPD, and had bullous lung, interstitial lung disease or were suspected to have suspected to have interstitial lung disease. We designated cases as probable CNPA when the sample represented a positive anti-aspergillus antibody. We then analyzed the sensitivity and specificity according to various GM antigen values. When using the GM antigen cut-off value at 0.5, the sensitivity and specificity for CNPA were 63.4% and 68.6% respectively. Using 1.0 for cut-off value resulted in the better specificity for CNPA diagnosis. Similar analysis was performed on beta-D-glucan for CNPA diagnosis. When using D-glucan cut-off value as 20 pg/ml, the sensitivity and specificity for CNPA. These results indicate that the cut-off value of serological examination for infectious disease should be considered by the type of disease.Value of a single galactomannan determination (Platelia) for the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis in non-hematological patients with clinical isolation of Aspergillus spp.We studied 75 patients with non-hematological conditions from whom Aspergillus spp. were recovered from clinical specimens during the period March 2003 to August 2006. The patients were classified according to EORTC criteria and the presence of galactomannan (Platelia Aspergillus) in their sera was evaluated. Ten of these patients (13.3%) had proven or probable invasive aspergillosis, i.e., chronic obstructive pulmonary disease in five (50%), HIV infection in one (10%), lymphoma in one (10%), liver transplant in one (10%), solid malignancies in one (10%), and corticosteroid treatment in one (10%). The sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values for the detection of galactomannan, using cut-offs of > or =0.5 ng/ml and > or =1 ng/ml were 60%/50%, 89.23%/100%, 46.15%/100%, and 93.55%/92.86% (p=0.001 and p<0.001), respectively. The determination of galactomannan in the sera of non-neutropenic patients could prove to be a useful microbiological finding when diagnosing invasive aspergillosis.Limited utility of serum galactomannan assay after auto-SCT.Value of serial quantification of fungal DNA by a real-time PCR-based technique for early diagnosis of invasive Aspergillosis in patients with febrile neutropenia.A study was designed to assess the reliability of the serial detection of Aspergillus sp. DNA to diagnose invasive aspergillosis (IA) in patients with febrile neutropenia. Two blood and two serum samples were taken weekly from 83 patients. A total of 2,244 samples were analyzed by real-time quantitative PCR. Twelve (14.4%) patients were diagnosed with IA. Taking two consecutive positive results as the diagnostic criterion, PCR detected 11 cases, with 4 false positives, giving sensitivity, specificity, positive, and negative predictive values of 91.6%, 94.4%, 73.3%, and 98.5%, respectively. On analyzing in conjunction with high-resolution chest tomography (HRCT) and galactomannan (GM) testing, the combination of serial PCR and GM detected 100% of aspergillosis cases, with a positive predictive value of 75.1%. This diagnostic strategy presented, according to CART analysis, a receiver-operator curve with an area under the curve of 0.97 (95% confidence interval, 0.895 to 1.032; P < 0.01), with a relative risk of IA 6.92 times higher than the control population and with predictive success of 95.2%. As regards early diagnosis, the serial detection of Aspergillus DNA took on average 21 days less than HRCT and 68 days less than GM. The serial detection of Aspergillus DNA using real-time quantitative PCR has great diagnostic applicability, which increases when combined with GM quantification.Utility of galactomannan enzyme immunoassay and (1,3) beta-D-glucan in diagnosis of invasive fungal infections: low sensitivity for Aspergillus fumigatus infection in hematologic malignancy patients.Previous studies have reported that galactomannan (GM) enzyme immunoassay and 1,3 beta-glucan (BG) assay may be useful diagnostic tools, but their sensitivities are variable. We compared the performances of both tests. Between October 2002 and May 2005, 82 patients were prospectively monitored for 12 weeks. A total of 414 samples were tested by GM assay and 409 samples were tested by BG assay for the following four groups of patients: those with invasive aspergillosis (IA), those with other mold infections (Fusarium, scedosporium, zygomycosis, etc.), those with candidemia, and control patients. Blood samples were obtained twice on week 1 and once every other week for a total of 12 weeks. Patients in the invasive fungal infection groups had comparable risk factors. The sensitivity of the GM test was significantly higher for patients with IA due to non-fumigatus Aspergillus species than for patients with IA due to Aspergillus fumigatus (49% versus 13%; P < 0.0001) or with other mold infections (49% versus 6%; P < 0.0001). However, the sensitivity range (47% to 64%) and specificity (88%) of the BG assay were comparable among all patients tested, regardless of the infecting pathogen. The performance of GM-based diagnosis appears to be better for detecting non-fumigatus Aspergillus species. The diagnostic marker BG was shown to have a higher sensitivity than that of GM in detecting IA and other mold infections in hematologic malignancy patients.Detection of circulating Aspergillus fumigatus DNA by real-time PCR assay of large serum volumes improves early diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis in high-risk adult patients under hematologic surveillance.Detection of galactomannan antigen (GMA) in serum is the standard assay for the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA) in high-risk patients with hematological disorders. Detection of Aspergillus DNA in serum has been proposed, but its sensitivity is lower than that of GMA when small serum volumes (SSV) are used. In this study, we investigated whether extraction of DNA from large serum volumes (LSV) improves diagnostic yield. In a 13-month prospective study, we compared the performances of twice-weekly screening of serum for GMA by an enzyme immunoassay and weekly screening for Aspergillus fumigatus DNA by a real-time PCR (RT-PCR) assay of 1.0 ml (LSV) or 100 mul (SSV) of serum. We included 124 patients (138 treatment episodes), with 17 episodes of EORTC (European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer)/MSG (Mycoses Study Group)-documented IA. In all, 1,870 samples were screened for GMA. The sensitivity (Se), specificity (Sp), and positive and negative predictive values (PPV and NPV, respectively) of GMA for IA were 88.2%, 95.8%, 75%, and 98.3%, respectively. We screened 938 samples for Aspergillus DNA by using LSV; 404 of these samples were also tested with SSV. The Se, Sp, PPV, and NPV of RT-PCR were 100%, 96.7%, 81%, and 100%, respectively, with LSV and 76.5%, 96.7%, 81.3%, and 95.6%, respectively, with SSV. DNA detection gave a positive result when performed on LSV in two cases of IA where the GMA assay result remained negative. Furthermore, in four IA cases, DNA was detected earlier than GMA. The use of LSV for extraction improved the performance of the RT-PCR, which appears highly sensitive and specific for the early diagnosis of IA in high-risk patients with hematological disorders.Galactomannan antigenemia in pediatric oncology patients with invasive aspergillosis.Diagnosing invasive aspergillosis is difficult but might be improved by detection of circulating galactomannan. Although galactomannan antigenemia has been well studied in the detection of invasive aspergillosis in adult patients, little is known about the expression of circulating galactomannan in immunocompromised children with invasive aspergillosis.We studied the expression of galactomannan antigen by enzyme immunoassay (EIA) in 990 serum samples from 56 pediatric oncology patients (ages 3 months to 18 years) of whom 17 had proven or probable invasive aspergillosis defined by the European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer-Mycoses Study Group criteria. Any sample with a galactomannan EIA Galactomannan index value of > or = 0.5 was considered positive.At least 1 serum sample was positive for 11 of 17 pediatric oncology patients (65.7% sensitivity, 95% confidence interval: 38.3-85.7) with invasive aspergillosis. Galactomannan EIA was positive in 99 of 304 samples from patients with proven or probable invasive aspergillosis, and 7 of 686 (1.0%) samples from 39 control subjects resulted in a positive galactomannan EIA result. At least 1 sample tested positive in 5 of the 39 controls (12.8%, 95% confidence interval: 4.3-27.4). No significant association between accuracy and patient age was observed. Among the 7 evaluable galactomannan-positive patients with IA, the galactomannan EIA produced a positive result before clinical or radiographic evidence of infection in 6 cases, with a lead-time to diagnosis ranging from 1 day to 34 days (median: 10 days). In the remaining case, a positive galactomannan was observed on the same day as diagnosis by non-EIA methods.The presence of circulating galactomannan is predictive of invasive aspergillosis in most pediatric oncology patients. Galactomannan antigenemia may precede clinical, microbiologic, or radiographic evidence of invasive aspergillosis.[The use of galactomannan detection in diagnosing invasive aspergillosis in hemato-oncological patients].PREMISES AND OBJECTIVES: Timely diagnosis is of critical importance for the prognosis of invasive aspergilosis (IA) patients. Over recent years, IA detection of galactomannan using the ELISA method has assumed growing importance. The objective of the study was to analyse the usability of the method in current clinical practice of a hemato-oncological ward.From May 2003 to October 2006, blood samples were taken from patients at IA risk to detect galactomannan (GM) in serum using the ELISA method. The patients who underwent the tests were classified by the probability of IA presence on the basis of the results of conventional diagnostic methods and section findings.A total of 11,360 serum samples from 911 adult patients were tested for GM presence. IA (probable/proven) was diagnosed in 42 (4.6%) of them. The rates of sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive value of galactomannan detection for IA diagnosis in our ward were, respectively, 95.2%, 90.0%, 31.5% and 99.7%. The principal causes of the limited positive predictive value of the test were the high percentage of false-positive test results (mainly caused by concomitant administration of some penicillin antibiotics or Plasma-Lyte infusion solution), as well as the fact that a large percentage of patients we examined fell within the group of patients with hematological malignity with a very low prevalence of IA.GM detection in serum is associated with high sensitivity and excellent negative predictive value in IA diagnosis in hemato-oncological patients. Knowledge and elimination of possible causes of false-positive results as well as focusing the screening on patients at greatest risk of infection are necessary for an even better exploitation of the test.Assessment of the lightcycler PCR assay for diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis in paediatric patients with onco-haematological diseases.A reliable diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA) is hampered by the difficulty in obtaining suitable tissue samples. To evaluate the sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value (PPV) and negative predictive value (NPV) of the LightCycler PCR for the diagnosis of IA, 536 blood samples were collected over a 22-month period from 62 paediatric patients (median age 10 years, range 1-18) considered at risk of IA. The galactomannan antigen (GM) and fungal DNA were assessed on serial blood samples. IA was diagnosed in eight of 62 patients (13%): proven, five, probable, three. Sensitivity, specificity, PPV and NPV of LightCycler PCR varied according to the number of positive samples used to define positivity: 88%; 37%; 17% and 95% for single sample positivity; and 63%, 81%, 33% and 94% for serial sample positivity respectively. The concordance between positivity of LightCycler PCR assay and the diagnosis of IA was 79%. The single positivity of LightCycler PCR assay showed a good sensitivity for the diagnosis of IA in paediatric patients. The high NPV makes LightCycler PCR a promising tool in addition to GM testing to design a strategy of pre-emptive antifungal therapy, although further validation studies are needed.Aspergillus galactomannan testing in patients with long-term neutropenia: implications for clinical management.We carried out a prospective study on galactomannan enzyme immuno assay (GEI) (Platelia Aspergillus EIA, Bio-Rad) testing for diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA) in serum and broncho-alveolar lavage (BAL) in 200 patients with hematological malignancies and profound neutropenia. The incidence of proven and probable IA was 6% and 5.5%, respectively. In patients with fever or pneumonia, a single-positive GEI test result (galactomannan index >or= 0.5) had excellent specificity (100%). Sensitivity was relatively low (40%) at onset of fever, but increased to 94.7% after 6 days of fever. In patients with infiltrates in chest X-ray or computed tomography scan (n = 48), GEI testing in BAL had a favorable diagnostic accuracy as compared with GEI testing in serum (sensitivity 100% versus 71%). Our findings indicate that antifungal therapy should be started immediately at onset of fever in neutropenic patients with positive GEI tests. In patients with fever refractory to broad-spectrum antibiotics (>or=6 days of fever), the high diagnostic accuracy makes GEI testing a valuable diagnostic tool and questions the common strategy to carry out antifungal treatment irrespective of diagnostic testing in this situation. Our data also show that GEI testing in BAL can be useful for early diagnosis of IA in patients with hematological malignancies and pulmonary infiltrates.False-positive Aspergillus galactomannan antigenaemia after haematopoietic stem cell transplantation.Although Aspergillus galactomannan (GM) antigen detection is widely applied in the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA), false-positive reactions with fungus-derived antibiotics, other fungal genera or the passage of dietary GM through injured mucosa are a matter of concern. The aim of this study was to investigate the cumulative incidence and risk factors for false-positive GM antigenaemia.The records of 157 adult allogeneic haematopoietic stem cell transplantation (HSCT) recipients were retrospectively analysed. Episodes of positive GM antigenaemia, defined as two consecutive GM results with an optical density index above 0.6, were classified into true, false and inconclusive GM antigenaemia by reviewing the clinical course.Twenty-five patients developed proven or probable IA with a 1 year cumulative incidence of 12.9%, whereas 50 experienced positive GM antigenaemia with an incidence of 32.2%. Among the total 58 positive episodes of the 50 patients, 29 were considered false-positive. The positive predictive value (PPV) was lower during the first 100 days than beyond 100 days after HSCT (37.5% versus 58.8%). Gastrointestinal chronic graft-versus-host disease (GVHD) was identified as the only independent significant factor for the increased incidence of false-positive GM antigenaemia (PPV 0% versus 66.7%, P = 0.02).GM antigen results must be considered cautiously in conjunction with other diagnostic procedures including computed tomography scans, especially during the first 100 days after HSCT and in patients with gastrointestinal chronic GVHD.Galactomannan in bronchoalveolar lavage fluid: a tool for diagnosing aspergillosis in intensive care unit patients.Invasive aspergillosis (IA) is an important cause of mortality in patients with hematologic malignancies. However, IA appears to be gaining a foothold in the intensive care unit (ICU) in patients without classical risk factors. A recent study described 89 cases of IA in patients in a medical ICU without leukemia or cancer. The diagnosis of IA remains difficult and is often established too late. Galactomannan (GM) is an exo-antigen released from Aspergillus hyphae while they invade host tissue.This prospective single-center study was conducted to investigate the role of GM in bronchoalveolar lavage (BAL) fluid as a tool for early diagnosis of IA in the ICU.All patients with risk factors identified in our earlier study were evaluated. BAL for culture and GM detection, serum GM levels, and computed tomography scan were obtained for all included patients with signs of pneumonia. Patients were classified as having proven, probable, or possible IA.A total of 110 patients out of 1,109 admissions were eligible. There were 26 proven IA cases. Using a cutoff index of 0.5, the sensitivity and specificity of GM detection in BAL fluid was 88 and 87%, respectively. The sensitivity of serum GM was only 42%. In 11 of 26 proven cases, BAL culture and serum GM remained negative, whereas GM in BAL was positive.IA is common in immunocompromised, critically ill patients. GM detection in BAL fluid seems to be useful in establishing or excluding the diagnosis of IA in the ICU.[The value of serum galactomannan detection for diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis in hematopoietic stem cell transplant recipients].To evaluate the value of serum galactomannan (GM) detection for diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA) in hematopoietic stem cell transplant recipients.The serum GM concentration in 167 sera from 46 patients was detected by Platelia Aspergillus double-sandwich enzyme linked immunosorbent assay (PADSELISA). According to the diagnostic criteria of invasive fungal infections in China, the diagnostic changes were evaluated, the sensitivity, specificity and predictive values were calculated.The sensitivity and specificity of the PADSELISA were 81.8% and 93.3% and the positive and negative predictive values were 90.0% and 87.5% respectively. There were 15 positive cases, and 31 negative cases, and the probable IA cases were increased from 11 to 19 after the GM detection. Moreover, the serous level of galactomannan was correlated with the prognosis of the IA.The PADSELISA for GM detection is a reliable method for early diagnosis and treatment of IA in hematopoietic stem cell transplant recipients.Prospective Aspergillus galactomannan antigen testing in pediatric hematopoietic stem cell transplant recipients.The galactomannan (GM) assay is an approved noninvasive test for detection of invasive aspergillosis (IA) that has been validated in adult patients with hematologic malignancies who are undergoing bone marrow transplantation. There have been few studies with this assay in pediatric patients, but early reports suggest that there may be differences in the performance such that false-positive GM tests in pediatric patients are more common than in adult patients.We performed a prospective study in pediatric hematopoietic stem cell transplant recipients with twice-weekly sampling for GM detection during the highest risk periods of neutropenia and graft-versus-host disease. We analyzed 826 serum samples from 64 patients, including 15 serum samples from one patient diagnosed with probable IA according to defined criteria.Twenty of 811 samples tested positive on repeat testing (specificity, 97.5%; 95% CI: 96.2-98.4%) including samples from 8 of 63 patients without clinical evidence of IA according to study criteria (specificity, 87.3%; 95% CI: 76.9-93.4%). Eleven patients received piperacillin/tazobactam therapy, and 4 of the 11 patients had a positive assay result coinciding with the dates of piperacillin/tazobactam administration. When samples from these patients were excluded, specificity increased to 98.4% (95% CI: 97.2-99.1%) by sample and to 91.5% (95% CI: 81.6-96.3%) by patient.The GM assay holds promise for early, noninvasive diagnosis of IA in high-risk children and false-positive results were not common or unexplainable. This study supports further validation of this assay in a large-scale, pediatric-dedicated format.Assessment of Platelia Aspergillus enzyme immunoassay for the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis.This study investigated the diagnostic value of Platelia Aspergillus enzyme immunoassay (EIA) for galactomannan (GM) antigen in patients at risk of invasive aspergillosis (IA), and its association with clinical course and outcome.A total of 304 blood samples were collected from 189 patients at risk of IA during a 1-year period at a tertiary referral center. Classification of IA was made on the basis of the European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer case definitions.Of the 189 patients, 5 had proven IA, 9 had probable IA, 26 had possible IA, and 149 had no IA. Diagnostic levels of GM were detected in 80% of proven and in 77% of probable IA cases. The overall sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values for this assay, using a 1.5 index cut-off value, were 78.6%, 93.9%, 55.0%, and 97.9%, respectively. With the 0.5 index cut-off value, the sensitivity would increase to 100%. A close relationship was found between clinical course and the kinetics of GM indices in survivors.The Platelia Aspergillus EIA is a useful screening test for the detection of IA. Regular monitoring of the kinetics of GM-EIA indices is a useful predictor of clinical course and outcome.Optimization of the cutoff value for the Aspergillus double-sandwich enzyme immunoassay.Many health care centers worldwide use the Platelia Aspergillus enzyme immunoassay (PA-EIA; Bio-Rad Laboratories) for diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA). A cutoff optical density (OD) index of 1.5 was originally recommended by the manufacturer, but in practice, most institutions use lower cutoff values. Moreover, a cutoff OD index of 0.5 was recently approved in the United States. In the present study, we set out to optimize the cutoff level by performing a retrospective analysis of PA-EIA values for samples that had been obtained prospectively from adult patients at risk for IA at 2 European health care centers.In total, 239 treatment episodes were included of which there were 19 episodes of proven IA and 19 episodes of probable IA. Per-episode and per-test analyses and receiver operating characteristic curves were used to determine the optimal cutoff value.In the per-episode analysis, lowering the cutoff OD index for positivity from 1.5 to 0.5 increased the overall sensitivity by 21% (from 76.3% to 97.4%) but decreased the overall specificity by 7% (from 97.5% to 90.5%). Requiring 2 consecutive samples with an OD index > or = 0.5 resulted in the highest test accuracy, with an improved positive predictive value. At a cutoff OD index of 0.5, the antigen test result was positive during the week before conventional diagnosis in 65% of cases and during the week of diagnosis in 79.5% of cases.A cutoff OD index of 0.5--identical to the approved cutoff in the United States--improves the overall performance of the PA-EIA for adult hematology patients.Advances in the serological diagnosis of invasive Aspergillus infections in patients with haematological disorders.A reliable diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis in patients with haematological malignancies is seldom achieved antemortem. Conventional laboratory diagnostic methods are insensitive and time-consuming, resulting in late diagnosis and treatment and contributing to unacceptably high mortality. As a result, routine antifungal prophylaxis and early empirical treatment have been recommended. However, overtreatment associated with these strategies results in increased toxicity and cost. The use of sensitive and rapid non-culture-based diagnostic assays, such as detection of Aspergillus antigens (galactomannan, beta-D-glucan) or detection of genomic DNA sequences may allow a shift in emphasis from empirical to pre-emptive therapy, especially when substantiated by suggestive radiological findings. These new tools may be used to confirm a presumed diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis, or, when used to screen high-risk patients, may identify an infection at the early stage of disease. The excellent negative predictive value of these assays should convince clinicians to withhold antifungal therapy in persistently febrile neutropenic patients with no other signs of fungal infection. On the other hand, consecutive positive results in a high-risk population should at least trigger a complete diagnostic work-up. This review will focus on the diagnostic utility as well as on the pitfalls of serial screening for the presence of circulating fungal antigens in haematology patients.Use of Aspergillus galactomannan enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) in liver transplant patients.[The value of serum galactomannan antigen for detection of invasive aspergillosis in hematological patients].The incidence of invasive aspergillosis (IA) is increasing in patients with hematological disorders and it may lead to a high mortality rate. This study was to evaluate serum aspergillus galactomannan (GM) antigen assay as a potential early diagnosis and follow-up of IA.From October 2004 to October 2005, 302 blood samples were obtained from 81 neutropenic hematological patients with fever over 38.5 degrees C and shown to have no response to broad-spectrum antibiotics treatment. Blood samples were collected twice a week. The detection of aspergillus GM antigen was carried out with a sandwich enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay and a GM positivity was defined as A index > 1.5 in two consecutive mensuration. Furthermore, the patients with positive GM test received preemptive antifungal therapy with amphotericin B or itraconazole.Twenty seven patients (33.0%) were considered GM test positive from a total of 81 cases and 11 patients were diagnosed as proven or probable IA. The GM test correctly identified 7 of the 11 patients who had aspergillus antigen (63.6% sensitivity). When 14 patients without signs or symptoms of invasive fungal infection (IFI) were tested, the test correctly identified 12 of the 14 (85.7% specificity) as not having the antigen. GM positivity allowed also the anticipation of IA diagnosis (from 3 to 30 days before mycological culture). 19 of 27 GM test positive patients were given preemptive anti aspergillus therapy and there was a good response in 12 patients but no response in 7 cases with 36.8% mortality. After treatment, GM antigen decreased to normal with a good response. Otherwise, an elevated value hinted a unsatisfactory result as judged with Wilcoxon signed rank test (P < 0.0005).It is suggested that serum GM antigen detection may be a useful test for early diagnosis of IA and GM test-based preemptive antifungal therapy in hematological patients at high risk can decrease mortality of IA substantively. Moreover, the dynamic change of GM test value can be useful for assessing therapeutic response.Galactomannan antigen enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay for diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis after hematopoietic stem cell transplantation.Invasive aspergillosis is difficult to diagnose in patients undergoing hematopoietic stem cell transplantation (HSCT). In 2003, a serum enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) test for the detection of galactomannan (a glycoprotein found on the Aspergillus cell wall) became available in the United States. In 2004, patients undergoing HSCT were screened biweekly with the galactomannan ELISA at our institution. We performed a retrospective chart review of 121 SCT patients who underwent galactomannan testing. Thirteen of the patients (10.7%) had at least 1 positive galactomannan ELISA, and 4 had multiple positive tests. When calculated in reference to a proved or probable diagnosis of aspergillosis, the galactomannan ELISA had a sensitivity of 0.50 and a specificity of 0.94. The positive predictive value was 0.46, and the negative predictive value was 0.94. Galactomannan ELISA had fewer false-positive and false-negative results in pediatric patients than in adult patients. In 4 of the 12 cases of invasive aspergillosis, the galactomannan ELISA was positive before other microbiologic evidence of aspergillosis was available. In these cases, a positive ELISA predated culture and cytologic evidence of invasive aspergillosis by a mean of 5 days (range, 1-8 days). Our findings indicate that a biweekly serum galactomannan ELISA is a highly specific diagnostic tool for detecting invasive aspergillosis in patients undergoing HSCT. When used regularly, the ELISA may allow for earlier diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis in some patients. The test is troubled by a low sensitivity and high frequency of false-negative tests.Galactomannan antigenemia for the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis in neutropenic patients with hematological disorders.Invasive aspergillosis (IA) is among the most common invasive fungal infections in neutropenic patients with hematological disorders in the authors' institution, King Chulalongkorn Memorial Hospital (KCMH), Bangkok, Thailand Previous studies have reported the Aspergillus galactomannan enzyme immunosorbent assay (GMEIA) may be a useful diagnostic tool for IA. The authors evaluated the performance of the GM EIA for the diagnosis and monitoring of the course of IA in KCMH.The authors prospectively performed the study from June 2002 to January 2004 in a consecutive series of adult neutropenic patients with hematological disorders who were at risk for developing IA. During hospitalization, serum galactomannan levels were measured once or twice weekly using the Platellia Aspergillus EIA test kit. The sensitivity and specificity of the GM EIA were calculated according to the proportion of patients with true and false positive and negative tests.There were 50 treatment episodes in 44 patients with 5 proven, 12 probable, and 33 possible or no IA. The cutoff GM index of > 0.75 was determined with a sensitivity of 94.1% and a specificity of 78.8%. There was a close relationship between clinical outcome and the kinetics of GM indices.The GM EIA is a useful diagnostic toolfor the diagnosis and monitoring of the course oflA in the presented institute.[Analysis of serum Aspergillus galactomannan contents conducted at our hospital during the past 2 years].Usefulness of sequential Aspergillus galactomannan antigen detection combined with early radiologic evaluation for diagnosis of invasive pulmonary aspergillosis in patients undergoing allogeneic stem cell transplantation.Early diagnosis of invasive pulmonary aspergillosis (IPA) is important as prompt treatment with antifungal drugs may increase patient survival. Our study investigated the efficiency of routine testing of the Aspergillus galactomannan antigen (AGA) test in combination with chest CT scans for IPA diagnosis.From February 2002 to June 2004, 74 hemato-oncologic patients undergoing allogeneic stem cell transplantation were prospectively studied with serum AGA twice weekly from admission until death or discharge and weekly afterward when possible. Chest CT scans were performed when fever of unknown origin had lasted beyond 3 days of antibacterial therapy.Seven patients were classified with possible IPA and two patients, proven IPA. Fourteen patients showed positive results for AGA (OD index>or=1.0 on two subsequent sera). The sensitivity and specificity of the test were 100% and 93%, respectively; the positive and negative predictive values were 64% and 100%, respectively. All patients with possible/proven IPA showed abnormal CT signs; in four cases, imaging signs followed AGA positivity (median 5 days), whereas in five cases they preceded serologic positivity (median, 8 days). In the nine patients with IPA, antifungal therapy was promptly instituted, including lipid formulations of amphotericin B (n=5) or caspofungin (n=4). In only two of the nine patients (22%) with IPA, the primary cause of death was fungal infection.The combination of AGA detection and early chest CT scans might be considered useful tools to detect minimal changes of IPA. Based on these findings, aggressive antifungal therapy should be initiated.Use of galactomannan enzyme immunoassay for diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis in a tertiary-care center over a 12-month period.Prospective evaluation of a polymerase chain reaction-ELISA targeted to Aspergillus fumigatus and Aspergillus flavus for the early diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis in patients with hematological malignancies.Current laboratory and radiological methods for diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA) lack sensitivity and specificity.We prospectively evaluated the diagnostic value of twice-weekly screening for circulating Aspergillus fumigatus and A. flavus DNA with a polymerase chain reaction-enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (PCR-ELISA).Among the 201 adult patients with hematological malignancies who were included in the study, 55 IA cases were diagnosed. On the basis of the analysis of 1205 serum samples from 167 patients, the sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values of the PCR-ELISA for proven and probable IA cases were 63.6%, 89.7%, 63.6%, and 89.7%, respectively, when samples with 2 consecutive positive results were used. The use of a combination of the PCR-ELISA and a galactomannan (GM) assay increased the sensitivity to 83.3%, increased the negative predictive value to 97.6%, and decreased the specificity to 69.8%. In most patients with IA, PCR-ELISA positivity anticipated or was simultaneous with the initiation of antifungal therapy, the abnormalities found by computed tomography, the mycological/histological diagnosis, and the GM positivity. Overall, 56.3% of the patients had at least 1 positive sample, and the false single-positive rate was 44.8%.In addition to serial screening for GM antigenemia and radiological surveillance, PCR-ELISA may improve the rates of early diagnosis of IA and the management of patients with hematological malignancies.Prevention and monitoring of invasive fungal infections in pediatric patients with cancer and hematologic disorders.The occurrence of invasive fungal infection (IFIs) in a pediatric hematology/oncology unit after renovation of the ventilation system, and initiating routine azole antifungal prophylaxis was monitored. In addition, the value of serial screening for Aspergillus galactomannan (GM) for diagnosing invasive aspergillosis was assessed.A total of 98 consecutive high-risk pediatric patients were prospectively surveyed for signs of IFI and weekly monitored for serum GM. The data was not made available to treating physicians.Only 2 patients had proven and 27 possible IFI based on the European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer/Mycoses Study Group definitions. The incidence of proven IFI was 1/31 (3.2%) in the allogeneic stem cell transplant (SCT) (Aspergillus spp), 0/26 in the autologous SCT, and 1/60 (1.6%) in the induction therapy group (C. krusei). GM was detected at least in one tested sample in 12/98 patients (12.2%), in five patients in two or more sequential samples. In the latter group, IFI was proven in one patient and could not be excluded in the others. Four of the five patients belonged to the 31 allogeneic and one to the 26 autologous SCT patients. In patients with only one positive GM test none developed signs of IFI and only one received empirical amphotericin B.With the currently used preventative and prophylactic measures, IFI is uncommon in children with high-risk for infection. Regular screening for GM could be useful among allogeneic SCT patients and two positive samples should prompt further investigative procedures and pre-emptive antifungal therapy.Comparison of PCR-ELISA and galactomannan detection for the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis.To compare PCR with galactomannan antigen detection for the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA).We prospectively collected serial blood samples from haematological patients at risk of IA, and analysed their samples retrospectively for galactomannan (GM) antigen using the Platelia test and for aspergillus DNA using an in-house PCR-ELISA assay. Matched GM and PCR analyses were performed on 263 samples from 25 patients. Patients were classified for potential IA according to international consensus criteria, with five patients classified as positive (four proven, one probable) and 20 classified as negative (seven possible, 13 no evidence IA).All five patients with IA were positive by PCR with positive results in 24 of 82 samples, whereas three of five patients were positive by GM with four of 82 samples being positive. Three of 20 patients without IA were positive by PCR in 18 of 181 samples, whereas corresponding results for GM detection were one of 20 and one of 181, respectively. Adjustment of ELISA cut-off values and/or the requirement for two consecutive samples to be positive generated different results; however, lowering the positivity index (PI) for GM detection to 0.5 did not improve the sensitivity of the assay. Optimal results for PCR detection and GM were: 100% and 60% sensitivity, 85% and 95% specificity, 0.625 and 0.75 positive predictive value, and 1.0 and 0.8 negative predictive value, with a false-positive sample rate of 8 and 0.4%, positive likelihood ratio of 6.66 and 11.99 and negative likelihood ratio of 0 and 0.42, respectively.This PCR method is very sensitive for the diagnosis of IA but is associated with a moderate rate of false positives; the GM assay exhibited poor sensitivity but high specificity. Further evaluation of PCR assays for the diagnosis of IA and other invasive fungal infections is warranted.Galactomannan does not precede major signs on a pulmonary computerized tomographic scan suggestive of invasive aspergillosis in patients with hematological malignancies.Detection of serum galactomannan (GM) antigen and presence of the halo sign on a pulmonary computerized tomographic (CT) scan have a high specificity but a low sensitivity to diagnose invasive aspergillosis (IA) in patients at risk for this disease. To our knowledge, the relationship between the time at which pulmonary infiltrates are detected by CT and the time at which GM antigens are detected by enzyme immunoassay (EIA) has not been studied.In a prospective study, tests for detection of GM were performed twice weekly for patients with hematological malignancies who had undergone hematopoetic stem cell transplantation (HSCT) or had received induction and/or consolidation chemotherapy. A pulmonary CT scan was performed once weekly. Infiltrates were defined as either major or minor signs. IA was classified as proven, probable, or possible, in accordance with the definition stated by the European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer-Invasive Fungal Infections Cooperative Group and the National Institute of Allergy and Infectious Diseases Mycoses Study Group.We analyzed 161 episodes of infection in 107 patients (65 allogeneic HSCT recipients, 30 autologous HSCT recipients, and 66 induction and/or consolidation chemotherapy recipients). A total of 109 episodes with no IA, 32 episodes with possible IA, and 20 episodes with probable or proven IA were identified. Minor pulmonary signs were detected by CT in 70 episodes (43%), and major pulmonary signs were detected by CT in 11 episodes (7%). Univariate and multivariate analyses revealed no significant association between detection of GM by EIA and detection of abnormal pulmonary signs by CT. A significant association was found between GM levels and receipt of piperacillin-tazobactam. GM test results were not positive before major signs were seen on CT images. Only 7 (10%) of 70 patients with minor pulmonary signs had positive GM test results before detection of the greatest pathologic change by CT.We show that detection of GM by EIA does not precede detection of major lesions by pulmonary CT. In the clinical setting, the decision to administer mold-active treatment should based on detection of new pulmonary infiltrates on CT performed early during infection, rather than on results of EIA for detection of GM.The contribution of galactomannan detection in the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis in bone marrow transplant recipients.Until recently, accurate microbiological diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA) was seldom established in HSCT recipients. Blood samples are rarely positive for Aspergillus species, the reliability of the cultures depends of the specimen (if taken from a normally sterile site or not) and biopsy samples require invasive procedures, rarely recommended in patients with severe thrombocytopenia. Implementing the international consensus defining the microbiological criteria for the diagnosis of Aspergillus infection, we retrospectively evaluated the role of serum galactomannan (GM) detection by EIA to diagnose IA among HSCT patients with proven invasive fungal infection (IFI) and the impact of serum storage in GM concentrations. The EIA assay allowed categorizing as "probable" 5 of the 10 cases of "possible" aspergillosis (50%). Considering a lower cut-off level for the reaction (1.0), 80% of the cases could be categorized as "probable" aspergillosis. Positive or undetermined results were detected one to 4 months before the diagnosis of IA in eight of the 11 patients (72.7%) with proven IFI. Retesting the stored samples after a second storage for four years, we could observe lower reactivity in 20% of the samples. The detection of galactomannan by the EIA test represents a major advance in the diagnosis of IA in HSCT recipients at high risk of IA. A better understanding of the kinetics of the GM in different clinical situations is necessary to maximize the benefit of the test in Aspergillus surveillance.Comparison of non-culture-based methods for detection of systemic fungal infections, with an emphasis on invasive Candida infections.The accepted limitations associated with classic culture techniques for the diagnosis of invasive fungal infections have lead to the emergence of many non-culture-based methods. With superior sensitivities and quicker turnaround times, non-culture-based methods may aid the diagnosis of invasive fungal infections. In this review of the diagnostic service, we assessed the performances of two antigen detection techniques (enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay [ELISA] and latex agglutination) with a molecular method for the detection of invasive Candida infection and invasive aspergillosis. The specificities for all three assays were high (> or = 97%), although the Candida PCR method had enhanced sensitivity over both ELISA and latex agglutination with values of 95%, 75%, and 25%, respectively. However, calculating significant sensitivity values for the Aspergillus detection methods was not feasible due to a low number of proven/probable cases. Despite enhanced sensitivity, the PCR method failed to detect nucleic acid in a probable case of invasive Candida infection that was detected by ELISA. In conclusion, both PCR and ELISA techniques should be used in unison to aid the detection of invasive fungal infections.Poor performance of galactomannan and mannan sandwich enzyme-linked immunosorbent assays in the diagnosis of invasive fungal infection.Application of nucleic acid sequence-based amplification for diagnosis of and monitoring the clinical course of invasive aspergillosis in patients with hematologic diseases.We evaluated nucleic acid sequence-based amplification (NASBA) and a galactomannan enzyme immunosorbent assay (GM-EIA) for the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA) in neutropenic febrile patients and for monitoring of its clinical course and outcome. Blood samples were collected twice per week from 128 patients with hematologic diseases during periods of neutropenic fever after undergoing chemotherapy or hematopoietic stem cell transplantation. A total of 448 blood samples were tested.There were 14 patients with IA (2 patients with proven IA and 12 with probable IA). The median index of the initial NASBA in the IA group was more than 10-fold higher than that in the non-IA group. Galactomannan antigenemia (index, >0.5) was detected with a sensitivity of 86%. In receiver-operator characteristic analysis, the cutoff index of NASBA for the presumptive diagnosis of IA was determined to be 5.0. Combination of these 2 parameters (either a GM-EIA index of >or=0.5 or a NASBA index of >or=5.0) improved the sensitivity of diagnosis to 100%. There was a close relationship between patient outcome and the kinetics of NASBA values: failure of negative conversion during treatment resulted in death in almost all cases.If either GM-EIA or NASBA results suggest IA, the diagnostic yield for IA could be improved, and NASBA could be a useful marker for predicting the clinical course and outcome of treatment.Contribution of (1->3)-beta-D-glucan chromogenic assay to diagnosis and therapeutic monitoring of invasive aspergillosis in neutropenic adult patients: a comparison with serial screening for circulating galactomannan.Two noninvasive diagnostic tests, (1-->3)-beta-D-glucan (BG) (Glucatell) and galactomannan (GM) (Platelia Aspergillus), were used retrospectively in a twice-weekly screening for the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA) in 40 treatment episodes (one hospital visit per patient) in 40 neutropenic adult patients at high risk for IA. Five proven IA cases, three probable IA cases, and three possible IA cases were diagnosed. Diagnostic levels of both BG and GM were detected in 100% of patients with proven IA cases and in 66% of patients with probable IA cases. The kinetics of both markers in patients with IA were similar. The sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values for GM and BG were identical, namely, 87.5, 89.6, 70, and 96.3%, respectively. False-positive reactions occurred at a rate of 10.3% in both tests, but the patients showing false-positive results were different in each test. Both tests anticipated the clinical diagnosis, computed tomography abnormalities, and the initiation of antifungal therapy in most patients, but BG tended to become positive earlier than GM. A combination of the two tests improved the specificity (to 100%) and positive predictive value (to 100%) of each individual test without affecting the sensitivity and negative predictive values. In conclusion, BG and GM detection are useful tests for the diagnosis of IA in high-risk hematological patients, but a combination of the two tests was very useful to identify false-positive reactions by each test.[Value of Aspergillus galactomannan antigen detection in the diagnosis and follow-up of invasive aspergillosis in hematological patients].Serum galactomannan detection is considered to be a useful test for early diagnosis and follow-up of invasive aspergillosis. From February to September 2002, adult patients hospitalized in our Hematology Unit for receiving intensive chemotherapy and/or hematopoietic stem cell transplant were prospectively studied. We analyzed a total of 760 samples obtained from 100 patients. Eleven patients (11%) having a positive result (OD index >1.5 ng/ml) in two consecutive Platelia Aspergillus tests were considered galactomannan-positive cases. On the other hand, 12 patients (12%) were diagnosed of proven or probable invasive aspergillosis. Sensitivity (66.6%), specificity (95.5%), positive predictive value (72.7%) and negative predictive value (96.7%) were comparable to those of larger series. Galactomannan positivity allowed also to anticipate invasive aspergillosis diagnosis (from two to 17 days before radiographic findings and from two to 15 days before mycological culture). Moreover, kinetics of antigenemia could be useful for assessing therapeutic response. Once accepted galactomannan test as a diagnostic criterium for invasive aspergillosis knowing potential causes of false positive results is of paramount importance.[Usefulness of galactomannan detection in the diagnosis and follow-up of hematological patients with invasive aspergillosis].The usefulness of galactomannan detection using the Platelia Aspergillus test for the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis was studied in 849 sera from 54 hematological patients with prolonged neutropenia, which were classified according to the risk for invasive aspergillosis. Three patients developed a proven invasive aspergillosis, one a probable invasive aspergillosis and 17 patients a possible invasive aspergillosis. Thirty-three patients showed no evidence of invasive aspergillosis. All patients with proven invasive aspergillosis had a high risk for invasive aspergillosis, while the one having probable invasive aspergillosis had intermediate risk. Detection of galactomannan in this study showed a sensitivity of 66.7% for patients with proven invasive aspergillosis and 50% for patients with proven and probable invasive aspergillosis. The specificity was 98% or higher in all groups studied. The predictive positive and negative values for patients with proven invasive aspergillosis were 66.7% and 98%, respectively. A rise in the concentration of galactomannan was observed in patients who failed to respond to the antifungal treatment. Galactomannan antigenemia preceded post-mortem histological diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis in two patients by 17 and 81 days, respectively. In conclusion, detection of galactomannan by the Platelia Aspergillus test allows for a specific and relatively sensitive diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis in hematological patients with a high and intermediate risk for invasive aspergillosis.Prospective clinical evaluation of lower cut-offs for galactomannan detection in adult neutropenic cancer patients and haematological stem cell transplant recipients.The recent advent of an improved commercial serum enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) for the detection of circulating galactomannan (GM), a major constituent of Aspergillus cell walls, has contributed to the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA) in many haematology and transplant centres. However, the optimal threshold for positivity remains a matter of debate. We prospectively evaluated the impact of lowering the cut-off in 124 neutropenic episodes with a high pretest probability for IA. Two new cut-off points, lower than previously accepted, are proposed: (a) a 'static' cut-off at 0.8 and (b) a 'dynamic' cut-off at 0.5. A single assay with an optical density (OD) index > or = 0.8 warrants the initiation of anti-Aspergillus therapy. A further lowering of the 'static' threshold seems not clinically feasible given the drop in positive predictive value (PPV). However, the demonstration of at least two sequential sera with an OD > or = 0.5 ('dynamic' threshold) increased the specificity and the PPV to 98.6% and the efficiency to 98%. Applying both cut-offs to a subgroup of 21 'possible' fungal infections further identified and upgraded six cases of IA. However, the clinical benefit of lower cut-offs (particularly for earlier diagnosis) depends upon the kinetics of antigenaemia and the intensity of serum sampling.Detection of galactomannan antigenemia by enzyme immunoassay for the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis: variables that affect performance.Invasive aspergillosis (IA) is a frequent complication of blood or marrow transplantation. Previous studies have reported that the Aspergillus galactomannan enzyme immunoassay (GM EIA) may be a useful diagnostic tool for IA, but its sensitivity is variable. We examined the performance of the GM EIA in 986 serum samples from 67 patients. Results demonstrated that decreasing the index cutoff for positivity to 0.5 increased its sensitivity, with minimal loss of specificity. The low cutoff increased the duration of test positivity before diagnosis by clinical means. Sensitivity was highest in patients who did not receive preventative mold-active antifungals (87.5%). A rabbit model demonstrated that the level of circulating antigen correlated with the tissue fungus burden. A quantifiable response to antifungal therapy in clinical samples and the rabbit model supports the development of this assay for early diagnosis and therapeutic monitoring. The 0.5 cutoff may allow for better performance as an early diagnostic test.Prospective comparison of the diagnostic potential of real-time PCR, double-sandwich enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay for galactomannan, and a (1-->3)-beta-D-glucan test in weekly screening for invasive aspergillosis in patients with hematological disorders.The establishment of an optimal noninvasive method for diagnosing invasive aspergillosis (IA) is needed to improve the management of this life-threatening infection in patients with hematological disorders, and a number of noninvasive tests for IA that target different fungal components, including galactomannan, (1-->3)-beta-d-glucan (BDG), and Aspergillus DNA, have been developed. In this study, we prospectively evaluated the diagnostic potential of three noninvasive tests for IA that were used in a weekly screening strategy: the double-sandwich enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) for galactomannan (Platelia Aspergillus), a real-time PCR assay for Aspergillus DNA (GeniQ-Asper), and an assay for BDG (beta-glucan Wako). We analyzed 149 consecutive treatment episodes in 96 patients with hematological disorders who were at high risk for IA and diagnosed 9 proven IA cases, 2 probable IA cases, and 13 possible invasive fugal infections. In a receiver-operating characteristic (ROC) analysis, the area under the ROC curve was greatest for ELISA, using two consecutive positive results (0.97; P = 0.036 for ELISA versus PCR, P = 0.055 for ELISA versus BDG). Based on the ROC curve, the cutoff for the ELISA could be reduced to an optical density index (O.D.I.) of 0.6. With the use of this cutoff for ELISA and cutoffs for PCR and BDG that give a comparable level of specificity, the sensitivity/specificity/positive predictive value/negative predictive value of the ELISA and the PCR and BDG tests were 1.00/0.93/0.55/1.00, 0.55/0.93/0.40/0.96, and 0.55/0.93/0.40/0.96, respectively. In conclusion, among these weekly screening tests for IA, the double-sandwich ELISA test was the most sensitive at predicting the diagnosis of IA in high-risk patients with hematological disorders, using a reduced cutoff of 0.6 O.D.I.Detection of Aspergillus galactomannan by enzyme immunoabsorbent assay in recipients of allogeneic hematopoietic stem cell transplantation: a prospective study.Invasive aspergillosis (IA) has become the leading infectious cause of death after allogeneic hematopoietic stem cell transplantation (allo-HSCT). This is partially because of the lack of a sensitive, specific, and noninvasive diagnostic test. New diagnostic tests for IA, such as the detection of Aspergillus galactomannan antigen (AGA) by sandwich enzyme-linked immunoabsorbent assay (ELISA), have recently been described. This study validates the usefulness of this diagnostic tool in the allo-HSCT setting.From January 1999 to January 2001, all consecutive adult patients undergoing allo-HSCT were prospectively studied with a galactomannan antigenemia assay (ELISA test) twice weekly from admission until death or discharge, and weekly afterward if the patient received immunosuppressive therapy. Proven, probable, and possible IA were defined according to the European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer/Mycoses Study Group criteria.During the 2 years of study, 74 patients underwent an allo-HSCT. A total of 832 serum samples were collected. According to the European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer/Mycoses Study Group criteria, it was ascertained that 66 patients did not fulfill any criteria of IA, 2 patients were classified with possible IA, 5 patients were classified with probable IA, and 1 patient was classified with proven IA. Fourteen samples were positive for AGA, all from patients with IA. The sensitivity and specificity of the test were 75% and 100%, respectively. The positive predictive and negative predictive values were 100% and 97%, respectively.In this study, AGA detection was clearly related to IA. Although the ELISA test did not have any role in the anticipation of the diagnosis, it clarifies the diagnosis of IA in allo-HSCT.Prospective assessment of Platelia Aspergillus galactomannan antigen for the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis in lung transplant recipients.The clinical utility of Platelia trade mark Aspergillus galactomannan antigen for the early diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis was prospectively assessed in 70 consecutive lung transplant recipients. Sera were collected twice weekly and tested for galactomannan. Invasive aspergillosis was documented in 17.1% (12/70) of the patients. Using the generalized estimating equation model, at the cutoff value of >or= 0.5, the sensitivity of the test was 30%, specificity 93% with positive and negative likelihood ratios of 4.2 and 0.75, respectively. Increasing the cutoff value to >or= 0.66 yielded a sensitivity of 30%, specificity of 95%, and positive and negative likelihood ratios of 5.5 and 0.74. A total of 14 patients had false-positive tests, including nine who had cystic fibrosis or chronic obstructive pulmonary disease. False-positive tests occurred within 3 days of transplantation in 43% (6/14) of the patients, and within 7 days in 64% (9/14). Thus, the test demonstrated excellent specificity, but a low sensitivity for the diagnosis of aspergillosis in this patient population. Patients with cystic fibrosis or chronic obstructive pulmonary disease may transiently have a positive test in the early post-transplant period.Prospective clinical evaluation of a LightCycler-mediated polymerase chain reaction assay, a nested-PCR assay and a galactomannan enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay for detection of invasive aspergillosis in neutropenic cancer patients and haematological stem cell transplant recipients.Invasive aspergillosis (IA) is a considerable clinical problem in neutropenic patients with haematological malignancies but its diagnosis remains difficult. We prospectively evaluated a LightCycler polymerase chain reaction (PCR) assay, a nested-PCR assay and a galactomannan (GM) enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) to validate their significance in diagnosing IA. During 205 treatment episodes in 165 patients from six centres, a nested-PCR assay and GM testing was performed at regular intervals. Positive nested-PCR results were quantified by a LightCycler PCR assay. Patient episodes were stratified according to the 2002 European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer/Mycosis Study Group consensus criteria and the PCR and serology results were correlated with the clinical diagnostic classification. Sensitivity and specificity rates for the nested-PCR assay were up to 63.6% [95% confidence interval (CI): 30.8-89%) and 63.5% (95% CI: 53.4-72.7%) respectively, and 33.3% and 98.9% (95% CI: 7.5-70.1% and 94.2-99.9%) for GM respectively. The LightCycler PCR assay yielded positive results in 21.4%, lacking discrimination by quantification across the different clinical categories. In this prospective comparison, PCR was superior to GM with respect to sensitivity rates. In patients at high risk for IA, positive results for Aspergillus by PCR of blood samples are highly suggestive for IA and contribute to the diagnosis.Treatment with piperacillin-tazobactam and false-positive Aspergillus galactomannan antigen test results for patients with hematological malignancies.We report the occurrence of a high rate of false-positive test results during the surveillance of hematology patients for galactomannan (GM) antigenemia. Among 218 patients surveyed from June 2002 through June 2003, 42 (19.3%) had > or =1 serum sample positive for GM (optical density index, >1.5). Of these patients, 38 had no additional evidence of invasive aspergillosis, and, therefore, their test results were considered to be false-positives. Case-control analysis showed that treatment with piperacillin-tazobactam was the only risk factor significantly associated with receiving false-positive test results. When tested for GM antigen, 3 of 4 piperacillin-tazobactam batches had positive results. Physicians should be aware of the possible interference of treatment with piperacillin-tazobactam when interpreting the results of the GM assay.Development of a serum-based Taqman real-time PCR assay for diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis.We compared an Aspergillus fumigatus-specific Taqman real-time PCR assay for the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA) with the enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay Platelia Aspergillus method. Patients with proven or probable IA had positive results with at least one of the two methods. The PCR method seems to be more specific, and a combination of the two should improve the diagnosis of IA.Detection of circulating Aspergillus fumigatus galactomannan: value and limits of the Platelia test for diagnosing invasive aspergillosis.The effectiveness of galactomannan detection with the Platelia test was evaluated in a prospective study of 3,327 sera from 807 patients. The specificity was 99.6% (748 of 751 cases). For the groups of patients with proven and probable invasive aspergillosis, the sensitivity was 50.0% (17 of 34 cases). The disappointing sensitivity associated with the presence of rare false-positive cases underlines the limits of this test.Galactomannan detection in computerized tomography-based broncho-alveolar lavage fluid and serum in haematological patients at risk for invasive pulmonary aspergillosis.We determined the value of galactomannan (GM) detection in computerized tomography (CT)-based broncho-alveolar lavage (BAL) fluid and serum for the diagnosis of invasive pulmonary aspergillosis (IPA) in haemato-oncological patients with neutropenia. CT of the thorax and BAL were performed systematically at predefined clinical indications. GM was determined by sandwich enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay; the clinicians were unaware of the results. Of 160 patients, 17 patients (10.6%) presented with proven, probable or suspected IPA. The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value (PPV) and negative predictive value (NPV) of GM detection in CT-based BAL fluid were all 100%. For GM detection in serially sampled serum, the sensitivity was 47%, the specificity 93%, the PPV 73% and the NPV 82%. A non-blinded follow-up study was performed to validate these results. In this study, 22 of 198 patients (11.1%) presented with IPA, and the sensitivity, specificity, PPV and NPV of GM detection in CT-based BAL fluid were 85%, 100%, 100% and 88% respectively. None of BAL fluids obtained after antifungal treatment of 3 d or more were positive. These results indicate that, when CT is used systematically and at an early stage, GM detection in CT-based BAL fluid has a high PPV for diagnosing IPA early in untreated patients.Use of circulating galactomannan screening for early diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis in allogeneic stem cell transplant recipients.Screening for galactomannan (GM) has been adopted by many European centers as part of the management plan for allogeneic stem cell transplant recipients. However, the temporal onset of GM antigenemia remains unknown. A series of allogeneic stem cell transplant recipients were monitored prospectively, and the relationship between antigenemia and other diagnostic triggers for initiation of antifungal therapy was analyzed. GM detection had a sensitivity of 94.4% and a specificity of 98.8%. Positive and negative predictive values were 94.4% and 98.8%, respectively. This statistical profile was better than that of other triggers, including unexplained fever, new pulmonary infiltrates, isolation of Aspergillus species, and abnormalities seen on computed tomography. Antigenemia preceded diagnosis on the basis of radiologic examination or Aspergillus isolation by 8 and 9 days in 80% and 88.8% of patients, respectively. Antigenemia preceded therapy in 83.3% of patients. Detection of GM was especially useful when patients were receiving steroid treatment or when coexisting conditions masked the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis. Prospective screening for GM allows earlier diagnosis of aspergillosis than do conventional diagnostic criteria.Aspergillus antigen and PCR assays in bone marrow transplanted children.Screening for Aspergillus antigen and DNA has been introduced for the early diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA) in adults, but data in children at risk are scarce. Seventeen 1-108 month-old children were screened for Aspergillus antigenaemia by a commercial assay before and after bone marrow transplantation (BMT). Seventy-one serum samples were examined retrospectively by a novel nested PCR assay. Results of both assays were correlated with clinical, radiological and microbiological findings used for the definition of invasive aspergillosis by the European Organisation for Research and Treatment of Cancer (EORTC). Three cases of probable or possible IA were defined, and in 14 children invasive aspergillosis was ruled out. In 10 children, Aspergillus antigen was detected in at least two consecutive serum samples, a microbiological EORTC criteria of IA. Specific DNA was detected in 8 antigen-positive and 2 antigen-negative sera. A positive predictive value of 20% was calculated for both assays. Hence, a high rate of positive results of antigen Elisa and PCR assays in BMT children are due to transient antigenaemia and fungaemia without clinical relevance. According to our data, prospective studies in well defined pediatric patients are urgently needed to determine the value of serial Aspergillus PCR assays for the early diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis in children at risk.Surveillance of Aspergillus galactomannan antigenemia for invasive aspergillosis by enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay in neutropenic patients treated for hematological malignancies.The incidence of invasive fungal infections is increasing in patients with hematological malignancies. Invasive aspergillosis is one of the most frequently encountered infections with a high mortality rate. New diagnostic tests for invasive aspergillosis such as the detection of Aspergillus galactomannan antigen by a sandwich enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) have recently been described. The objective of this study was to evaluate this assay as a potential surrogate for invasive procedures used to diagnose IA.We analyzed the performance of a commercially available ELISA test which we routinely use for the surveillance of galactomannan antigenemia in patients with hematological malignancies experiencing chemotherapy-induced prolonged neutropenia (ANC < 500/mm(3) for more than 7 days). Serum samples were collected on a weekly basis. Test positivity was defined in accordance with the manufacturer's recommendations.Over the 2 year study period, we analyzed 507 samples obtained during 193 neutropenic episodes from 135 patients. Ten, six and two patients were considered to have proven, probable or possible invasive aspergillosis, respectively, based on clinical, radiological or microbiological data. Forty-four positive (Index>1.5) and 26 'undetermined' (1.5 > Index > 1.0) test results were observed in 17 and ten patients respectively. All invasive aspergillosis cases had at least a positive or an undetermined test result. Only one positive and one undetermined result were found in two patients before the onset of clinical or radiological signs suggesting invasive aspergillosis. Sensitivity was 69% and specificity 96% if only positive results are considered; when 'undetermined' test results were combined with positive results, sensitivity attained 100% and specificity 92% suggesting that the cutoff value for positivity can be lowered from 1.5 to 1.0.Although the ELISA test did not appear to play a role in the early diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis and in the anticipation of antifungal therapy in our experience, it clarifies the diagnosis of infection in probable or possible invasive aspergillosis especially when the cutoff value is lowered and is useful for monitoring patients receiving specific therapy.Aspergillus galactomannan detection in the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis in cancer patients.To assess the Aspergillus galactomannan enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) in the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA) in adult and pediatric oncohematologic patients.The study was conducted in four patient groups: those with fever of unknown origin (FUO) during neutropenia, suspected pulmonary infection (PI), or nonpulmonary aspergillosis (NPA) and those undergoing surveillance (S) after hematopoietic stem-cell transplantation (HSCT). IA was classified as definite, probable, or possible, according to European Organization for Research and Treatment of Cancer/Mycosis Study Group definitions.A total of 3,294 serum samples were collected during 797 episodes (FUO, 261; PI, 297; NPA, 28; and surveillance, 211), and 153 episodes of IA were diagnosed (31 definite, 67 probable, and 55 possible). Three episodes were first suspected from galactomannan ELISA; the remaining 150 cases were diagnosed from clinical or radiologic evidence. Sensitivity of the ELISA was 64.5%, 16.4%, and 25.5% in definite, probable, and possible episodes of IA, respectively, and was lower in patients positive for anti-Aspergillus antibodies than in antibody-negative patients. Most false-positive results occurred in children and in allogeneic HSCT (allo-HSCT) patients. Overall specificity of the ELISA was 94.8%. It was lower in children compared with adults (P <.0001) and in allo-HSCT patients compared with non-allo-HSCT adults (P =.0002). Lowering the ELISA cutoff value from 1.500 to 0.700 seemed more relevant for non-allo-HSCT adults (sensitivity, 73.1%, 44.3%, and 44.7% in definite, probable, and possible IA, respectively; specificity, 94%).Galactomannan ELISA seems less sensitive than previously described, and sensitivity can be further reduced by the presence of anti-Aspergillus antibodies. A new cutoff value for the ELISA of 0.700 is proposed for non-allo-HSCT adults.Aspergillus antigenemia sandwich-enzyme immunoassay test as a serodiagnostic method for invasive aspergillosis in liver transplant recipients.Invasive aspergillosis (IA) is an important cause of mortality in liver transplant patients. Clinical and microbiological diagnosis is difficult, and it is frequently achieved only after autopsy. Early diagnosis and antifungal therapy could improve the survival of these patients.A retrospective case-control study of IA in liver transplant recipients (OLT) was performed to determine the value of the detection of galactomannan Aspergillus antigen in serum using a sandwich-ELISA test (Platelia, Sanofi Diagnostic Pasteur). Stored frozen serum specimens obtained during the posttransplantation period were used.Fourteen cases of IA were diagnosed in 240 OLT recipients (IA incidence: 5.8%) during 5 years with 13 deaths (mortality: 93%). Nine case patients and 33 control patients met the criteria required for being considered "valid" for antigenemia analysis. In five of the nine case patients, a serum sample was positive for Aspergillus antigenemia detection. The median value was 5.7 ng/ml (range: 1.6-6.6). Sensitivity of the test was 55.6%, specificity was 93.9%, the positive predictive value was 71.4%, and the negative predictive value was 88.6%. The likelihood ratio of a positive test was 9.2.Galactomannan detection in serum could be useful for an early diagnosis of IA in OLT recipients.Value of antigen detection using an enzyme immunoassay in the diagnosis and prediction of invasive aspergillosis in two adult and pediatric hematology units during a 4-year prospective study.Invasive aspergillosis (IA) is a well recognized, life-threatening infection in neutropenic patients and stem cell transplantation recipients. Early diagnosis is important to achieve the best outcome for these patients; however, definite proof often is difficult to obtain due to counterindicated invasive procedures.This study evaluated the specificity and sensitivity of the detection of galactomannan (GM) for the diagnostic and prediction of IA in 347 children from the Pediatric Hematology Service and 450 patients from the Bone Marrow Transplantation Unit at the Hôpital Saint-Louis in Paris. Serial screening of Aspergillus GM circulating antigen was evaluated using a double sandwich ELISA assay (Platelia Aspergillus) on 6209 sera. Among the patients studied, 53 presented with confirmed IA (n = 27 patients) or probable IA (n = 26 patients).Antigen was detected on at least two sequential sera in 48 of 53 patients, with a sensitivity of 90.6%. GM antigenemia was detected before the onset of radiologic signs in 31 of 48 patients (64.6%), with a mean of -8.4 days, and before clinical symptoms in 18 of 48 patients (39.6%), with a mean of -6.9 days. In patients without IA, 44 of 744 had positive antigenemia, resulting in a specificity of 94%. False positive results could not be related to the presence of a concurrent mucositis.This large, prospective study allowed the authors to define better the conditions for the use of GM immunocapture ELISA in surveying patients who are at high risk for IA. The presence of antigen has a good diagnostic value mainly when there is an increase in the titer on two consecutive sera samples. A repeated negative result is a strong argument against the diagnosis of IA; however, an awareness of the possibility of unexplained false negative results is important.Aspergillus antigen testing in bone marrow transplant recipients.To assess the clinical usefulness of a commercial aspergillus antigen enzyme linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) in the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA) in bone marrow transplant recipients, and to compare it with a commercial latex agglutination (LA) test.In total, 2026 serum samples from 104 bone marrow transplant recipients were tested. These comprised 67 sera from seven patients who had died with confirmed IA, 268 sera from nine patients who had died with suspected IA, and 1691 sera from 88 patients with no clinical, radiological, or microbiological signs of IA.The ELISA was more sensitive than the LA test. All patients who were ELISA positive were also LA positive, and a positive LA result never preceded a positive ELISA. Twelve of 16 patients with confirmed or suspected IA were ELISA positive on two or more occasions, compared with 10 of 15 who were LA positive. ELISA was positive before LA in five patients (range, 2-14 days), and became positive on the same day in the remainder. Aspergillus antigen was detected by ELISA a median of 15 days before death (range, 4-233). Clinical and/or radiological evidence of IA was noted in all patients, and a positive ELISA was never the sole criterion for introduction of antifungal treatment. Two samples (one from each of two patients without IA) gave false positive results.The aspergillus ELISA is a specific indicator of invasive aspergillosis if the criterion of two positive samples is required to confirm the diagnosis. However, the test is insufficiently sensitive to diagnose aspergillosis before other symptoms or signs are apparent, and hence is unlikely to lead to earlier initiation of antifungal treatment. It is therefore unsuitable for screening of asymptomatic patients at risk of invasive aspergillosis, but does have a useful role in confirming the diagnosis in symptomatic patients.Comparison of serum galactomannan antigen detection and competitive polymerase chain reaction for diagnosing invasive aspergillosis.To improve the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA), we retrospectively compared competitive polymerase chain reaction (PCR) and sandwich ELISA for detection of serum galactomannan (GM) antigen. We studied 281 serum samples collected weekly during the period at risk for IA from 41 selected hematology patients. Twenty-two patients had confirmed, probable, or suspected IA, according to clinical and mycologic data. Fifteen of them had positive GM titers (87 samples) and 12 had positive PCRs (20 samples). Nineteen of the 20 PCR-positive samples were also GM-positive. Of the 19 patients without IA (83 samples), one had 3 GM-false-positive samples. Neither test anticipated the initiation of antifungal therapy on the basis of clinical suspicion. Both tests were more likely to be positive before death. This study suggests that PCR on serum samples is not more sensitive than GM detection. However, PCR can improve the specificity of the GM test. Together, these noninvasive tests should improve the diagnosis of IA.Comparison of an enzyme immunoassay and a latex agglutination system for the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis in bone marrow transplant recipients.The performance of two Aspergillus antigenemia systems, the sandwich enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA), Platelia Aspergillus test, and the latex agglutination (LA), Pastorex Aspergillus test, in the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis were compared by testing 364 serum samples from 22 bone marrow transplant (BMT) recipients. Sensitivity and specificity for the ELISA test were 60% and 82% respectively, vs 40% and 94% for the LA test. In the two patients found positive with both methods, the ELISA test became positive earlier than the LA test or remained positive after the LA test had become negative. These results encourage further evaluation of the Platelia Aspergillus test, to assess its role in the management of invasive aspergillosis in BMT patients.Serum Aspergillus galactomannan antigen testing by sandwich ELISA: practical use in neutropenic patients.The double sandwich ELISA detecting Aspergillus galactomannan (GM) was prospectively evaluated for the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis (IA) in 50 haematological patients at risk for IA. Serum samples were collected once weekly as long as the risk factors persisted. Six patients had proven or probable IA (3 A. fumigatus, 1 A. flavus, 1 A. niger, 1 A. ustus) and the GM titres were parallel to the clinical evolution of IA. Six of nine patients with suspected IA had at least two consecutive serum GM titres above 1 ng/ml and died with increasing titres, whereas the GM-negative patients survived. Positive GM titres did not anticipate the isolation of fungi. Unfortunately, positive GM titres did not anticipate the initiation of antifungal therapy, based on clinical suspicion. Moreover, if a true-positive result was defined as two consecutive positive serum samples, four patients out of 35 without proven, probable or suspected IA were positive. Then, the rate of false-positive results was high (12%) in the range previously reported. Nevertheless, the GM ELISA appears useful to assess IA and to follow the efficacy of antifungal treatment.Comparison of an enzyme immunoassay and latex agglutination test for detection of galactomannan in the diagnosis of invasive aspergillosis.Aspergillus antigenemia was followed up in 215 consecutively observed bone marrow transplant (BMT) patients over a period of two years, using both a latex agglutination test and a sandwich immunocapture enzyme immunoassay (EIA) with a rat antigalactomannan monoclonal antibody as capture and detector antibody. For each patient, sequential sera (3 to 20) were obtained before and after BMT. No positivity was observed before BMT. After BMT, the EIA and latex agglutination test were positive in 19 and 4 patients respectively of 25 patients with confirmed aspergillosis and 14 and 7 of 15 patients with probable aspergillosis. In 19 of 25 patients with confirmed aspergillosis and 9 of 15 patients with probable aspergillosis, the EIA was more sensitive and detected infection earlier than the latex test. In all positive cases, antigenemia rapidly increased in sequential samples and remained strongly positive. In 31 of 169 (19%) BMT patients without clinical signs of aspergillosis, the EIA was occasionally positive in samples taken within the first month after BMT, giving a specificity of 81% in these patients. In non-BMT patients suffering from other diseases (n = 77), the specificity was 98.7%. The overall positive and negative predictive values for the EIA were 54% and 95% respectively. These results favour the use of EIA for early diagnosis and monitoring of aspergillosis in BMT patients, although the predictive value of transient positivity remains to be ascertained.Comparison of antigen detection and PCR assay using bronchoalveolar lavage fluid for diagnosing invasive pulmonary aspergillosis in patients receiving treatment for hematological malignancies.The performance of a sandwich enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) which detects Aspergillus galactomannan (GM) was evaluated in bronchoalveolar lavage (BAL) fluid samples from 19 patients who were treated for hematological malignancies and who were suspected of having invasive pulmonary aspergillosis (IPA). All patients had fever and pulmonary infiltrates on the chest roentgenogram on the day that the BAL fluid was obtained. The ELISA results were compared with the results of culture and Aspergillus genus-specific PCR analysis of BAL fluid samples. ELISA was also performed with serum samples. Aspergillus species were detected by PCR or ELISA with BAL fluid samples from five of seven patients who had radiological evidence of IPA. Serum ELISA results were positive for all patients with ELISA-positive BAL fluid, and for four patients the serum ELISA was positive before the BAL fluid was obtained. PCR and ELISA were positive for 2 and 1 of 10 BAL fluid samples, respectively, obtained from patients without radiological evidence of IPA, and 5 and 2 of 35 BAL fluid samples, respectively, obtained from nonneutropenic patients. This preliminary investigation suggests that GM may be detected by ELISA in BAL fluid samples from patients at risk of IPA, but that monitoring of serum GM levels may allow for the earlier diagnosis of IPA. However, further evaluation in prospective studies is required.